From WBEZ Chicago, it's This American Life, distributed by Public Radio International. I'm Ira Glass. About a year ago, this thing happened to me when I took the train down to visit my dad in Baltimore. And when this thing happened, he said to me, you know, this could be a story on your show. I said, well, apparently you can go to Amtrak and they'll retrieve your luggage at the train's next stop and throw it onto the next Amtrak that's headed back to you. So of course, this was very, very worrisome. And it was at lunch that my stepmom, Sandy, got an idea. Let's buy a cheap suit at Marshalls just in case the train doesn't come in. We didn't have much time, so we hustled over to Marshalls, where we learned that Marshalls actually doesn't sell many suits. They literally have two suits in the store. Miraculously, one fits. It went off like a great bank heist. Like The Sting. Like Ocean's 11. I got the suit at Marshalls. The train came in. It had my real suit. I change into the real student at the back of the train station. We go to the Baltimore Symphony, which was, by the way, fantastic. They got this new conductor. We went home, removed the scotch tape from the suit, and returned it on Monday. Well, at least he could tell. I feel like you guys are dwelling on the last one. That was amazing. All right. Well, our next story is from Nancy Updike, who recorded this story, but couldn't be here with us. Well everybody, what do you think? Nancy Updike, with Dave Hill, by the way. All right. Well, our next story is from Alex Blumberg. OK. Stop the tape. Stop the tape. OK. I'm just going to point out what's going on here. Paul, our engineer, with all due respect, briefly fell asleep. Alex, meanwhile, had to leave to go to a meeting for his other-- he works on Planet Money, and they had a big meeting, so he's not even here to defend himself. All right. So it's looking very, very bad for Alex in our competition. Coming up-- more stories pitched by our parents, who by the way, we all love very, very, very much. That's in a minute from Chicago Public Radio and Public Radio International when our program continues. All right. Well, our last story today comes from Jane Feltes. OK. So it's time to vote. We've heard all the stories. Just to review on what those stories were one more time. It was my dad's story the suit on the train, Lisa's story about the funny funeral, Nancy's story about the Erie Canal, Alex's story about corporations as people, Robyn's story about her dad's rotary phone-controlled car, Alissa's story about her bubbe's deathbed boredom, Sarah's story about Christmas and her daughter and her mom, and Jane's story about the college in Haiti. Our program was produced today by Sarah Koenig and myself with the greatest documentary production staff in radio-- Alex Blumberg, Jane Feltes, Lisa Pollak, Robyn Semian, Alissa Shipp, and Nancy Updike. Our senior producer is Julie Snyder Our intern, who is already making our stories better, is Brian Reed. Seth Lind is our production manager. Emily Condon is our office manager. Music consultant, Jessica Hopper. Audio engineering for today's shows by Paul [? Rues. ?] Dave was in his late 20s, and it would not be accurate to say that he was living at home with his parents, but only because half the time he was staying at his sister's house. He was playing in a band, doing some writing, not making much money, and his parents were worried. And one day he was hanging out with his mom. So they pull into the driveway. Dave's mom tells him there's going to be a benefit for this retirement home for nuns and priests. His mom's an old school Catholic who goes to mass every day. And she says it's going to be at a hotel in downtown Cleveland. They live in Cleveland. And Maureen McGovern, who sang the theme to The Poseidon Adventure back in the '70s was going to be the entertainment. So Dave realizes he's trapped. Checkmate. He's going to have to at least call Father Dennis. So he gets Father Dennis on the phone and they agree that Dave is going to pick him up and they'll attend the event together. Second, the luncheon buffet turns out to be mostly fried foods. None of which can be eaten by Father Dennis, who's still recovering from his two heart attacks and requested a special low fat meal. Though Dave's mom has come prepared for this. Father Dennis tells her very politely, thanks, but no. He doesn't want a sandwich. And eventually the waiters do arrange for him to get some sort of meal. At their table are some very old people, Dave's parents, Dave, and Father Dennis. Dave says this was par for the course. His mom often mystified him. And a certain amount of her parenting, of any parenting really, is putting your kids into situations you know are going to be good for them whether they like it or not. Or even, whether they understand it. From WBEZ Chicago it's This American Life distributed by Public Radio International. I'm Ira Glass. Act 1, Letter Day Saint. David Segal is a reporter for the New York Times. It's This American Life, I'm Ira Glass. This is Janice Carter. Not only does she know the ending of the story, she's actually the key player in it. But incredibly, Janice kept at this for years. She'd have to toss Lucy some food, some of her's, just to keep Lucy from starving. But she kept at it. Janice says she'd periodically circle in a boat just to keep an eye on Lucy. But she says she never, not once, set foot on that island. At least not for a year. Then one day she decided to go back. She pulled her boat up to the tip of the island where there's just a little clearing and she parked. And as she did, Lucy and the other chimps who had heard the boat, came out of the forest and into the clearing. And Lucy and her walked toward each other. Janice Carter still lives in Gambia. It's then when she realized that the chimps there would never have a chance to survive unless their human neighbors understood that might be a good thing. So these days she spends a lot of her time teaching people in Gambia about chimps, to convince them about the importance of protecting the chimps habitat. Well our program was produced today by Robyn Semien and myself with Alex Blumberg, Jane Feltes, Lisa Pollak, Sarah Koenig, Alissa Shipp and Nancy Updike. Our senior producer's Julie Snyder with production help from Brian Reed. Seth Lind is our production manager. Emily Condon's our office manager. Our music consultant is Jessica Hopper. I'm Ira Glass, back next week with more stories of this American Life. Luke was 11 when his family moved from the normal boring suburbs to what amounted to basically the coolest place on Earth. His dad got this job as the manager of this tourist park called The Butterfly Farm. Also a spider house, a picnic area, a snake house, and a guy named Vic who did a show with his collection of deadly snakes. It's This American Life, by the way, from WBEZ Chicago, distributed by Public Radio International. Show off especially because his dad had asked the snake handler, Vic, to come in and do a show for Luke's class. Normally Vic didn't work during the week-- there weren't big enough crowds to justify it. But Luke's dad, knowing this would be good for Luke, asked him to come in special. This was just prep for the show. They would put the snakes into bags, and then they would carry them to the stage for Vic's presentation. OK, crazy, and nobody knows what to do, the snake is on this child's lap. And because Vic has turned stiff as a board-- It was a pretty far way to go. And he gets his dad, and Luke's dad came back with him, and when they got back, none of the adults had taken any action at all. One of Luke's teachers was kneeling next to Vic, but he wasn't administering CPR, or doing mouth to mouth, or anything at all. He was just kneeling there, not sure what to do. Well, today on our radio show, stories of people saving the day, and what takes them over when they do it. In these stories of people who jump in-- are just seized by the sense that they have to act, they don't have choice, they won't be able to live with themselves if they don't jump into action-- there's something incredibly pure about it. Our show in two acts. One in the wilds of Mexico, one in the halls of academia. Stay with us. Act One, Midlife Cowboy. We have this story from James Spring who lives in a city that's not so far from the Mexican border, San Diego. James Spring, in San Diego. In the nearly two years since his 40th birthday, dozens of people who heard about what happened have contacted James, asking him to find their missing loved ones. He decided to help out in half a dozen cases. There was the paranoid schizophrenic in Laguna Harbor, the guy who's been missing for 35 years, the tow truck driver's missing wife, the father who stole his son and fled to Mexico. His current case is a missing family of four in Southern California. He said his wife is not too crazy about any of this. Act Two, I'd Like To Spank the Academy. Every year for the last 12 years, the University of Montevallo, a small liberal arts college outside of Birmingham, Alabama, has held an event called The Life Raft Debate. Simple premise-- there's been a global catastrophe-- nuclear war-- something that has wiped out the entire world, except, miraculously, the hundreds of students who are in the audience of The Life Raft Debate. Nancy Updike is one of the producers of our program. Today we  have this story for you about cars-- American cars. And like most stories about American cars lately, it's more tragedy than comedy, though there is some comedy in there, too. It's the story of a factory in California that captures pretty much everything that's gone wrong in the American car business in the last 30 years. And at the heart of the story is the question, why are American cars still not as good as foreign cars? Why hasn't GM got it yet? It's not like this reliability problem just snuck up on them. It's been nearly 50 years since it started losing market share-- 50 years since it began the slide from holding over half the US car market, back in the '60s, to just 22% today. Here's an amazing fact. Even after Toyota's recent disaster with suddenly accelerating cars that killed possibly 52 people, Consumer Reports came out with new ratings just this month and it still rates Toyota as more reliable than all the American car makers. That's NPR's Frank Langfitt. Coming up, so there's this great way of making cars, GM is using it  in California. Not only are the cars more reliable, they're cheaper to make. Seems like a no-brainer for GM-- start putting this way of producing cars into their other factories everywhere, and declare victory. Why they didn't do that, why what happened at NUMMI stayed at NUMMI for so long, that's in a minute from Chicago Public Radio and Public Radio International when our program continues. It's This American Life, I'm Ira Glass. If you're just tuning in, we're in the middle of a story about a car plant in Fremont, California, called NUMMI. We now turn to the question, why was it so hard for GM to replicate NUMMI elsewhere in the company. In the first half of our story, we heard a lot from workers who are on the factory floor. In this half of the story, the action moves to their bosses-- the supervisors at GM, who had a chance to turn the company around with what they learned at NUMMI. Again, here's NPR's Frank Langfitt. Frank Langfitt is NPR's automotive correspondent. I'm Ira Glass, back next week with more stories of This American Life. Here's the story the way we usually like it. There's this guy. And he's behind enemy lines. Maybe he's dropped in there in the middle of the night. Maybe he sneaks under barbwire at the border. Whatever. He's there. He's been there awhile. Months. Years maybe. He's in disguise. Working on our behalf. Nobody suspects. No one can tell. He looks and acts just like them. And then, living there in their midst for so long, speaking their language, eating their food, breathing their air, watching their TV shows, something happens. He starts to change. He starts to become more like them. And then when it's time for him to strike, to launch his mission against them, he hesitates. He's not sure who he sympathizes with anymore. Act One: Confession. It's Easter week. Pope Benedict has been facing a lot of criticism with allegations that he didn't adequately discipline priests who were accused of sexual abuse, back before Pope Benedict was a Pope, back when he was an Archbishop and a Cardinal. So we've decided to revisit a story that we first broadcast in 2003, about a young American priest who was sent out on a series of jobs by church administrators to squelch some scandals. Scandals not too different from the ones that are surfacing in the news right now. But spending time out among the people who he's supposed to be deceiving, the priest finds it harder and harder to keep doing his job. Carl Marziali tells the story from Los Angeles. Carl Marziali attends mass with his family in Los Angeles. Patrick Wall, however, no longer does. Since we first aired this story in 2003, Patrick has worked on nearly a thousand sexual abuse cases involving priests and co-authored a book called Sex, Priests, and Secret Codes: The Catholic Church's 2,000 Year Paper Trail of Sexual Abuse. He says after all this, he no longer believes that the Catholic Church has the capacity to change. His daughter, now eight years old, is not enrolled in Catholic school. Act Two: Blood Agent. Nature, it turns out, is full of enemy agents, living behind enemy lines, doing their work. Parasites-- they're literally parasites. Carl Zimmer has written a book about the different strategies that these parasites use to survive. And it makes for weirdly compelling reading. For one thing, who knew how prevalent they were? Act Three. As The Worm Turns. Well, as long as we're on the subject of apologists for parasites, let's hear this story from the staff of Radiolab. Here's Radiolab's host Robert Krulwich and reporter Patrick Walters. Thanks to Patrick Walters and the hosts of Radiolab, Jad Abumrad and Robert Krulwich for that story. After that story was first broadcast, the Food and Drug Administration decided to pay a visit to Jasper Lawrence's house in Santa Cruz. Officials inspected the lab where he harvests his hookworms, told him he had to shut down his operation. That night, Jasper and his wife packed up their belongings and fled the country, so he could keep harvesting and selling hookworms. Jasper's website is autoimmunetherapies.com. And before you get any big ideas about ordering some hookworms, he is not shipping worms right now to the United States of America. Act Four. Sleeping With Your Enemy. We have this story about what is hidden inside of us-- the secret agents within. From writer Etgar Keret. Among other things, he says that this is a story of his real-life wife. Actor Matt Malloy reads it for it. A quick warning for listeners before we begin. This story acknowledges the existence of sex. Matt Malloy. Reading Etgar Keret's story, "Fatso", which appears in his book, The Nimrod Flipout. Kaaret's most recent collection is The Girl on the Fridge. This story was translated into English by Miriam Shlesinger.  Radiolab is produced by WNYC and distributed by NPR. Thanks to them. If you're not listening to Radiolab, you should be. The new season starts this week-- radiolab.org. Our website, thisamericanlife.org. The store at our website is back up in operation. And there's an update to our iPhone app. This American Life is distributed by Public Radio International, WBEZ. Management oversight for our program by our boss Mr. Torey Malatia, who has just one question for you: Hey, baby. Want to play nanny goat and ride in the back? I'm Ira Glass. Back next week, with more stories of This American Life. A friend of mine ran her own small business. It was just her and this guy, the bookkeeper. And she loved the bookkeeper. The bookkeeper did the billing. He kept the accounts. He saw that vendors were paid on time. He did basically all the stuff that, to my friend, was just kind of drudgery. She used to say that she didn't know what she would do without him. They were really close. So it was this great setup for years. Act One, Eat My Shorts. Something you hear from a lot of people on Wall Street, this crisis that we're going through now, nobody saw it coming. See what I mean? This is Angelo Mozilo, the former CEO of the failed mortgage lender Countrywide on Australia Broadcasting. Brian Moynihan, head of Bank of America, told a congressional hearing he didn't either. Even Robert Rubin, former treasury secretary, former chairman of the executive committee of Citigroup's Board of Directors said just this week-- The recent collapse of the financial system has been described as a 100-year flood, a perfect storm, a force of nature. And it is so frustrating to hear it described that way, as something that happened to Wall Street instead of something that Wall Street brought on itself. Alex Blumberg, who's part of our Planet Money team. Planet Money is a co-production between our program and NPR News. This story was done as a collaboration with ProPublica and the reporters Jake Bernstein and Jesse Eisinger. A statement from Magnetar and its full response to our questions, emails between a CDO manager and Magnetar, a timeline of the deals, analysis, lots of documents, a more detailed version of this story are all at ProPublica's website propublica.org. Prince emphasized that even the Citibank employees who made the decisions to keep these CDOs on the books had no reason to suspect that they might go bad. In other words, no one saw it coming. John Treacy Eagan and Christian Borle on vocals. "Bet Against The American Dream," the music and lyrics were written for our show by Robert Lopez, produced by music supervisor Steven Oremus. The orchestrator was Bruce Coughlin. To see a video of these amazing Broadway performers recording the song, go to Planet Money's website npr.org/money. Coming up, what cops know about cops. That's in a minute from Chicago Public Radio and Public Radio International when our program continues. It's This American Life. I'm Ira Glass. Each week on our program, of course, we choose a theme, bring you reporting, interviews, songs, anything we can think of on that theme. Today's show, Inside Job. We've arrived at Act Two of our show. Act Two, Taking A Big Pink Eraser To The Thin Blue Line. He also explains how to grow pot without getting caught indoors or out, how to spot undercovers and informants, how to handle knock and talks and rap and taps-- that's when a cop tries to talk his way into your house. That's Barry demonstrating how you should yell through the window at the officer. All this advice could really only come from a consummate insider. And Barry Cooper is one. He's a former narcotics cop and a dirty narcotics cop at that. And recently he has moved on from the DVDs to a new venture, again, drawing on his experience in law enforcement. Michael May tells the story from Austin. Michael May is the culture editor at The Texas Observer, whose website, texasobserver.org, is linking to all of the YouTube videos of Barry's police raids. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. If you grew up in a big city, you may have heard the urban legend alligators in the sewers. They got there when people brought back baby alligators from vacations in Florida and flushed them down the toilets. That's the kind of thing that, once you turn 12, you don't believe in anymore. Right? Maybe you heard stories like this that don't seem they could possibly be true about somebody. They go in their bathroom late at night. They sit down. They get bit by a rat that came up through the pipes into the toilet. Here it is. OK. Horrifying. Ian, of course, quickly closes the lid, stands there dumbstruck. What's his next move? It's obvious. Ian picks up the magazine rack by the toilet, which is heavy with three-years-old National Geographics. He puts this on top of the toilet lid, leaves the bathroom to figure out his next play. His girlfriend, Chelsea, is outside. Ian puts a leather garden glove on one hand and puts a rubber kitchen glove on top of that figuring, the rat's wet, that's going to be better. Not good. Ian drops the lid, leans his weight on it, which catches the rat half-in half-out of the toilet. Its head and front arms are sticking out, waving around. Now he just feels sorry for the little thing. But this is his chance to set it free. I'll spare you the gory details that follow. Let's just say that after another couple grabs, Ian comes to realize that he cannot capture the rat. He's going to have to kill him while he's trapped there halfway out of the toilet bowl. Which Ian does with his not-bare hands. Ian says half the people he tells this story to don't believe it. He thinks they just don't want to believe it. But it turns out that the pipes that lead from your house to the sewer are not full of water. They're mostly empty unless you're doing your wash or something else that's sending a lot of water down. Chelsea was left with the urban legend that rats could come up into the toilet. I mean, now she knew it was true. So when she went into the bathroom, her imagination could just go wild. What's that smell? The way Steve Poizner sees it, he did something admirable, something daring, something unusual. And when I read his account of what he did, he seemed sincere about it too. He's a bit of a corny writer. Though even that, you can kind of forgive him. He's not a professional author. This is Steve Poizner reading from the book he wrote about this. When he sees the sound walls that separate California homes from the highway, he asks, were they keeping out the city's grit and noise or hiding profoundly sad lives? He's allowed in the school to teach one US government class for one semester under another teacher's supervision. And the only problem with this is a lot of it might not be true. Steve Poizner's book got more attention than most do because in the seven years since he spent one semester at Mount Pleasant High School, Steve Poizner ran for assemblyman and lost, ran for a statewide office, California Insurance Commissioner, and won. He's in his fourth year in that job now. And today, he's one of two front-runners to become the Republican candidate for the governor of California. And right after publication, his book, which is titled Mount Pleasant, jumped to number 5 on The New York Times Best Seller list. I heard about Steve Poizner and the controversy over whether his book got things wrong when a publicist for the book contacted our radio program. She wrote an email describing the incident at the bookstore this way, "Liberal activist took offense at how he describes the school, accurately, as plagued by gangs, teen pregnancy, and disrepair. They are trying to shut him up and discredit his argument about charter schools." Poizner makes a case for charter schools late in the book. "This is a classic case of liberals refusing to listen to simple facts and rational solutions." This is Joe Lovato. He teaches English at Mount Pleasant. His Dad taught English at Mount Pleasant before him. Mark Holston is one of Joe's colleagues in the English department. In his book, Poizner talks a few times about wishing that he could have a Stand and Deliver moment with his students. And Mark says, that's a problem right there. Driving around the neighborhood, it is hard to disagree with the teachers who say that it is a perfectly nice middle class and working class area. Occasionally you'll see a house in bad shape, but overwhelmingly it's nicely tended yards, garages, decent cars and SUVs in the driveways. It's suburban. I was surprised to learn that when Poizner taught here in 2003, there was a golf course just a couple blocks from the school. There's still a lake and the Raging Waters water park. He doesn't mention those in the book. So we went to the police. And they informed us that no, the neighborhood around Mount Pleasant High School is not especially dangerous or crime ridden. It's average for San Jose. And while San Jose might have a reputation in the richer suburbs around it for being sketchy and definitely was more dangerous in the '70s and '80s, a police spokesman told us that that view is out of date, an urban myth. That's about the number of fights that you would get at any high school even in a fancy neighborhood. There are no metal detectors in the school's entrances. Mr. Schroeder says, the total number of gang members among the 1,900 students here? 50 at most. When it comes to the drop out rate, Steve Poizner also seems to be choosing his statistics very selectively. Mount Pleasant's dropout rate, including the year he was there, is consistently better, sometimes far better than the state and national dropout rates, which is a huge achievement for a school like Mount Pleasant that is 2/3 Latino. Nationally, Latino dropout rates are much higher than those of other students. In his book, Poizner doesn't mention any of those numbers. These are the dangerous toughs of Mount Pleasant High School rehearsing The Music Man in the brand new auditorium that the school just built. The school has 150 students studying animation in a special studio with rows of Macs and animation stands. This was all going on when Poizner was at the school too. There are 19 AP classes. There's a vocational program teaching metal and woodworking and computer-aided design plus a variety of special projects and programs to close the achievement gap and get less-priveleged kids to college. School attendance is 95%. Some things about the school though clearly could be better. The school doesn't hit its goals in statewide testing. It ranks in the 40th percentile of all California schools partly because a fourth of Mount Pleasant student body is rated "not proficient" in English. But measured against schools with similar demographics, it's in the 70th percentile. Again, English teacher Mark Holsten. Poizner still insists on that. It was two months after he stopped teaching at the school that he filed papers to start fundraising to run for assemblyman. In the spring after that, his campaign came back to Mount Pleasant to shoot a commercial with testimony from teachers and students about what Poizner had done for the school. The videographer set up a camera and lights in one of the classrooms during seventh period. And students were ushered in one at a time. Mark Holston and Joe Lovato explained that at the end of school that year, the principal quickly wrote up a bunch of certificates on his computer for a staff party. Lots of people got them for all kinds of things. Todd Richards is the social studies teacher who supervised Steve Poizner in classroom 612 back in 2003. He's still there. In the debate among Mount Pleasant teachers over whether Steve Poizner was a Machiavellian schemer, who used them, or a sincere, perhaps slightly naive guy, who actually wanted to help out, Mr. Richards is a principled agnostic. We can't know what he was thinking, Richards says. So let's judge his actions. Richard says that he was as suspicious as anybody when this millionaire showed up in his classroom. But over the course of the year-- When I recorded Mr. Richards teaching a class, his sixth-period college-level macroeconomics class for seniors-- He asked me if I would like to take five minutes and ask a few questions of the students. He left the room, so his presence wouldn't bias anybody. I asked the class if there was anything that they would want me to ask Poizner on their behalf or to say to him. One senior raised his hand and said that he'd just heard from colleges. Yvette Rodriguez, another senior, spoke up. Well, sort of. Some conclusions, obviously, people do argue with. But this particular conclusion-- that being at the 40th percentile among California public schools is not good enough-- is one that's kind of gotten lost in the shuffle in a lot of the discussion at the school. Sudhir Karandikar created the AP calculus program at Mount Pleasant. He teaches four classes of AP calculus. He's the only teacher I saw at school who could be described as dapper. And the only one wearing a suit, a charcoal gray pinstripe. He's been at Mount Pleasant 14 years. And he says, sure, Poizner got it wrong when he wrote that this is a dangerous school. "We should be doing a better job with these kids," Mr. Karandikar said. "That's what we should move the discussion to now." A few teachers told me that they agreed with Poizner, that academically the school should be better. And they like the fact that Poizner gives lots of details in his book to help his readers understand the money problems that the school faces and that he shows some of the everyday teaching problems they're up against, stuff that isn't really talked about in the news or normal political discussions about schools. Here's English teacher Vivian Bricksin. Steve Poizner says, this is exactly what he hopes readers will take from his book. He wants it to lead to a better discussion about how to improve schools. In the book, he talks mostly about charter schools as being a good laboratory for new ideas. English teacher Mark Holston sees this one differently. He says for Poizner to misread what this school and this neighborhood are all about says a lot about his judgment. And that does mean something. One week after Poizner's book made it to number 5 on the best seller list, it dropped to number 33. The campaign declined to give sales figures for the book and declined to say whether it bought enough copies itself in that first week to put the book on the best seller list. It's This American Life. I'm Ira Glass. Each week on our show we choose a theme, bring you different kinds of stories on that theme. Today's show, True Urban Legends. We're wading into the vapory shadows of urban myth to see what is real and what is not. We've arrived at Act Two of our show. Act Two, Fleeing is Believing. Mary Wiltenburg lives in Atlanta. Act 3, Sleeper Cells. The scariest urban myths are the ones that are about stuff that is everywhere, that we use every day, that we can't avoid, that our drinking water might be impure, that there are toxins in our food, that killer earthquakes might be coming to the west coast, that the polar ice caps might melt. Oh, wait a second, some of those are actually confirmed by scientists. Which brings me to cell phones. Christopher Ketcham is an investigative reporter. We linked to his GQ article at our website. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. From WBEZ Chicago, It's This American Life, distributed by Public Radio International. Richard Dorsay became momentarily famous in Chicago, in December 2004, when police learned from one of Richard's friends that Richard and this friend had been living down there, inside the frame of the bridge, tucked way in the rafters underneath the roadway, for years. Authorities kicked him out from this space that Richard says was probably 14- or 18-feet long, and about as wide as two lanes of traffic, with the steel frame of the bridge for walls and a concrete floor. The ceiling was the roadway. Where, out of wood that Richard and his friend mostly took from a construction site, they built three rooms in the dank space, a supply room and two bedrooms. There was electricity from a long extension cord that they hid with piping, and plugged into a regular electric socket in the bridge down below. But this wasn't just an adult treehouse, hidden away inside an old bridge. It was an adult treehouse inside in old drawbridge, a working drawbridge over the Chicago River, that every now and then would raise, turning the entire three-room apartment on its side, pulling the extension cord out of the outlet. And then, when that bridge is vertical, that bridge really is like vertical. Some of his stuff was bungee-corded down. The heavy stuff, like the TV, he kept against the back wall of his room, the wall that tilted to become the floor. And there's a bell on that bridge? So the bells go off, you hear the motors start. With the mattress next to you? Richard's been out of there since 2004. He lives with friends in a house now, in the suburbs. And when he talks about his little nest in the bridge today, he is surprisingly unsentimental. It was hot as hell in the summer, he says, and freezing in the winter. And the ceiling was just low enough, five feet and change, that he used to hit his head. But as we talked about it, there was also this. Yeah. The bridge connects point A to B, but there can be a whole life on a bridge. And today, on the radio show, we stop there and stay for an hour and see what happens there. We have three stories of people at three bridges on three continents. Act one is in China. Act two is in the border of Egypt. Act three in Florida. Stay with us. Act one, Troubled Bridge Over Water. You said you thought you'd find a hopeful figure. Yeah, you wrote in the article, at one point, you said, first of all, there's the cars, then there's the trains and the bridge is shaking, and then there's just like a sea of people, thousands of people, in the rain with umbrellas, going back and forth on the bridge, and he's just one guy kind of walking up and down. And you write in your article, he won't really to talk to you when you're there on the bridge. And so, give me a typical exchange between the two of you on the bridge. Oh, that's it? He doesn't even respond? So you go to lunch with him, and what happens there? Did he explain why it is that he does this? So you go back up to the bridge and he putters off in his moped, and then-- Because? So did you feel good? And so Mr. Chen comes back, right? He's taking a picture of the guy? Holy-- Do you get creeped out on any big bridge now? Mike Paternini. His account of meeting Mr. Chen is in the current issue, the May issue, of GQ Magazine. Act Two, Bridge and Tunnel. So Nancy, so you've talked to this guy who owns his own tunnel? So this is just very dangerous work? Oh my god. So the government knows about this and the government has rules for this sort of thing? And it's $20 a day, is that a lot of money, a little money? And so if I'm a laborer and I work in a tunnel, and then I get a percentage once the tunnel is functioning, like how much money can that mean? And he's getting that $70, not because he's working, carrying stuff through the tunnel, but simply for the work he did in building the tunnel? So that's unusual, right? Hey, Nancy, I'll just stop the tape there. What do those numbers mean? Wait, wait, wait, so it's just over five feet tall and just over three feet wide? So this is, like, it's tiny. And how deep are the tunnels? 30 feet deep? Nancy, you're asking about that, like needing to use the bathroom, it occurs to me, somehow I pictured these tunnels being like, OK, they go, there's a tent, they go underneath it like a fence or something on the edge of, like, the border, and they come up right on the other side of the fence. Like, so they're not very far, but you saying this makes me realize, like, how far are these? Do you believe him that he hasn't ran any guns through the tunnel? Wait, wait, Nancy, so in other words, he's saying that they're not bringing weapons into Gaza, basically, they're exporting weapons from Gaza into Egypt and making a profit? So this guy's making this huge economic gamble. He's selling off his family's land to invest in this tunnel. Is it working for him? Is he getting rich? Nancy, doesn't he face one other economic risk, and that is that if there were peace, if peace would break out between the Israelis and the Palestinians, these tunnels wouldn't have a reason to exist, and his whole investment would go to hell? Does he worry at all about peace? Nancy Updike is one of the producers of our show. Coming up, city and county laws that force possibly dangerous ex-cons to be homeless and move under a bridge. If I asked you to guess which state, which sunny, sunny state would do that, which would you guess? Answers in a minute from Chicago Public Radio and Public Radio International when our program continues. Why they're there is because, in 2005, Miami Dade County passed a law that required sex offenders who were coming out of jail to find housing at least 2,500 feet from any school, playground, or daycare. You probably heard about these residency restriction laws. Communities all over the country have them, but Miami's was, at the time, probably the strictest law of its kind. Isaiah Thompson, he's the former host of The Common Rabble. These days, he's a reporter and columnist at the Philadelphia City Paper. Well, our program was produced today by Robyn Semien, with Alex Blumberg, Ben Calhoun, Jane Feltes, Sarah Koenig, Lisa Pollak, Alissa Shipp, and Nancy Updike. Our senior producer's Julie Snyder. Seth Lind is our production manager. Emily Condon's our office manager. Production help from Brian Reed. Special thanks today to Jim McDonough I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories with This American Life.  From WBEZ Chicago it's This American Life, and distributed by Public Radio International, I'm Ira Glass.  This week I talked to a Haitian journalist, Romuald Felix, over his cell phone as he recorded himself walking around one of the tent cities where some of the 1.3 million displaced Haitians are still living. This was a small tent city in a plaza in the Place Saint Pierre crammed with people.  It was 5:00 at night. Romuald asked these four children if they'd eaten today.  When I talked this week to Nan Buzard-- who runs relief operations in Haiti for the American Red Cross-- she was unsurprised to hear that people aren't getting food and services, with over 1,000 makeshift camps, there are a lot of gaps. She'd just returned from Haiti the day before we spoke and said that now that they're shifting from the immediate disaster relief to the rebuilding of the country, the decisions have gotten very complicated.  Today on our radio show-- there's been this fantastic outpouring of money and goodwill from around the world. Nearly half of all American households have donated to Haiti, according to one survey. Haitians and foreigners have dedicated themselves to rebuilding the country. And now the question is, how exactly do you do that? Even with all this money and expertise, it's incredibly complicated. And today we join the people on the ground as they try to figure out what would be best. Next. Our show in three acts. Stay with us.  Chana Joffe-Walt and Adam Davidson are part of the Planet Money team. If you like this kind of story-- economics, but interesting. You can be getting it twice a week on the Planet Money podcast and at their blog, www.npr.org/money. It's a co-production between our program and NPR news.  This American Life, I'm Ira Glass. Today's program, "Island Time," stories about what happens next in Haiti, now that the world is flooding it with money and help. We've arrived at Act Two of our show. Act TWO, Compound Fracture.  Apricot Irving. She's writing a book about growing up on a missionary compound in Haiti. Right now she's looking for a publisher.  Act Three, "Hait is Destiny." Ben Fountain is a fiction writer who has been going to Haiti two or three times a year for 20 years. He has close friends there. He's written short stories set there, based on the things he's seen. He returned in March to catch up with people.  Ben Fountain. A few of the short stories that he's written, set in Haiti, are in his collection, brief encounters with Che Guevara.  I'm Ira Glass, back next week with more stories of This American Life. Probably the strangest thing about the K&R business-- K&R, that's Kidnap and Ransom-- is that it's a business at all, that there are enough kidnappings in the world that a whole industry issues kidnap insurance and there's responders who will help your family through the kidnapping and ransom process. And it's also workaday, like any other business. ASI Global is one of the big American companies in the K&R business and perhaps this just comes with the job but Daniel Johnson is capable of a kind of understatement that's sort of breathtaking. For instance, he was telling me how K&R insurance works. By bump in the night, Dan means what you or I might call a violent, life-threatening, life-changing abduction. See. Understatement. Another interesting fact about kidnapping insurance with this company, one condition of having the policy is that you don't tell anybody you have the policy. It's like the first rule of Fight Club. In the Mideast he says, don't do this or talk about religion, but in Mexico where there are lots of kidnappings these days-- The other advantage of a bible, Dan says, is that you might be captive for a long time. And one of the big problems in that situation is it's really, really boring. People get depressed. They stop taking care of themselves. Some of them think about suicide. So it's important to keep your mind active, to create a routine of things that you do every day, not to sleep all day, which lots of people end up doing. And if you have a bible, you can read, which is huge. Other tips, eat what they give you because it's probably the same food that they're eating. Drink the water. Don't try to escape. Don't look your captors in the eye. That's hard to do, he says. Your instinct is that you want to trade away everything just to get your life back. You'll do anything. But you have to understand, if it's a kidnapping for ransom, and one sign of that is that you're still alive, that's like a business deal, and they need you alive to make their money. And usually, Dan says, you're going to get out. It's just a matter of coming to a price. You have to remember that. And you have to remember that your role in that business deal is to be the hostage, to do what you need to do to survive, to avoid panic. Act One: Captive Audience. Here's a sign that things aren't going so well in your country. There's so much kidnapping going on that a radio station, your country's biggest radio station, has a show that is specifically for an audience of kidnapping victims. And it's not the only show like this. There are several others on smaller stations. Annie Correal is originally from Bogota, Colombia and visited that program. Annie Correal is a reporter for the newspaper El Diario. She originally produced this as a longer story with Jay Allison for the really wonderful public radio website that's devoted to teaching newcomers how to make their own radio stories, transom.org. Annie's dad was rescued, which is rare, by the Colombian military along with five other hostages in August 2000. Coming up, taken hostage by somebody whose only weapon is paperwork. That's in a minute from WBEZ Chicago and Public Radio International when our program continues. This is American Life. I'm Ira Glass. Each week on our show, of course, we choose the theme and bring you different kinds of stories on that theme. Today's show, "Held Hostage." In this second half of our program, we move to people who get held hostage without a gun or a knife or any kind of traditional captor, and then they have to figure out what to do. We have arrived at act two of our show. Act Two, Misdeeds. Wayne Curtis is a contributing editor of the Atlantic Magazine. He lives in New Orleans. Act Three, I've Fallen in Love and I Can't Get Up. Sometimes you're a hostage inside your own body. Chris Higgins has this example. Chris Higgins lives in Portland, Oregon. Well, our program was produced today by Lisa Pollak and Ben Calhoun with Alex Blumberg, Jane Feltes, Sarah Koenig, Robyn Semien, Alissa Shipp, and Nancy Updike. Our senior producer is Julie Snyder. Production help from Brian Reed. Seth Lind is our production manager. Emily Condon is our office manager. Music help from Jessica Hopper. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. Everywhere lately, the news seems like it's the same. You go to Germany. Or England-- Here's the Prime Minister explaining that massive cuts in government are essential. In California, Republican State Senator Bob Dutton-- California is not alone, of course. Forty-eight of the 50 states have budget shortfalls. And, of course, there's Greece, whose collapse is threatening the stability of the entire European Union. Everywhere, governments are cutting back. But watching this process, it's hard not to wonder if our politics are simply incapable of handling this in a thoughtful way, if our politics are just too crude for the problems that we face. In so many places, you see posturing along very familiar lines, for example, people digging in their heels against all taxes. And other people digging in their heels against any cutbacks in certain kinds of services. And it drags on for months, and we stay in crisis. Act One, Mister Fix It. What New York does have going for it is that it brought in somebody to help solve the crisis. The guy they brought in is exactly the sort of person you would hope for, nonpartisan, liked by everybody, and experienced. He stepped in and solved this kind of financial crisis, not once, not twice, but three other times in New York. Though he says he's found that this time it's different, that all of us, not just in New York but everywhere, are in uncharted territory. That we don't even understand the trouble that we're in. It would pale against what happened next. Eliot Spitzer came in as governor, and began berating legislators, even allegedly sicced a state trooper on the senate majority leader, a somewhat of a Troopergate scandal. All prologue to March 10, 2008, which was, coincidentally, Erin Billups' first day as a political reporter for New York One TV. Kyle Hughes is a 20-year vet covering the Capitol, now for NYSNYS.com. A prime example, Paterson told The Daily News that he would sometimes take his wife to the same hotel that he had gone to have affairs, the Days Inn in Harlem, on the advice of a counselor who told them to spice things up in their marriage. Right, a coup. Here's how that went down. The Democrats had just won the State Senate for the first time in four decades, but they only had a two vote majority. There were 32 Democrats, 30 Republicans. Until, in June 2009, two Democrats made a deal where they switched sides. They became Republicans in exchange for top Republican positions with a lot of power, which suddenly gave the Republicans control of the Senate. Now, they were the ones with a 32-30 majority. And their first order of business? Voting out the Democratic head of the Senate, and replacing him with one of their own. A week later, one of the defecting senators, Hiram Monserrate, decided to switch back to the Democratic Party. The Senate later kicked Monserrate out of office, by the way, after he was convicted of assaulting his girlfriend. But at the time, Monserrate's switch back to the Democrats left the Senate split down the middle, 31 Republicans, 31 Democrats. And since you need 32 votes to pass legislation, New York's legislature essentially shut down. If there'd been lieutenant governor, that would have solved the problem, because in New York, the lieutenant governor can cast a vote to break a tie in the Senate. But there was no lieutenant governor. The former lieutenant governor, David Paterson, had become the governor. Ravitch is a big-bellied, ready, man, the kind of old school New Yorker who is still enjoying bacon with his breakfast and cocktails at dinner. His charm comes from his utterly straightforward frankness. Three different times when I asked people who know him to describe him, there's a moment before they speak where they pause and smile fondly at the very thought of him. Ravitch was first drafted into saving New York government, back in the 1970s, by a phone call from a different governor, Hugh Carey, a man he'd never met and didn't know, to solve a crisis involving low income housing. Ravitch, at the time, was just a civic-minded guy in the construction business. He'd help to integrate the construction unions in New York. And he made it his personal mission to build low income housing. He knew all about public financing. On October 16, 1975, the teachers union declared that it would not purchase $150 million in special government bonds that were being sold to raise money for the city. With the city so close to insolvency, it just seemed too risky. Ravitch knew that without this 150 million, it would be the end of the line, and throw the city into bankruptcy the next day. He couldn't stop thinking about it, and went to bed early, depressed. Shanker was Albert Shanker, head of the teachers union, an old friend of Ravitch's. Finally, hours later, Shanker calls. He wants a private meeting away from the press. So Ravitch, and the governor, and some others meet Shanker at Ravitch's apartment. The beds aren't made. There's barely anything to eat. Ravitch puts out some matzah. And finally, they convince Shanker that really his back is against the wall, all of theirs is. And yes, the bonds are risky. But if New York defaults, all the city contracts would become invalid including the teachers union contract, which of course, would be awful for Shanker and his union. Shanker, reluctantly, buys the bonds and New York City is saved. Ravitch has turned himself into an expert on the current state budget at the request of the governor who asked Ravitch to use his expertise to shape a long term solution for New York's fiscal crisis. One of Ravitch's closest advisors in this project is the governor's budget director, Bob Megna. When I visit Megna, more than month into the fiscal year with no budget yet passed, I see a grocery bag full of bright, green, rubber balls, stress balls, sent by the National Association of State Budget Officers. Not one, but two, state employees went out of the way to make sure that I understood that the state did not spend money on these balls. They were free. Megna pulls out this chart with two lines going across it. One line shows all the income that the state brings in. As you can imagine, that one's not looking so great. All states, with this recession, bring in less in taxes than they used to. That's a big part of the crisis. That line rises anemically at the rate of 3.5% increase per year. Now there's a much steeper line, twice as steep as the revenue line, showing the growth of spending by the state. Megna remembers the moment that Ravitch fully grasped the implications of this particular chart. This is one of the most alarming things that Ravitch found, and it bears some explaining. During the previous decade of prosperity, the state had committed itself to spending certain amounts of money on education, and state police, and healthcare, and all the other things that a state pays for. But it made those commitments without actually having enough revenue to pay for all of it. And so every year, there was a shortfall, a gap, and every year, the state had to figure out ways to plug that hole. And rather than come up with steady revenue sources, the state would invent all kinds of shenanigans to do it, what they call, one-shots. Like when Blue Cross Blue Shield went private, a billion dollars went to the state, or they borrowed against the winnings from a tobacco lawsuit, or they sold state property. The most famous example of that is when New York sold Attica prison to a private company for some quick cash, and then had to pay that company rent each year to keep using the prison. This past year, the one-shot that saved New York State and many other states was something that you may not have realized was being used this way, the stimulus money passed by the Obama administration. It allocated billions to go into the hands of state governments specifically to plug the gaping holes in their budgets. In New York, it was 5 billion last year, 4 billion this year. Again, the governor's budget director, Bob Megna. Which means that New York needs a plan. Without it, the Jaws Chart shows that New York's deficit will grow from 9 billion this year, to 13 billion next year, to 60 billion in the next five years with no end in sight. And, the longer New York waits to fix the problem, the deeper the cuts in government services will have to be. In March, at a press conference in Albany, Ravitch presented his plan to resolve, long term, the state's fiscal crisis. Ravitch's proposal copies a few things from the successful scheme that fixed New York City's finances back in the '70s, like it would force the state to use what are called, Generally Accepted Accounting Principles. Yes, it sounds crazy, but many cities and states, including Florida, Texas, Ohio, and New York, don't use those accounting rules that require you to have real revenue sources to cover your debts. Switching to Generally Accepted Accounting Principles would make it much harder to do the one-shots and the one time gimmicks that have been used in the past to fix the budget in New York. Ravitch made it clear that this borrowing was only acceptable if it was part of his bigger plan to control the budget in the future, and if it came with harsh penalties attached if the overall budget went out of balance. In the chaos of New York State politics, there was this sense, when Ravitch laid out this plan, that finally an adult had arrived in the room to restore some sanity-- at last, a nonpartisan approach, the only real solution on the table, tough medicine. This is State Senator Tom Libous, a Republican. Like other lawmakers that I interviewed in Albany, he fixated on the borrowing in Ravitch's plan, and said it made it unacceptable. Here's Republican Assemblyman Jim Hayes, and Republican Minority Leader Brian Kolb. Keep in mind that this is the same legislature that has balanced its budgets for years using borrowing under Democrats and Republicans. And I actually heard the same from the Democrats. Here are two of the most reform minded legislators in Albany, Assemblywoman Sandy Galef and State Senator Liz Kreuger. Borrowing became the shorthand the politicians could use to dismiss the Ravitch plan, even though he wasn't advocating borrowing. He was just saying, if you have to, here's the one way it would be acceptable. Editorial writers condemned the borrowing. Newspapers basically reduced the plan to its borrowing. And this year, when the press corps in the State Capitol did their annual musical review, a tradition that goes back over a hundred years with reporters playing the various state politicians on stage, the reporter playing Dick Ravitch, a Capitol vet named J. Gallagher, sang this number, which tells you a lot about the reputation that Ravitch was getting. Then, it gets even more rich. While the State Senate opposed any borrowing, the other house of the legislature, the State Assembly, decided to adopt the $2 billion borrowing that Ravitch said would be acceptable, but without the stringent controls that he said had to be tied to the borrowing. The governor, meanwhile, who put Ravitch up to the task of fiscal reform, had his own priorities. His priority was trying to pass a budget which had no borrowing in it at all. And he just had a few weeks to do that. When I interviewed Governor David Paterson, he was surprisingly sympathetic to the plan for somebody who had exiled it to limbo, even when it came to the borrowing. He said that he understood that Ravitch was just setting a ceiling if there had to be borrowing. Over the last few weeks, I've spent a lot of time trying to understand the politics of all this, why the legislators wouldn't embrace Ravitch's plan to show voters they were getting things under control. And I heard all kinds of explanations, on the record and off the record. Though some Republicans actually like the Ravitch plan and the fiscal order it imposes, it's just taken as a given that Republicans will vote as a group against any plan that comes from the Democrats. That's been the pattern lately, like in Washington. So if they don't want the Ravitch plan, what are these legislators thinking should be done to get the state budget under control? Well, to understand a little about that I turned to State Senator Ruben Diaz. This week, Diaz nearly brought state government to a close by refusing to vote for the weekly emergency funding that's been keeping the state going for two months in the absence of a real budget. Diaz voted no because the governor had inserted into the emergency bill deep cuts in the overall state budget, cuts that Diaz opposes. One of these, he explained, would streamline the way that taxes are delivered to the state from credit card purchases. The other would let the state buy pharmaceuticals from Canada. Total savings, he says, $2 billion. He also wants to tax cigarettes sold on Indian reservations, something that's led to armed conflict and bloodshed when the states tried to impose it in the past. That would save another billion or two. Ravitch is an old school liberal. He not only idolized Franklin Roosevelt, he sits on the board of the Roosevelt Library, and owns an old WPA painting with scenes of The New Deal in action. His first political appointment was in 1966 by LBJ to a commission on urban problems. But he says we're in the worst economic contraction since Roosevelt's day. And we're not bouncing back any time soon. And so Ravitch has been going around telling people in private conversations, in public speeches that he's been rethinking, and he thinks we all need to rethink, what government can do. Here he is at a group called The Association for a Better New York. So Ravitch says that we need to have a conversation about what it is that we can afford. When I ask what this means, he throws out all kinds of ideas. One in four New Yorkers, he says, qualifies for Medicaid. Maybe those rules are too lenient. Maybe dozens of small school districts in the state should be consolidated to eliminate administration costs. And then there are taxes. Ravitch says we have to be careful, because higher taxes have driven people out of the state in the last decade. But he says there are some taxes that we should discuss. Paterson says the worst has been when he's had to cut programs that he personally supported back when he was a legislator from Harlem. Getting out of that quagmire, it's hard to stand on principles. Just last week, there was news out of Albany that to balance the budget, the governor and the legislative leaders, who'd spent the last few months adamantly opposed to any and all borrowing and had rejected Ravitch's plan mainly on that basis, figured out a way to patch another few billion into the budget by borrowing against state pension funds. Though officially, they don't call it borrowing. Ravitch was not surprised. Alex Blumberg is part of Planet Money that we co-produce with NPR News. Their blog and twice weekly podcasts, where they explain the world's economy entertainingly and in normal language anybody can understand, is at www.npr.org/money. [MUSIC - "ISLAND IN THE SUN" BY THE MERRYMEN] I'm Ira Glass, back next week, hopefully over this cold, with more stories of This American Life. So he had the surgery and then he went to the audiologist to configure the device and what they do is that they hook up the implant to a machine. We can only make an educated guess what this really sounds like. As best as we understand it from people who could once hear and then later in life got the implants, there's a mechanical edge to the sound that you hear with these devices. Musical notes have to be nearly half an octave apart before you can tell the difference between the notes. Voices, people say that they sound like a robot Daffy Duck. But for Scott, his brain had never developed the neural pathways to process audio. There were two big problems that went beyond all of that. If a dog barked or a horn honked, he couldn't tell what the sounds were or what caused them. A doctor who does these implants told me about a very young patient of his, a child who got the implant and then would just flush the toilet over and over, kind of amazed to connect the sound that it made with the action of the thing that they were seeing. For somebody like Scott getting the implant as his age, his brain can never catch up and learn to process sound. After five years with the implant, it was still hard for him to focus if an air conditioner was on in the room. And as for recognizing words, if he was in a quiet room and his speech therapist would say a word to him, he could actually pick out the word from a list of words that were sitting in front of him, and that's about as good as it got. So at the end of high school, he stopped using the implant. He doesn't miss it. The only time he really liked it he says was that very first day when he had his first contact with sound. Well today on our show, First Contact, we have three stories of people in that frightening, thrilling, first moment of encounter, that leap into the unknown. Mike Birbiglia talks about an achievement that was literally years in the making for him. We have somebody also chatting his way into the lives of people very far away in the middle of a war, we have scientists pondering exactly what we should say the very first time we find extraterrestrials to talk to, and what boneheaded things people want to say to them. From WBEZ Chicago it's This American Life distributed by Public Radio International. I'm Ira Glass, still with a little cold this week, but feeling just fine. Stay with us. OK, I don't know why this came to mind, out the blue actually. Three weeks ago I was walking down the street, it was nighttime, I was with the dog, and I thought of this. And literally loud I said out loud, "Oh god. Oh God, no, no, no." Here's what I remembered. Mike Birbiglia, performing a story from his new one-man show and his new book that is coming out this fall. The book is Sleepwalk with Me and Other Painfully True Stories. This American Life, I'm Ira Glass. Each week on our show of course, we choose a theme, bring you different kinds of stories on that theme. Today's show, First Contact, stories about people reaching outside what they know, outside their comfort zone, making contact with something they have only heard about. We've arrived at act 2 of our show. Act two: brothers from another planet. Sara Blaisdell lives in Virginia. This is Professor Paul Davies, author of a book about all this, The Eerie Silence and chair of this task force. Send that stuff later, Davies says, once they're getting to know us. First message, be simple and comprehensible. Numbers. Sent in binary code, zero's and one's. But apparently not everybody on our planet has gotten this memo. This was on a social networking site called Bebo a little while back. There's a planet 20 light years away that this website says, theoretically could hold life. Maybe. Well, we got a hold of some of these messages from Bebo users that were actually sent by a radio telescope to this distant alien civilization that they hope anyway, is there. Presumably, super advanced if the can hear and understand us. One of the messages here, "I don't believe in aliens. But I suppose if you're getting this now, I was epically wrong. P.S. We invented the George Foreman grill, therefore we're better than you." Again, Professor Paul Davies. Also, he says, the aliens won't understand a word of it in all likelihood. He also takes a dim view of the space probes that NASA has sent out with messages for other civilizations. The Voyager spacecraft had an actual phonograph record with sounds from Earth. We've sent the Beatles song "Across the Universe " into space. The Pioneer spacecraft had a plague on it with drawings of a naked man and woman. The man's hand raised in greeting. For now though, since it seems that anybody can borrow one of these radio telescopes to beam out a message, what we're sending into space includes stuff like this from that Bebo project. "We have pointless sports such as golf. You hit a ball with a stick and aim for a hole. Also a game for the rich. Now we have fun games like rugby. We hurt each other for a ball to gain points. Football is a boring game to some and not to other, but if you think of it, all sports are pointless. Just something to keep us happy." [MUSIC- "FEELS LIKE THE FIRST TIME" BY FOREIGNER] ACT 4: I'm Ira Glass, be back next week with more stories of this American life. Hanco runs a shop that sells Vietnamese sandwiches and bubble tea on a corner in Brooklyn. It's a neighborhood favorite, lots of tables, and sunlight streaming in through big windows, crowded most of the day. Not long ago, a customer brought in a menu from a shop that opened up just four blocks away to show to Hanco. Or, go to the list of bubble teas. Here's Hanco's menu. And the competitive, Henry's. Of the 42 sandwiches, salads, appetizers and drinks on Hanco's menu, all 42 are on Henry's in the exact same order, laid out in the same places on the menu posted $0.25 to $0.50 cheaper. And when you hold the two menu side by side, it's the same font, same colors, maroon letters on white. Each one says in cursive, "free delivery on the upper right". The two menus look like copies except for the name on top. The three people who owned this new place have all worked for Hanco at some point or another. There was Henry, there was Henry's mom, and there was Hui. Hanco says in retrospect, they were always asking, "how do you make this? What's the recipe for that?" And at the time he thought they were just trying to be helpful, until they opened up their own place and he put it all together. It has hurt Hanco's business. Sales are down 10% to 15% he said. Meanwhile up the street at Henry's, things are going so badly them Henry and his mom left after just a few months. Now Hui ran the place alone. The guy behind the counter got a funny look on his face. Yes, Ling told me he had worked at this place since the very beginning, seven months before. But no, he had no idea who this Hui was. He had never heard that name. When I asked him if they knew anything about how they came up with a menu, if they stole from Hanco's, Ling would say things that seemed to indicate that he had no problem copying the menu. And then in the very next, he would say. And, in fact, the new menu was glossy, and multi-colored, and didn't look like Hanco's menu at all. Though, of course, it still contained most of the items from Hanco's menu. "Stop talking about the past," Ling kept saying. "We don't know about the old menu and how it was made, we only know about no." So we had back four blocks in the other direction to Henry's store. And without the tape recorder on, I explained to Ling that I know he's actually Hui . And I told him that I'm not trying to embarrass him. But please could he just explain to me why he and Henry decided to knock off Hanco's menu so thoroughly and completely. He tells me, basically, that it was Henry's idea. Henry, when I check with him, says that it was actually Hui's idea. But neither of them could actually understand what the big deal was with copying a menu. Act One, Going Up? There's a whole world of engineers and investors who are actively trying to invent million dollar ideas. And in that world, there's something called an elevator pitch, which is pretty much exactly what you would guess it is. It's the pitch that you would make for your product, for your idea, if you bumped into a rich investor on an elevator. Figure you have 60 seconds, what's the vital stuff that will convince them. What are the details that you leave out? The basics of a good elevator pitch, he says, are straightforward, talk in a way your grandparents could understand, don't expect the listener is an expert or knows scientific jargon. That's apparently a challenge for lots of engineers. You also have to explain how you and your team are qualified to actually accomplish the thing you're setting out to do. You have to prove you're an expert in field, if you've got Nobel Laureates working with you, it would be a good time to mention it. And finally, engage the listeners emotions. Grab them from the start. And then here he gets to the point where he has the qualifications of the people that they're a team who can actually pull this off. Tim Rowe, venture capitalist at the Cambridge Innovation Center.  This American Life, I'm Ira Glass. Each week on our show, of course, we choose a theme, bring you different kinds of stories on that team. Today's show, million dollar idea, stories of great ones, and less successful ones. We have arrived it act three of our show, Act Three, Get Rich or Die Trying. Chana Joffe-Walt has the story of our next million dollar idea, a very, very ambitious idea. NPR's Chana Joffe-Walt is part of the Planet Money team. Planet Money is a co-production of NPR News and our radio show. They bring you economic stories that are not boring on their blog and their free twice-weekly podcast at npr.org/money. That's [UNINTELLIGIBLE]. Don't hate the player. Somehow we've gotten this far into the show without anybody trying to make a fortune with an old fashioned scam, or out betting the casino, or beating the odds in some impossible way. Well let's correct that right this second with the story from Shawn Allee. What producers that day didn't know, is that Michael Larson had come on to Press Your Luck with a plan, a kind of far-fetched plan, a take 'em to the cleaners, a plan that was months in the making, a plan to get rich in half an hour. All his life, Michael was always running some little scam or another. Now Michael died in 1999. So you're not going to hear about any this from him. But I talked to his brother, James. Michael was the youngest of four boys. James was the oldest. James says even in middle school, Michael got caught smuggling candy bars into class and jacking the prices way above retail. Michael's schemes ran the gamut. He started a business under a family member's name and then hired himself as an employee. Then he laid himself off to collect unemployment benefits. He'd watch for banks that would give you $500 for opening an account. He'd open one and wait the minimum time to collect the $500. Then he'd withdraw the money and do it again under a different name. This is Michael's former common law wife, Teresa Bertram . Teresa says she had a tough time explaining this TV business to visitors. Usually she'd just tell people Michael was straight up crazy. But Teresa says he was actually methodical with his TV viewing. He'd tune each TV to a different channel. The idea was to watch for anything that would make him rich. He's also watch TV ads, infomercials, and of course, game shows. Michael was convinced that someone smart could find loopholes in game shows that average people missed. So he'd videotape them all day and play them back in the evening. Teresa says sometimes he'd stay up all night fast-forwarding, rewinding, pausing, and re-watching, especially Press Your Luck. To understand what Michael was so excited about, you have to understand how Press Your Luck worked. If you don't know the show or remember it, maybe you've heard its catch phrase, big bucks, big bucks, no whammies. Michael spent months learning to push his VCR pause button at just the right moment, always on a prize, never on a whammy. Again, here's his brother, James. Which brings us back to the show. Michael took his seat on Press Your Luck on May 19, 1984. Watching the tape, his grey hair is slicked back receding a bit. His beard is halfway to grey. He looks nervous. Darlene Lieblich Tipton was in the control room with the director and producers. Her job was to monitor the game and make sure everything was fair and square. Darlene says at first, Michael Larson didn't look like much. Right here, after getting a whammy on his first spin, Michael shakes. his head, grits his teeth, and forces a smile. He looks unsure of himself. On his next turn, he concentrates before hitting the red button, and lands on $4,000 dollars and extra turn. Sure he smiles. But more than anything, he looks relieved. Michael's streak had gone so long that he busted the show's half hour format. The host did an impromptu interview to add time so the episode could be stretched into an hour-long special. (SUBJECT) GAME SHOW HOST: What are you going to do with the money, Michael? By the end of the show, Michael Larson had won a total of $110,237. Michael had shattered records that day, and not just for Press Your Luck, but for any American game show. He'd won more than anyone ever had in a single episode. Again, Michael's brother, James. Again, Teresa, Michael's former wife. They also stacked hundreds of dollar bills on TVs, VCRs, the stairs, and just about everywhere else. After they had the 100 grand, they closed the shades and they hunkered down. Day after day Michael and Teresa sorted the money into grocery bags and piles. They weren't finding the numbers the match the ones announced on the radio. So Michael put half the cash back in the bank. That left 50,000 $1 bills sitting in trash bags, hanging out of drawers, and falling out of closets. They were exhausted. So one night they took a break. To this day, this robbery has never been solved. But at the time, Michael was convinced Teresa had something to do with it. The police questioned Teresa several times. They turned up nothing and gave up. Michael didn't. After this point, Teresa and James say their picture of what Michael was up to is sketchy. Here's what we do know. Michael moved back to his little hometown outside Dayton, Ohio and he found a new girlfriend. In 1999, nine years after Michael's big win, Michael and this girlfriend suddenly fled Ohio. But Michael's brother, James, still has mixed feelings about Michael's performance on Press Your Luck more than 25 years later. I ask him, if there was some way for him to go back and change what happen, maybe rig the game so Michael would have lost on Press Your Luck, would he do it? James says no. He's glad Michael won. He just wishes his brother had been a different person, the kind of person who could just be happy with what he's got. Shawn Allee in Chicago. Our program today was produced by Robyn Semien and me with Alex Blumberg, Ben Calhoun, Jane Feltes, Sarah Koenig, Jonathan Menjivar, Lisa Pollak, Alissa Shipp, and Nancy Updike. Our senior producer is Julie Snyder. Seth Lind our production manager, Emily Condon our office manager, music help from Jessica Hopper, production help from Brian Reed and Shawn Wen. Mina Hochberg helped produce our story about Vietnamese sandwich shops in Brooklyn. I'm Ira Glass, back next week with more stories of This American Life. Back in the 1970s, the Atlanta Journal Newspaper several times a week for years published this column called the Georgia Rambler. Charles Salter wrote the column. Basically he would get up in the morning, say goodbye to his wife, Sally, get in his car, and head out on the road to some small town, sometimes without much of a plan at all, not even sure where he's going to end up. There was the 55-year-old man who never wore shoes, and the pharmacist who discovered in an old ledger there seemed to be a recipe for Coca-Cola. And the country father of five who told the Georgia Rambler that when he goes to the sales barn to buy a small calf, "I call it buying me a lawn mower. When the grass dies down thanks to the calf, I kill my lawnmower and eat it". OK, full disclosure, Charles' son Chuck is married one of the producers of our radio show, Lisa Pollak, which is how we heard about the Georgia Rambler. And when all of us here at our radio show-- you're listening to This American Life by the way from WBEZ Chicago disturbed by Public Radio international-- when all of us heard about the Georgia Rambler, and this idea that you would get out of the city and just drive into some small town at random, walk around, and talk to people until you find a story, and get all these people from these towns with just a couple hundred a couple thousand people all over Georgia talking about life where they live, it just seemed like a really fun thing to try. And we'll just kick things off here. We'll start things off with Dave Kestenbaum, who's usually a correspondent for NPR's Planet Money, who we took off the economics beat and sent to Georgia to look for some story or person that is unforgettable. Eugene Mirman. Not far from Hall County is Pickens County. On April 9, 2006, a soldier from Pickens County serving in Iraq was killed by an IED. Specialist David Collins was 24. His body was flown to Atlanta in a convoy of patrol cars drove from Pickens County down to the Atlanta Airport about an hour and half way to meet the body and escort it back home to be buried. Allen Wiggington, he's now a Magistrate Judge in Pickens County. According to the Department of Defense, as of this week, 140 Georgians have died in Iraq, 38 in Afghanistan. The next up is Jane Feltes. Jane is also the producer of today's show. Well next up, a county right in the middle of the state. And Sarah Koenig, you are the one who went there. Well we started our program today with Charles Salter, the newspaper reporter who was the original Georgia Rambler back in the 1970s. And we end our show with Charles Salter, his son, who everybody calls Chuck. For today's show, he went to Elbert County on the coast. But he also looked back at a huge stack of his dad's old stories. Our program was produce today by Jane Feltes and me with Alex Blumberg, Ben Calhoun, Sarah Koenig, Johnathon Menjivar, Lisa Pollak, Robyn Semien, Alissa Shipp, Nancy Updike, senior producer Julie Snyder, Seth Lind is our production manager Emily Condon is our office manager, production help from Sean Wenn. I'm Ira Glass, back next week with more stories on This American Life.  From WBEZ Chicago, it's This American Life distributed by Public Radio International. I'm Ira Glass. And in our show today, we have two stories that have a lot in common, but to explain the many things they have in common right here and now would reveal so many spoilers that I'm going to say very little. Rather than do the kind of introduction I usually do right here, all I'm going to say is that each of these stories centers around some guy, and the guy in each story has the right to remain silent, and he does not exercise that right. Like they say in the movies, he could take the easy way, or he could take the hard way. And each of these guys goes way out of his way to take the hard way, not totally realizing what he's getting into. And let's just get right to it.  Act One. First Rule of the Apple Store: Don't Talk About the Apple Store. At some point or another, you've probably known somebody like this, somebody who can't resist the urge to talk back. Not out of principle, but out of sheer chemical instinct. It's built into his personality. That's the guy in this first story. Ben Calhoun's the reporter.  Ben Calhoun is one of the producers of our show. Coming up, another guy who's got no problem standing up to the police though in his case it's because he is the police. That's in a minute. From Chicago Public Radio and Public Radio International when our program continues.  It's This American Life. I'm Ira Glass. Our show today-- Right to Remain Silent. We have two stories of people who very much do not choose to remain silent. We've arrived at act two of our show. Act Two. Is That a Tape Recorder in Your Pocket, or Are You Just Unhappy to See Me? Adrian Schoolcraft is a New York City policeman who decided to secretly record himself and his fellow officers on the job-- all day, every workday, he says for 17 months. Including lots of days when he was ordered to do all kinds of things cops are not supposed to do. It's led to a small scandal, Several people removed from their jobs, and four investigations of the New York Police Department. Though Adrian insists he didn't get into this looking for trouble.  This is the reporter who broke the story in The Village Voice about Adrian and what he recorded those 17 months, a reporter named Graham Rayman. When I asked Graham what Adrian, the person at the center of this scandal, is like, the first thing out of his mouth is--  Adrian Schoolcraft was working in Brooklyn-- precinct 81, in Bedford-Stuyvesant, a rough neighborhood, mostly black, that was slowly gentrifying. The precinct is just seven blocks wide and 20 blocks long, roughly, and had 13 murders last year, which is a third of what it used to be. Adrian's kind of an electronics buff, and he bought himself one of those tiny digital recorders, tucked it in his breast pocket, and started recording-- as he walked his beat, when he talked to other cops--  --morning roll calls.  This is Adrian.  The atmosphere at the 81st precinct was set by its commander, Stephen Mauriello. When Mauriello showed up, Adrian Schoolcraft says, things changed. Offices were told to write more tickets, do more stop-and-frisks, arrest more people for low level offenses that they might otherwise let go-- get their numbers up.  Now, it's perfectly legal for police to be told-- like anybody in any job-- here's the amount of work that we expect you to do, number of tickets and arrests that are normal for somebody in your job in this neighborhood. But what's not allowed is to penalize police officers who do not make those targets. We don't want police officers under such pressure to deliver numbers that they make stops and arrests and write summons with no valid reason, just to get their goals. Again, reporter Graham Rayman.  On November 1, 2008, one sergeant declares at a roll call, quote "they are looking at these numbers and people are going to be moved. They can make your job real uncomfortable, and we all know what that means." On December 8, 2008, the sergeant tells the officers that if they don't get their activity up, quote, "there's some people here that may not be here come next month."  Because officially the NYPD doesn't allow numeric quotas to be tied to job performance, you hear the supervisors in the recording sometimes get into real verbal contortions to get the point across. Like in this excerpt from a roll call the first month that Schoolcraft was recording, June 2008.  Adrian Schoolcraft says he isn't exactly sure when, but at some point he had decided that it was important to document the orders that he was given that he thought were out of line. He recorded roll calls where officers were constantly being told to do more stop-and-frisks, even though it's illegal to stop a random person on the street and frisk them without reasonable suspicion. In December 2008, a sergeant tells officers to stop-and-frisk quote, "anybody walking around, no matter what the explanation is." He recorded Stephen Mauriello, the commander the 81st precinct-- and the person Adrian Schoolcraft says really brought the hammer down for higher numbers-- ordering the officers to arrest everyone they see. This happens in a couple of recordings, like this one from Halloween 2008.  Again, Graham Rayman. He says the problem with that is--  That's John Eterno, a former New York City cop, who went up the ranks from officer to sergeant, to lieutenant, to captain. He now chairs the Department of Criminal Justice at Molloy College and researches and writes about police practices with Professor Eli Silverman. And he says that some of the things that Adrian Schoolcraft documented on his recordings were no surprise to anybody-- like sergeants hounding officers to get their numbers up. That's been happening in every precinct for a long time, he says. But for commanders to tell cops, just lock people up and figure it out later-- Eterno says the word for that is kidnapping.  Andre Wade has lived in the neighborhood for over twenty years. He's a commercial driver. One day, he and two friends were picking up his brother to go to work together. They were standing on the sidewalk, and a police officer came over, and said they were trespassing. When his brother came down and confirmed, no, no they were there to pick them up, Andre says the officer wouldn't listen.  The citation that the police gave Wade lists his name, the day that he's supposed to appear in court, but in the spot where it's supposed to specify his crime--  One of the producers of our radio show lives in the 81st precinct. And she says that it's one of those neighborhoods where everybody has stories of ridiculous tickets. One of her neighbors was bringing his aunt home from the hospital, and he double parked. Two officers told him to move his car, and when he didn't, he was handcuffed, forced to lie down in the street, and tasered twice-- all in front of a crowd of people, including her, who live on the block and heard him calling for help. One common citation is for having an open container of alcohol. One neighbor says he was walking home from church with his six year old daughter, drinking a small carton of Tropicana orange juice, and he got a ticket for that. Others got tickets for water and Gatorade that was being given away at the park. George Walker has lived on the same block for over 40 years and says older guys like him get a lot of tickets. He thinks maybe they're targeted because they don't give the cops any fuss. He says he's gotten a dozen tickets this past year, nearly all for open container, even though he says he wasn't drinking alcohol.  But we still haven't gotten to the most disturbing thing documented by Adrian Schoolcraft and his recordings. Schoolcraft shows, over and over, that sometimes when real crimes would happen, serious crimes, the 81st precinct would reclassify them as lesser crimes-- or simply not put them in the system at all-- to make it look like the precinct was doing a better job driving down crime rates than it really was. Again reporter Graham Rayman.  In the end, this cop tells Adrian, their supervisor, Stephen Mauriello, told him to file the case as an unauthorized driver.  Then when the officer tried to file it that way, because he didn't have a name for the unauthorized driver, he couldn't file it at all. So the robbery went unreported. Rules go into effect in the 81st precinct that make it harder to report serious crimes. Officers are told that if there's a robbery, one of their supervisors has to come out to the scene themselves. And robbery victims are told that if they don't come into the police station, no crime report will be filed at all. After Graham Rayman started publishing these stories about Adrian Schoolcraft, retired cops and some on-duty cops started contacting him with their own anecdotes about crimes being downgraded from serious to much less serious-- the most shocking of these from a high ranking detective name Harold Hernandez.  Normally, Graham says, that a case like this-- serial rapist-- they'd try to get some press. But the misclassifications of the crimes would have made the NYPD look bad. No one was ever disciplined for what happened, for downgrading. The precinct commander was promoted twice by Commissioner Kelly.  The New York Police Department declined our request to come onto the radio or to have the officers who supervised Adrian Schoolcraft, and who are heard on his recordings, to be interviewed about their side of all this. But the pressure on police commanders to get better numbers really goes back to 1994, when New York started tracking crimes with a system called CompStat. CompStat, for the first time, gave commanders timely, accurate data once a week on what crimes are happening, so they could send more cops to deal with it. Chances are you've heard of all this. It became one of the best known successes in modern policing. Serious crime has dropped an astonishing 77% in New York City since CompStat began in 1994. Other cities very quickly started imitating it-- DC, Philly, LA. Baltimore's version of CompStat ended up in a recurring plot line on the TV show The Wire, where street cops are told by the bosses to do anything to pump up their numbers. And the problem with CompStat, says Professor Eli Silverman, who studies the way police forces use numbers, is that the early success of CompStat created the expectation that numbers must get better every single year, no matter what.  As apparently the one person in the 81st precinct who was not obsessed by the numbers, Adrian Schoolcraft, by January 2009, had so displeased his bosses that they gave him a failing job evaluation that covered the entire year of 2008-- which meant one thing, Schoolcraft says.  He hired a lawyer and appealed the evaluation, but started feeling more pressure than ever to go out and do what his bosses wanted. He began to get stomach pains and tightness in his chest. He had trouble sleeping. Again, reporter Graham Rayman.  Schoolcraft began to feel that he was being retaliated against. He got written up for taking a bathroom break without putting it in his log. Another officer was written up for talking to him. When he went to the duty captain, he was told yes, he was being monitored.  If there's a bunch of kids on a stoop and you're walking past, the duty captain asks him, and then named some addresses where that might happen, you just go on your merry way, because you don't see anything going on? Schoolcraft tells him he wouldn't just create fake charges. That's a common practice here, he says. Captain asks him what he means, and says in 19 years, he's never seen anybody create charges. Then he asks Schoolcraft the question again.  Schoolcraft says that around this time, the recordings became about trying to keep his job. Somebody tells him that one of his bosses wants to force him out on psychiatric grounds.  Schoolcraft says he laid it all out for the doctor-- his bad performance evaluation, the numbers he was asked to hit, and also more personal disputes with his bosses about whether his evaluation was falsified, was the precinct doing training it claimed it was doing. And the police department doctor referred Schoolcraft to see a police department psychologist for an evaluation. And when Schoolcraft tells the psychologist the same things that he told the doctor, she asked him to turn in his gun and shield.  He doesn't tell them that he has recordings. In fact, as you can hear, he secretly records this three hour meeting with them. But he does give them documentation-- real evidence to back up his charges. And what happens next to Adrian Schoolcraft is very, very strange. Just a few weeks after his meetings with Internal Affairs and QAD, he shows up to work. It's the end of October.  How he left is in dispute. Schoolcraft says that he told a sergeant that he was feeling sick and went home an hour early. The police say the sergeant never said yes to this request. In any case, Schoolcraft went home and went to bed.  Adrian has no idea what they want, but he knows the situation is bad, so he starts recording.  That voice you just heard in Adrian's bedroom is a man of much higher rank than anybody in any of the recordings to this point. He's the number two commander for the NYPD for all of Brooklyn North, Michael Marino. Stephen Mauriello, the head of the 81st precinct, the commander that Adrian contends had been putting pressure on all the officers to deliver better numbers, is also there in the bedroom. He talks next.  Adrian knows the rules and he asks if he's under arrest. He's not under arrest. But the number two commander for Brooklyn North, Michael Marino, tells him he's giving him an order.  If this seems like an extreme response to you, reporter Graham Rayman confirms, it is.  An officer asks Adrian if he wants medical aid-- an EMT to come check him out. Adrian's blood pressure turns out to be sky high. They offer to take him to a hospital, but not his local hospital-- to one that he's never heard of. And he doesn't get what they're up to, and he refuses medical attention. Under the law, they should leave him alone. But for some reason, they will not take no for an answer.  Again, this is Deputy Chief Marino, from Brooklyn North.  During the struggle, as they cuff Adrian, the little recorder falls out of his pocket. Deputy Chief Marino spots it.  Now that Deputy Chief Marino has labeled Schoolcraft EDP, the police take Schoolcraft and commit him to a psychiatric ward, saying he was a danger to himself. Schoolcraft, who had spent months documenting his bosses telling cops to lock people up on contrived pretenses, now found himself locked up on contrived pretenses.  Schoolcraft's father, the last person Schoolcraft talked to, is unable to find him for days. The last he heard, his son was in an apartment surrounded by police, the next, he just vanished. His father says he called Internal Affairs, the FBI, the press. Finally he located him by calling around the hospitals all over Queens.  Again, reporter Graham Rayman.  At the time that he led the raid on Schoolcraft's apartment, Deputy Chief Michael Marino was already under a microscope. It was just a month after he had been put on trial inside the department after a sting named him as one of 27 cops who illegally bought human growth hormone, or steroids. Marino claimed that he used the human growth hormone for a medical condition. And back in 2006, an arbitrator found that Marino was in violation of New York labor laws for a very similar situation to the one that Schoolcraft was documenting. The arbitrator ruled that Marino had set up an illegal quota for police officers of four parking tickets, three moving violations, three quality of life summons, and two stop-and-frisk per month and then penalized the officers when they didn't make the quota.  Adrian Schoolcraft says that in the end, none of this worked out the way he thought it would during all those months of recording.  That's the question, of course. And there's really no way to know how typical the 81st precinct is. Reporter Graham Rayman has heard from retired cops who say the same things happened where they worked. And he's found a policeman who was secretly recording in the Bronx at the same time as Schoolcraft finding the same things. The guys who study the way CompStat is used by the police, John Eterno and Eli Silverman, say manipulating stats to get better numbers seems to happen in a lot of places where CompStat is used.  Having failed to reach any results working inside the department, Schoolcraft finally went to the press. And Graham's five-part series in The Village Voice has been, Adrian says, like a meteor hitting the 81st precinct. The police commissioner transferred Commander Stephen Mauriello, and some of the other senior-level supervisors, out of the precinct. Though he only did that after several weeks of pressure from politicians and clergy. There's now one police investigation into Schoolcraft's allegations, there's another investigation of Deputy Chief Marino's order to put Schoolcraft into a psych ward, another into the charge that serious crimes were downgraded to lesser ones, and a fourth that is just about the misclassification of crimes in Detective Hernandez's sexual assault case. Schoolcraft's recordings will be used in two class action lawsuits, one about stop-and-frisks, one about quotas. Schoolcraft himself is suing the department for $50 million. Two officers have come forward to back up his charges. A website, schoolcraftjustice.com has been set up looking for more. Schoolcraft himself is suspended without pay, living with his dad, 350 miles away, in upstate New York-- where, he says, a dozen times city police have shown up and pounded on his door, yelling, "NYPD, we know you're in there. Open up." [KNOCKING] Of course, he recorded it.  Schoolcraft assumes that he'll never again work as a police officer anywhere.  And finally, with the 81st precinct under new supervision, the numbers on serious crime have risen by 10-15%. Are the crimes going up, or that's closer to the true amount of crime that was already there, only now being recorded? [MUSIC - "OFFICER" BY THE PHARCYDE] Well, our program today was produced by me and Sarah Koenig, with Alex Blumberg, Ben Calhoun, Jane Feeltes, Jonathan Menjivar, Lisa Pollak, Robin Semien, and Alissa Shipp and Nancy Updike. Our senior producer is Julie Snyder. Seth Lind is our production manager. Emily Condon's our office manager. Music help from Jessica Hopper. Production help from Shawn Wen. [ACKNOWLEDGEMENTS] This American Life is distributed by Public Radio International. WBEZ management oversight of our program by our boss, Mr. Torey Malatia, who's got no problem with the end of Don't Ask, Don't Tell. Seriously.  I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. You may remember last fall President Obama decided to do something that lots of other presidents had done before. Him Give a short speech to the country's school kids at the start of the academic year. The head of the Republican Party in Florida, a man named Jim Grier, issued a statement saying that he was appalled that President Obama would be spreading his lies and socialist ideology to school children. Others chimed in. It kicked off a little fire storm in the media. When the President finally gave his speech, what was his socialist message for the nation's school children? Put down the video games, read books, come to class ready to work hard.  After the speech, the controversy pretty much vanished overnight, and for most of us, that's the last we heard of Jim Grier, the guy who led the complaining. During the last year, a lot has changed for Jim Grier.  He's no longer the Chairman of the Florida Republican Party. He's currently facing a half dozen felony counts for things like money laundering and theft. And two weeks ago, Grier did something kind of remarkable. With the school year starting again, all of a sudden he essentially came out of hiding to send a single message: a text message.  A couple of days ago, I sat down with one of the reporters who first wrote about the story, Dave Weigel, who's a political reporter for Slate.  That's especially true today, Weigel says. When manufactured outrage has become such a big part of our politics.  Both parties do this, but Weigel says it's a much bigger part of Republican political style right now. And frankly, the Republicans are just a lot better at it.  So the Democrats try to rouse the troops without rage of the Republicans saying no, and it doesn't seem to change the political equation very much at all. The Republicans meanwhile are not only better at attacking. When they're attacked, they do a better job flipping the script and turning the story into outrage over the unfairness of how they were attacked, turning that into support and money. The example of this on our TVs this week, of course, is Delaware Senatorial candidate Christine O'Donnell. Even before the statements that she made about dabbling in witchcraft came to light, she was questioned about how she handled campaign finances, about people who didn't get paid, about a campaign worker who said that O'Donnell used contributions to cover rent and personal expenses.  Being outraged works. Playing the victim works, for that matter. And today on our radio show we see that not just in politics, but in sports, on Wall Street, on the streets of California. We also, by the way, have a brand new story by David Sedaris. We have victims, we have mock outrage, we have mark outrage that turns into real outrage, we have real outrage that's bigger than maybe it should be. We have crybabies of all sorts, but mostly very, very effective ones. From WBEZ Chicago, it's This American Life distributed by Public Radio International. I'm Ira Glass. Stay with us.  Act One. Wall Street: Money Never Weeps. You'd think if anybody would be out there thanking President Obama for helping them out these past few years, it would be Wall Street. Back when he was running for office, Barack Obama led the Democrats in supporting President Bush's original bailout of Wall Street. And as President, he kept that bailout going, and put into place all kinds of regulatory measures to make it easier for banks to recover and to turn a profit. And he's paid the price with some voters for that. But no, Wall Street is not happy with him. At the President's televised town hall meeting this week, hedge fund manager and CNBC commentator Anthony Scaramucci told them this, to his face. Back during the summer-- kind of famously-- a billionaire named Stephen Schwarzman, who founded and runs a private equity firm called The Blackstone Group, went even further. At a meeting that he thought was private, Schwarzman declared that the President's proposal to raise the taxes on certain profits that his company makes from 15% to 35%-- 35% being the corporate income tax that most companies pay-- he said that tax change was just like Hitler invading Poland in 1939.  For example?  Another?  And so how much whining and complaining are Wall Street guys doing about the federal government now? Like this guy, Stephen Schwarzman, is he an outlier?  Ba'athists being Saddam Hussein's party. These are the people who made money, and were in power, when Saddam Hussein was running the country.  And that continues to generate huge profits.  But wait. Isn't there some kind of pro forma, we're very grateful to the federal government for stepping in, sort of thing that big bankers have to say when they give speeches to the public?  What about when they go in front of Congress? Don't they'd say like, thanks, you saved us, we just want to acknowledge what's happened here in this partnership with the federal government, blah blah blah?  Yeah, what about if you go ahead and just talk to the work-a-day people who work on Wall Street? The analysts, the brokers, the traders, the middle level people who make a lot of money. Are they whining about the Obama administration? Are they grateful for the federal government, and all of us taxpayers, saving their asses?  And in fact, to test this theory, just last week you went with one of our producers, Jane Feltes, to a bar down on Wall Street. And you talked to just random guys who you walked up to at the bar.  And you found these guys, and you recorded conversations. And these guys very much felt like they are the victims. They are being scapegoated by the federal government.  Now, I've listened to this tape before. We walked into the studio, and we're just going to play snippets here. But it was interesting. It's interesting hearing it, how at no point will they cop to the notion that they benefited from the government's actions. Even once.  Now, I should say you guys are shouting not because you're angry, but because it's just really loud.  They basically saw it as their own individual initiative is what put them where they are today, government had nothing to do about it.  And do the Wall days have a legitimate beef? Is there something that Obama has done to them that they're right to get mad about?  Because, basically, they have to hold more money on hand. So they can't either use that money as their profits or go out and invest that and make more money with.  I'm just thinking about your comparison to the Ba'athists in Iraq. Is it just it that these people who are in a position of such privilege will just whine more, because they're just used to being on top and getting their way?  Adam Davidson of Planet Money, which is a co-production of our show and NPR News. You can find the Planet Money blog, or hear their great, twice-weekly podcast for absolutely free at npr.org/money. [MUSIC - "I GET MONEY" BY 50 CENT]  Act Two. Foul Play. Sports, of course, is a place where there are some of the biggest crybabies, or people who get called crybabies, anyway. And in professional basketball, in the NBA, there's a kind of institutionalized crybabying called the flop, which has not always been part of the game. One of our producers, Alex Blumberg, has been watching basketball for a long time and started to wonder if the story that basketball fans tell themselves about the origins of flop is even true. But first, a quick explanation of the flop.  And the payoff for the flop is?  Now, there's a story that people tell about the flop, about where it came from. And can I just have you tell us that story?  Bill Simmons is?  And in soccer, there are players who are known as being great floppers. The word flop really comes from there.  So if this conventional wisdom were true, if this legend were true, that means that somewhere, there's a patient zero. There's a player who was carrying the virus from European soccer into American basketball. Do we know who that patient zero is? Who is that crossover athlete?  Who'd he play for?  Oh right, you weren't really fouled. And yet somebody has to serve the time for you being fouled.  So that's the generally accepted story.  So he's saying it's not the Europeans who brought this to us, it's our own rule changes. Government intervention, if you will.  Bad regulation with unintended effects.  Yeah, let's say that.  So you can't touch at all.  You know, there was this incident recently where Derek Jeter was standing at the plate and pretended that he got hit with a ball and got a free base. This is a baseball game. And then looking back at the video, you see oh, the ball didn't even touch him. But he totally faked it. And there was a debate about well, was this right? Was this what baseball should be? And do you think that at this point, since the flop exists in soccer, since it exists in basketball, that now basically it's like a pan-sports movement? That basically it's just in the culture, and now anybody can grab at it in any sport and it's just out there?  But can you imagine Michael Jordan flopping?  There would be just no dignity it it.  Alex Blumberg is one of the producers of our show. Coming up: how to make a living by complaining. That's in a minute, from Chicago Public Radio and Public Radio International when our program continues.  This American Life, I'm Ira Glass. Each week on our show, of course, we choose a theme, bring you a variety of different kinds of stories on that theme. Today's show: crybabies, stories of whiners, complainers, malcontents, and how being a crybaby can get you what you need and get results, and maybe even sometimes yes, justice. We have arrived at Act three of our show. Act Three. The Squeaky Wheelchair Gets the Grease. In California, a kind of a crybaby cottage industry has popped up around, of all things, the Americans with Disabilities Act, the federal law that requires all public places to meet a minimum level of accessibility-- parking spaces, ramps, grab bars in the bathroom. Some people have taken to suing hundreds of business owners for not being up to code. Alex MacInnis hung out with one of them.  Alex MacInnis in Los Angeles. [MUSIC - "WHEELS" BY FLYING BURRITO BOYS]  Act Four. Cry Me a Liver. We close our show today with this fable about being a crybaby from David Sedaris.  David Sedaris. A story from his brand new book of animal fables, Squirrel Seeks Chipmunk. There's also an audiobook version. They both go on sale next week. [MUSIC - "BULLET WITH BUTTERFLY WINGS" BY SMASHING PUMPKINS] Well, our program was produced today by me and Jonathan Menjivar, with Alex Blumberg, Ben Calhoun, Jane Feltes, Sarah Koenig, Lisa Pollak, Brian Reed, Robyn Semein, Alissa Shipp, and Nancy Updike. Our senior producer is Julie Snyder. Seth Lind is our production manager. Emily Condon's our office manager. Music help from Jessica Hopper. Production help from Sean Wen.  I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. The US has been in Iraq for seven years and I realized the other day, when I heard this clip of tape that I'm about to play you, that I've never even really understood what Baghdad looks like. This is Larry Kaplow, a journalist who reported from Baghdad for the first six years of the war. He went back this summer, with one of our producers, Nancy Updike. They spent a month in Iraq. So it's like Miami, except these concrete blast walls that honeycomb the city, 12 feet tall, giant great dominoes, thousands of them, creating a kind of endless maze. They fully enclose entire neighborhoods. Which means that to run errands, or go to your job, or do anything normal outside your own neighborhood, you go through checkpoints each time you cross from one place to another, over and over. Even the soldiers at the checkpoints find these checkpoints so depressing that lots of them are decorated with fake flowers, bleached by the sun, in strands and bunches. Now, the Sunnis are the minority in Iraq. Saddam Hussein was Sunni. And now that he's out, the overwhelming majority of the country, the Shia, are in control. In the past in Iraq, Shia and Sunni lived side by side and they inter-married. Since the invasion, as we've all heard, there have been been periods of Sunni and Shia killing each other. So, today are they're getting along? From WBEZ Chicago, it's This American Life distributed by Public Radio International, I'm Ira Glass. This August, when the United States declared an end to combat operations in Iraq and pulled back its troops, officially lowered the numbers to under 50,000, one of the things you didn't get very much in the coverage is that you didn't hear many Iraqi voices. So Nancy and Larry spent a month in Iraq and talked to lots of people. Because we wanted to understand, with the US pulling back finally, how are things going? How well is the country emerging from the war? How are people feeling? What's Iraq going to be like, after us. That's our show today, in three acts, stay with us. Act One, What Just Happened? Lots of us understand it's still kind of a mess in Iraq right now, but the specifics of that mess are a little vague. And, to get a grip on that, let's start with the story of one man, and everything that this one man has seen since the invasion. The man's named Abu Abed. Nancy tells this story. Nancy Updike. Coming up, what is that crushed garbage under foot everywhere in Iraq cities? And other things that nobody has told you about life in Iraq today. That's in a minute from Chicago Public Radio and Public Radio International when our program continues. It's This American Life, I'm Ira Glass. Today on our show, Iraq After Us. Reporter Larry Kaplow and one of our producers, Nancy Updike, spent a month in Iraq this August as US troops were ending their combat mission. And they traveled around the country interviewing many, many more people than we will be able to fit into one hour today. To try to understand how things are going in Iraq, in this half hour of the show we are going to hear two more stories, two more acts from the stories that they gathered. And we are going to go straight from one to the other. And we're going to start with Act Two, Politics as Usual. Our program today was reported in Iraq by Larry Kaplow and Nancy Updike, produced by our senior producer, Julie Snyder, and Jonathan Menjivar, with Alex Blumberg, Ben Calhoun, Jane Feltes, Sarah Koenig, Lisa Pollak, Robyn Semien, and Alissa Shipp. Seth Lind is our production manager. Emily Condon is our office manager. Production help from Shawn Wen. This song you're hearing is by Hussam Al-Rassam, one of the biggest Iraqi pop singers. It's a love song. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. During Bill Jerke's years as a state legislator, the Colorado Union of Taxpayers rated him as one of the biggest enemies of taxes in the state. He helped organize the Tea Party chapter in Greeley. And he was proud to let me know: The politics this year are so strange that this anti-tax republican has found himself spending the fall stumping the state, doing something he's never done. Jerke is trying to defeat three ballot initiatives that come before Colorado voters next week. Initiatives 60, 61, and 101. Together would strangle most of the ways the government brings in money. They'd cut Colorado's personal income taxes by a fourth, limit the ability of state and local governments to issue bonds, and force the state government to take over $2 billion in education funding that's now covered by local governments, but without the means to pay for that new cost. He believes the initiatives would throw Colorado into such an ongoing fiscal crisis that business would leave the state. This year we have Republicans impatient with the Republican party, and Democrats frustrated with the Democratic party. That's Greg Shropshire of Rome, Georgia. A past president of the local chapter of a service organization called The 100 Black Man of America. He feels that the Democratic party as a whole has not stood by Barack Obama. From WBEZ Chicago, it's This American Life, distributed by Public Radio International. I'm Ira Glass. Today on our show, on the eve of this mid-term election, people looking at their own political parties and declaring, "This party sucks." Our show today in two acts. Act one, the conservatives. Act two, the liberals. Stay with us. Act one, "Patriot Games." With Tea Parties springing up around the country, so many new people are involved in politics for the first time this election, and they are getting into situations that sometimes they don't know how to handle. Ben Calhoun has this story of one congressional race and two friends. Which was fine. And then Dan Benishek won the Republican primary. Which meant that Benishek would be the leading contender to beat the Democrat in November. And most of Rich's Tea Party friends were excited to support Benishek. They were psyched to have someone who could take back Stupak's seat for the conservatives. At the same time, they were worried that Glenn Wilson was going to enter the race, split the conservative vote, and spoil everything. But Rich says he was convinced. Wilson was just a better embodiment of Tea Party ideals, so he went with the Tea Party philosophy. Principal over party. Forget who's the most electable. He wasn't worried about losing the seat. Ben Calhoun in one of the producers of our show. Coming up, to paraphrase Professor Henry Higgins in My Fair Lady, why can't a Democrat be more like a Republican? That's in a minute from Chicago Public Radio and Public Radio International, when our program continues. It's This American Life, I'm Ira Glass. Each week on our show, of course, we choose some theme, bring you a variety of different kinds of stories on that theme. Today's show, "This Party Sucks." Stories for this mid-term election of political people who have problems with their own political parties. We've arrived at Act 2 of our show. Act 2, "Mister Hitt Goes to Washington." On issue after issue, Republicans have catchy, understandable sound bites and the Democrats seem to have nothing. Stimulus is another one where Democrats are fighting a well articulated, oft repeated, Republican narrative about deficits and failure to deliver results with really pretty much nothing on health care. The lack of any persuasive message has left Democrats running from the issue. It's barely mentioned in TV ads, at congressional races around the country. On finance reform, there's been no understandable explanation for what the hell led us into the recession, and what is needed to fix it. Jack Hitt lives in New Haven.  Our program was produced today by Ben Calhoun and our Senior Producer Julie Snyder with Alex Blumberg, Jane Feltes, Sarah Koenig, Johnathan Menjivar, Lisa Pollak, Robyn Semien, Alissa Shipp and Nancy Updike. Seth Lind is our production manager, Emily Condon is our office manager. Production help from Shawn Wen. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. It's hard to remember now just how often we were hearing about them. How they were being blamed for the entire economic mess, collapsing all around us. And I think it's hard to remember just what a big deal they were, because we never quite understood, not then, not now, what they are. Our Planet Money team has been covering the financial crisis for two years, and they felt like one way to understand what is happening in our economy-- right now, today-- was to become intimately acquainted with the source of its demise. The toxic asset. And so back in January, reporters David Kestenbaum and Chana Joffe-Walt convinced three of their colleagues that they should purchase one. Purchase one for themselves, pitch in together $1,000. That's right, buy one of the things that nearly brought down the global financial system. That blew up major Wall Street banks, that plunged the world into an economic collapse from which it is still struggling to recover. They wanted to buy one of those. Today we're going to be hearing the surprisingly riveting tale of a single toxic asset. The Planet Money team has rolled out installments of the story one at a time over the course of the last year, on the Planet Money podcasts and on some of the NPR news shows-- serialized like a Dicken's novel, published one chapter at a time. Act One, Fire Sale in Kansas City. Take it away. Act Two, An Old Man Chooses Between Logic and Morals, Logic Wins. On January 22, David and Chana took their toxic asset back to the New York office, introduced it around to their colleagues, created a place on the corner window sill for the stack of paperwork. And then stared at it, flipped through it. Act Three, Flipper: Not the Dolphin. When David and Chana went to Florida to find some of the home owners in their toxic asset, they were not expecting speculators, or an 81 year old with a new set of morals. And they certainly didn't expect to walk into a crime scene, which is what happened next. I should just say that, if you've heard a little bit about mortgage fraud in this crisis, this next story will finally explain exactly what mortgage fraud means. Here's David and Chana. Coming up, why carpenters in New Jersey hate Toxie. That's in a minute, from Chicago Public Radio and Public Radio International when our program continues. It's This American Life, I'm Ira Glass. Each week on our show, of course, we choose a theme, bring you different kinds of stories on that theme. Today's show, Toxie. We try to understand the entire economic crisis through the story of a single toxic asset. The reporters on our story today are Planet Money's David Kestenbaum and Chana Joffe-Walt. We've arrived at act four of our show. Act Four, Villains and How to Sue Them. January, February, these were happy months for Toxie, the toxic asset. Our team bought it in January for a thousand. In February, just like they hoped, first payment came in, a check for $141. And then, things started to take a turn. March's check was a lot less-- $44.81. Toxie was getting sick, quickly. So David and Chana called Wit Solberg in Kansas City, the guy who helped them buy Toxie in the first place. Questions with no clear answer. Meanwhile, other things were happening. Chana got an email. Looked urgent. That brings us to Act Five, Toxie in a Coma. I Know, It's Serious. Our program was produced today by Alex Blumberg with Ben Calhoun, Jane Feltes, Sarah Koenig, Jonathan Menjivar, Lisa Pollak, Robyn Semien, Alissa Shipp, Nancy Updike. Senior producer for our show is Julie Snyder. Seth Lind is our production manager. Emily Condon's our office manager. Production help from Shawn Wen. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. Steve Raucci. Let's just start with something that Steve Raucci was really good at, cutting energy costs. He was legendary. If you worked in the Schenectady School District, you knew that if you wanted to turn on extra lights or make some elicit toast in your classroom, there'd be hell to pay. Unauthorized coffee makers, microwaves, forbidden. About six years ago, Richard Agnello, a special education teacher, was working in the middle school. And had this little office with no heat. None. In winter it would be 56 degrees in there. He borrowed a thermometer from a science classroom to check. He asked for heat repeatedly. Nothing happened. So he broke the rules, brought in a little space heater, which he would hide in a file cabinet at night. Next day, Agnello is walking up a flight of stairs and sees a maintenance worker coming down the stairs. That's John LaPointe, Jr., the district electrician who'd been sent to remedy this very, very serious space heater infraction. For the people who worked under Steve Raucci, this story's a dime a dozen. And it's got all the hallmarks of Raucci's style-- the temper, the fanatical control over every single detail around him, the pettiness, the comic strip antics, even the fact that workers were forbidden to talk to teachers when they were out on a job. From WBEZ Chicago it's This American Life distributed by Public Radio International. I'm Ira Glass. Today on our show, how one guy came to be untouchable. How he grabbed power, how people all around him let it happen, and how this occurred in a place that nobody thought to look. It's a study in tyranny writ small. Tyranny happening in a setting where you usually don't expect Machiavellian scheming, the maintenance office. We're devoting our show to this story today. Act One is what it was like at the height of Steve Raucci's power. Act Two is about how we fell. Sarah Koenig is the reporter for all this. And let's get right to it. Here is Sarah Koenig. More on that in a minute. Steve Raucci finally goes too far, but he can't be brought down until his fork is stolen from a diner. Sarah Koenig's story about him continues from Chicago Public Radio and Public Radio International when our program continues. This American Life. I'm Ira Glass. Sarah Koenig is one of the producers of our show. Well our program was produced today by  Jane Feltes and Sarah Koenig, with Alex Blumberg, Ben Calhoun, Jonathan Menjivar, Lisa Pollak, Robyn Semien, Alissa Shipp, and Nancy Updike. Senior producer for our show is Julie Snyder. Seth Lind is our production manager. Emily Condon's our office manager. Production help from Shawn Wen. I'm Ira Glass Back next week with more stories of This American Life. From WBEZ Chicago, it's This American Life distributed by Public Radio International. Paul Gereffi is a letter carrier in Ft. Lauderdale. He's been doing the same route on and off for 15 years. After closing up his truck, he heads out on foot with the mail. Before we get to the story of the guy whose life Paul saved, a word about the mentality you can get walking a mail route. It's not like the mailman knows a lot about any of us, but he's the one person in the neighborhood who knows a little bit about everybody. Sometimes knowing just a little bit about everybody, you step in. So Paul pulls over and he calls 911, when he notices that the pizza shop owner must have been stabbed. There were these huge circles of blood on his clothes. The two guys were still tussling on the ground. Paul found out later that would had happened was the older guy, the pizza shop owner, had fired the younger guy, told him to get out. The National Association of Letter Carriers named Paul one if its Heroes of the Year in 2008 for this. Others who were named that year, a postal carrier in Cedar Rapids who crawled inside a partially submerged car and rescued the driver. A carrier in New York who alerted the authorities to what became a major identity theft case, had been noticing tons of credit card mail in the name of an 85-year-old woman who had been in a nursing home for months. It's so common for letter carriers to stumble onto something during their route and perform a good deed that these incidents are a regular feature of the Letter Carrier Association's monthly magazine. Act One, Baby Steps. Actor Daniel Beirne, reading a true story by Ryan Knighton, an excerpt from Knighton's book, C'mon Papa: Dispatches From a Dad in the Dark. This story originally aired on the CBC radio program Wire Tap, which is hosted by Jonathan Goldstein and distributed in the United States by PRI, Public Radio International. Debbie spoke to me from her office. She's the building manager for a development of apartments and townhouses in Nashua, New Hampshire called Twin Ponds, 364 units. And in those 364 units, at least 250 dogs, she says. Since they started advertising their dog friendliness about a year ago, business has been unstoppable. Take that, economic recession. But of course there's a problem that goes with having lots of dogs around, and that's human beings who don't pick up after their dogs. You see this pretty much everywhere in the world where there's large numbers of people and dogs living together. And here at Twin Ponds, there's a woodsy area and a little brook and of course two ponds, lots of potential places for wayward, hidden poo. She tried the neighborhood watch kind of approach to the problem for a while, put the residents on the lookout. So Debbie began researching. She spent four or five months looking for some alternative, looking at what cities do and what dog parks do to get people to pick up after their dogs. What she found was that nobody seemed to be doing much at all. She could put in video cameras everywhere, but that would cost a fortune. She didn't want to have to pass that cost onto her tenants. It's working, though it took some effort. First step, Debbie had to get samples of all the DNA of all the dogs in all of her buildings. She had the owners bring the dogs to her office. They swabbed the inside of each dog's cheek with a Q-tip, paid $30.00 to cover the cost, and sent it to the lab. Which you would think would be simple, except that they're dogs. You have to schedule them one at a time. And sure, she says, the poor maintenance guy who has to get a dab of poo and then mix it with a special solution and FedEx that sample to the lab in Knoxville. Not much fun for him. But just how exciting does Debbie find it? She finds it so exciting that she has a music cue on the ready on her computer. This is Jim Simpson, the president of the company that does the DNA testing called BioPet. BioPet was the kind of company that ran blood tests for veterinarians. Then a few years ago, they realized that since the dog genome had been mapped, there must be a way to make money selling DNA testing of some kind to dog owners. So they started doing doggy paternity tests. Yes, there is a market for that. Also they sell a test that tells you pretty inexpensively exactly what breeds make up your dog, though other companies offer those services as well. That's right. He said islands, specifically on the island of Cypress in the Mediterranean, the town of Limassol. An environmental health official inquired about bringing in PooPrints to solve their poo problem. Meanwhile an executive in Copenhagen read that perhaps they could collaborate with BioPet and offered to help with the politics to institute mandatory adoption of PooPrints, either all through Denmark, or at least in its biggest cities. Though it has to be said that when people start debating mandatory DNA dog testing, they don't always end up choosing it. Richard Hopp is a resident of the Scarlett Place Condominiums in Baltimore, a fancy address near the water at the Inner Harbor. And this spring, a rash of doggy droppings in the hallways and supposedly even in the elevators of their high-end building led the condo board to consider DNA testing and $500 fines for violators. Richard tipped off a reporter for The Baltimore Sun. He was squarely against the testing. He says that two puppies were being house-trained in the building at the same time, and that might have been a lot of the problem. "What was the big deal?" He asked. "Why start complicated new rules?" The article in the Sun papers got picked up everywhere, all over the country. There were TV stories. "And this was not good for the building," Richard says. "Board members who had supported the DNA testing," he says, "were made to feel ridiculous." The DNA idea was dropped. And the simple threat of action was enough to make the poo problem vanish too. The apartment buildings up in Nashua, New Hampshire are a very different situation. Lots more dogs. All of the illegal poo was outside, where there were no closed-circuit TV cameras. And Debbie Logan says that the simple threat of DNA testing has had a huge effect. In the last two decades, DNA evidence introduced an element of certainty to our criminal justice system. Wrongly convicted men were sprung from prison. There was a clarity where things had been cloudy and ambiguous. And Debbie says that it's the certainty that's the most novel thing about doggy DNA testing, and it comes at such a cheap price and removes her from the he said/she said world of tenant disputes that's the bane of a property manager's existence. It's her favorite thing about the doggy DNA program, the certainty. Ruth Padawer writes for the New York Times Magazine. Jim O'Grady. He's co-author of the biography Disarmed & Dangerous: The Radical Lives and Times of Daniel and Philip Berrigan. He was recorded at the Moth, which features personal stories told live in front of an audience. For more Moth stories, you can listen to the Moth Radio Hour from PRX, which airs on public radio stations across the country or you could check out the Moth's free weekly podcast at themoth.org. Our program today was produced by Lisa Pollak with Alex Blumberg, Ben Calhoun, Jane Feltes, Sarah Koenig, Jonathan Menjivar, Robyn Semien, Alissa Shipp, and Nancy Updike. Senior Producer for our show is Julie Snyder. Seth Lind is our Production Manager. Emily Condon's our Office Manager. Production help from Shawn Wen. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life.  OK. Imagine for second what it would be like to have the entire country have one opinion about something and you were the only person who disagreed. Out of the entire country. This pretty much happened to the woman I'm about to introduce you to. She was a juror in the criminal trial of Rod Blagojevich.  When the tapes became public, Blagojevich did the kind of media blitz that did not seem to win many people over. He squirmed on talk shows, he appeared as a contestant on The Apprentice. Here he is about to get fired by Donald Trump.  And so most of us who saw him on TV decided, "that guy is guilty." And then the case went to trial. Seven weeks. Jury deliberated for 14 days after that. Six men, six women. 24 counts against the governor. The jury could only agree on one count-- lying to the FBI. They convicted him on that one. It was split, with a handful of not guilty votes in various configurations, on the 23 other counts.  Today on our radio show, we have three stories of people who end up as the lone holdout, the last man standing, in various situations. And if these three stories are any indication, it is always pretty dreadful.  In JoAnn's case, she says that she's been on a couple of juries before, and nothing like this happened. She went into the case with no particular fondness for Blagojevich and no desire to draw attention to herself. In fact, it was kind of the opposite on that score. In the aftermath of the trial, hounded by the press for weeks, she did one interview. I was her second.  JoAnn Chiakulas.  Act Two, Last Man Stand-Up.  Sarah Koenig is one of the producers of our show. And these are the song stylings of Duke's wife, Leslie, from the show.  Elna Baker. She's the author of a memoir called, New York Regional Mormon Singles Halloween Dance.  I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. Everybody knows the holidays can be stressful. And so with the holidays upon us, we thought, you know what would be nice? An hour of jokes. Let's do an hour of holiday jokes. But reflecting on this for about 10 seconds made us realize there's actually no such thing. Think about it for a second. What is your favorite Christmas joke? Right? Even kids who love Christmas and love jokes do not have Christmas jokes. To be sure this is true we actually ran a scientific test this week where we asked a group of kids to tell us their favorite Christmas joke. One of our producers, Jonathan Menjivar, went to the playground at New York's PS 11 asking third graders for Christmas jokes. And while none of them knew any Christmas jokes, it turns out that all of them were willing on the spot-- apparently any third grader will do this-- they were willing to make up Christmas jokes. You know, the horn station. I don't know if you could hear that. One of the kids in the background goes, "That makes sense." And everyone then agrees. Here's another one. Yeah. I feel like the setup is often the best part of these jokes. Why does Santa get married to a skinny woman? I'm glad to say though that some of the jokes the kids made up on the spot did actually have the structure of real jokes and worked as real jokes, with punch lines that actually made actual sense. OK. This next one was told to Jonathan by a little kid who first explained that they don't celebrate Christmas. They celebrate Hanukkah with the Hanukkah menorah and all that. It's funny because it's true. Jonathan wasn't sure what he should say to this little Jewish kid about that joke. Good as these jokes are, fact is, if you want a Christmas holiday special that's filled with jokes, you really have to go to professionals. And so in preparation for today's show, we went to stand-up comedians and performers and we put them on stage in little clubs and venues, wherever they like to try out new material over the last few weeks. And today, from just a small club with I think 200 people in it, we bring you our Comedians of Christmas special. We have some people who you've heard of on our show before, like Mike Birbiglia, but lots of amazingly funny people who you may not know. We have actually never tried this before, and it's been completely exciting seeing what happens when we throw a theme like Christmas to these really talented, funny people. Act One, Christ Has Prison. Wyatt Cenac. Act Two, Stocking Stuffers. Edith Zimmerman. She's the editor at TheHairpin.com where she writes all day, every day. OK, so now the kid knows that the kid is anonymous, so here's the joke that this kid tells. The kid works blue. The kid knows, I'm anonymous. Great. I've got this dirty material that I've got to try out on public broadcasting. Act Three, Little Altar Boy. Mike Birbiglia. He's the author of a book based on his one-man show called Sleepwalk With Me: and Other Painfully True Stories. Act Four, One Lord A-Leaping. Jenny Slate wrote and voiced the award-winning film Marcel the Shell with Shoes On, and can be seen on HBO's Bored to Death. Gabe Liedman writes for videogum.com, and can be seen on AOL.com's new series, The One. Act Five, 'Twas the Fight Before Christmas. Julian McCullough. His Comedy Central Presents special can be seen on his website, julianmccoullough.com. Our program was produced today by Jane Feltes, Seth Lind, and me, with Alex Blumberg, Ben Calhoun, Lisa Pollak, Sarah Koenig, Jonathan Menjivar, Robyn Semien, Alissa Shipp, and Nancy Updike. Senior Producer for our show is Julie Snyder. Emily Condon's our Office Manager. Production help from Shawn Wen. Our website, thisamericanlife.org. WBEZ management oversight for our program by our boss, Mr. Torey Malatia. Every day between now and Christmas, you will find him where he always is this time of year, at the downtown store of Marshall Fields in Chicago or whatever they call it now on Santa's lap. Go there yourself. Find him and he'll tell you himself, I'm Ira Glass. I'm back next week with more stories of This American Life. It's This American Life from WBEZ Chicago distributed by Public Radio international. And today's show begins with a question that somehow independently popped up in the heads of five different people all around the same time. The people were Caitlin Kenney, Dave Kestenbaum, Alex Blumberg, Jacob Goldstein, and Adam Davidson. All of them cover economics for our show and for NPR news as part of the Planet Money project. All these reporters but Adam were pretty new to reporting on money and finance at the time. And that last reporter you heard, Kestenbaum, went online and bought some play money so we could run little scenarios, pretending that person A took out a loan from person B to buy a house from person C to try to understand where all the money went when all the housing prices collapsed. Jacob meanwhile, went to dinner with an aunt of his. What does that mean? Money is fiction. So the answer to the question, where did the money go when the housing market collapsed turns out to be that the money never existed in the first place. All those houses used to be worth a certain amount and now they were worth a lower amount. Simply because that's what everyone now agreed. No money changed hands, no many vanished. Same with retirement funds and stock portfolios. Alex says that this is when he realized that no where was safe. That there were inflation even sitting in the bank. All his money value could just slowly vaporize. Money is not solid. Its value could disappear. And all these reporters says that after that they would be working on what seemed like perfectly ordinary stories asking straightforward questions and they would bump up against this weird, fictional quality that money has. Jacob says that he just figured our money works this way because we're a complicated, industrial society with banks and stock markets and financial instruments of all kinds. And then he read something that made him realize that no, no, no. The fictional quality of money is inherent in the very idea of money. In any system of currency, no matter how simple, this aha moment came to him when he was reading this book from 1910 about an island called Yap in the South Pacific. At the time on this island, for currency, this pre-industrial people used something completely impractical and counter-intuitive, these massive stone sculptures in the shape of coins. And I mean massive. But Jacob says it gets even more interesting. To understand this next point you have to know first that the limestone that they use to make these giant sculpture coins, it wasn't actually found on Yap. They had to go to another island 250 miles away to make them. In fact, Jacob says it's not logically different from what we do. For money after all, long ago, we used to use gold. And if you wanted to buy something you'd have to carry around these heavy, shiny pieces of metal. And then we decided, no, let's just leave the gold in a bank. Instead of the gold what we're going to carry around are these pieces of paper. And the paper on them says, yes, there's gold. You can take this paper money to a bank. You can swap it for gold. Maybe you've seen old dollars that say on them promise to pay the bearer so many dollars in gold. You could swap it. Well today on our program, the most stoner question we have ever posed on our show, what is money? That's right. What is money? That's the question we're asking. I know how it sounds. The fact that the money that we use every day is about as real as those stones at the bottom of the sea, that makes our lives easier in all kinds of ways, but it is also incredibly dangerous that that is the nature of money as you'll hear today in two action-filled acts. Act 1: The lie that saved Brazil. Chana Joffe-Walt. Coming up, we go to a place where no journalist has been, this room inside the Federal Reserve that is like financial a black hole where the normal rules of money do not apply. That's in a minute. Chicago Public Radio and Public Radio International when our program continues. This American Life. I'm Ira Glass. Each week on our show of course, we choose a theme, bring you different kinds of stories on that theme. Today's show, "The Invention of Money." We have stories today about the fictional quality of money. How it gets made out of nothing, and what's great about that, and all the trouble that can get us into. Hey fellas. Well I know. Actually, I've been listening and it's fascinating of course. And excellent story as always. But I have some questions. For starters, you're saying that the Fed created over a trillion dollars to bailout the economy. Does that money get added to the deficit? Why not? OK, but when the Fed loses money on some mall that it now owns, does that eventually in some sneaky back door way, come out of my taxes? And so all of this money that they've created since 2008, totaling it up if I understand right, it's over $1.6 trillion. Does this have anything to do with the TARP program to buy up toxic assets? Does it have anything to do with Obama's stimulus package. But this $1.6 trillion is bigger than both of those combined. We have these huge fights that drag on for weeks over the stimulus package and over these other things, and then the Fed does something that dwarfs these in size. It's twice as big as either of those programs. And there's no discussion. The Congress doesn't debate it. The president doesn't approve it. There's no public input. Some eggheads in a room just kind of wave a wand and then it just happens? OK, is that a good thing? Alex Blumberg and David Kestenbaum. They're both part of our Planet Money team, along with Chana Joffe-Walt and all the other reporters you've heard this hour. Their free podcast and their blog explain the stuff that all of us have never understood more entertainingly than seems fair. You can find all that at NPR .org/money. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. This is an amazing documentary called Please Vote for Me about an election in a third grade class by a filmmaker named Weijun Chen. It takes place in a city called Wuhan in central China. The eight year olds are told that they are going to vote to decide who is going to be the class monitor. It's the first election in their school ever. None of them has ever witnessed or taken part in anything like this at all. Act One, Trickle Down History. Now we move to a group of teachers in California, teachers who are sending their students out to understand a very American kind of politics-- presidential politics. Starlee Kine tells the story. Starlee Kine, lives in Los Angeles. Coming up, children vote to decide all the rules in their school, including can they play video games while at school? What they decide in a minute from Chicago Public Radio and Public Radio International, when our program continues. Act Two, Climates Change, People Don't. I met this really great, really smart kid who's into politics this summer. All summer I was watching a lot of Glenn Beck, and I went to that rally that he had in Washington D.C. And so I'm at the rally and I'm wandering around, and I'm talking to people in the crowd. That's Erin Gustafson, high school freshman, with her older sister, Sarah, and her mom, Michelle. They've driven up from the Shenandoah Valley in Virginia for the rally. We talked about the kinds of things that you talk about at a Glenn Beck rally. is the President a socialist? The Gustafsons don't think he is. Are they alarmed over the direction the country's going in? They definitely are. They are free market, small government types-- against saving big banks, against the deficit. And then I got on the subject of global warming with 14 year old Erin. The number of Americans who believe that global warming is real has fallen, and the decline is dramatic. Back in 2006, according to a Pew Research Center study, 79% of the public said there's solid evidence that the Earth is getting warmer. In just three years, the number fell to 57%. Other polls show a similar drop. At the same time that we had her, we had in a studio in Colorado, at public radio station KGHU, a scientist named Roberta Johnson who develops curricula as Executive Director of the National Earth Science Teacher Association, and who studies the climate at the National Center for Atmospheric Research. Dr. Johnson and Erin Gustafson agreed to come into the studio to do a little experiment that we proposed to both of them. Dr. Johnson would run through the very best material that she thinks teachers have to convince students that global warming is real. And Erin would tell her and us if it was convincing, if it won her over. Was there anything a scientist could say to convince a kid who's already skeptical? OK, at this point Dr. Johnson got into some details that both Erin and I took awhile to grasp, so I'm going to just summarize for you to move things along. Basically, Roberta Johnson was saying we can explain the way temperature and carbon dioxide rose and fell over 420,000 years by looking at how the Earth was tilting-- its position relative to the sun. What Erin's talking about are arguments against global warming that you read. That the Earth got really warm back in the 12th century, and it wasn't greenhouse gasses causing that-- maybe that's just happening again. And that satellite photos showed Arctic ice melting in one set of photos, but in another, didn't look so bad. She also asked, why have winters been colder and snowfall greater, if climate change is already, supposedly, taking effect. And she very delicately asked Dr. Johnson about Climategate. One by one, Dr. Johnson answered each of these questions. Yes, it got warmer in the 12th century, but for reasons that we can name, and it was nowhere near as warm as today. Yes, it might be colder in any given winter, but that is just the randomness of weather, that's not the climate. Yes, there's more snow now, because a warmer planet means more water vapor trapped in the atmosphere, which means storms of all kinds become more intense including snow. Yes, climate scientists said some things in their stolen emails that might seem at first to be damning, but several different commissions working independently all verified that they did not tamper with the data or the peer review process. Yes, the Arctic ice in photos might fluctuate, but the overall trend is clear. Act Three, Minor Authorities. What if you ran a school and you had the kids vote and decide on all the rules? They decide on all the discipline, decide which classes should be taught, what would happen if you don't show up for class, can you nap in school. Not to be harsh, but what if the inmates ran the asylum? Naturally, to record at the school, we had to get permission from the authorities there-- the kids themselves. Glad we got that six year old on our side there. We're in the school gym, it's about 50 kids, which is the whole school, age four to 19. A mix of kids who didn't do well in other schools, some behavior problem kids, some kids of professionals and crunchy parents. It's actually very diverse. There's a short discussion about whether they want to have us in the school. After a few minutes, there's a vote. And because that passed, Jyllian Gunther has this story. Jyllian Gunther. She's a filmmaker currently finishing a film about an new public high school in Brooklyn. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. Hey everybody, Ira Glass here. Today on the radio show we have stories about people who are very, very amazingly slow to react in life-changing situations. And to kick off the show we considered all kinds of ideas, but in the end I think there was really only one real possibility. Like the rest of America, we, at This American Life are not tired yet of those stories of women who have no idea that they're pregnant, and then poof! One day, a baby pops out. We are not over that. And yes, the TV I Didn't Know I Was Pregnant is in production for its fourth season right now. We still have questions. There were many more questions and to summarize the answers-- no, she was never nauseated. No, her hair did not fall out. No, her breasts did not seem to get bigger. Yes, her ankles did swell up. And yes, she was incredibly exhausted. And the exhaustion in fact, made her wonder if she was pregnant. But then the pregnancy test told her no, she wasn't. So she dropped the idea. But when you saw the TV show before it happened to you, did you feel the same way that most people feel when they hear about you? Like, oh come on, you must have known? Yes, America, if you take just one thing away from today's radio program, I hope that that is it. If you see a woman who gets a little heavier, always, always be sure to ask her if she's pregnant. Because she might not know. And if people are this way with their own bodies, with things that are sometimes so dangerous to them, what other things are they putting off way too long? Well today on our show, we have three very dramatic examples of what else, including a guy who ends up waiting 17 years before finally marrying the woman he loves. From WBEZ Chicago it's This American Life distributed by Public Radio International. We have amazing stories today of people sidestepping huge, life-changing experiences that they just are not ready to deal with. Until finally, they are. I'm Ira Glass. Stay with us. Act 1: "When I grow up." David Holthouse is a reporter now living in Alaska. After his story was first published in 2004, his newspaper, Westword, was inundated with letters from people who had been molested as children themselves thanking him. Grateful, especially for the part of the story where he shows that it's possible to let go of your anger. So coming up, the most unromantic guy imaginable puts the rest of us to shame in the romance department. That's in a minute. From Chicago Public Radio and Public Radio International when our program continues. This American Life, I'm Ira Glass. Each week on our show of course, we choose a theme and bring you different kinds of stories on that theme. Today's show: Slow to react. Stories of people taking a very, very long time to deal with life-changing situations of one sort or another. We've arrived at Act 2 of our show. Sean Christopher Lewis is a playwright and a performer currently touring the country with two shows, Killadelphia and Just Kids. To find out when he's coming to your town, go to seanchristopherlewis.com Act 3: "I'm still here." Slow to react is usually kind of an insult. You know, it's kind of a flaw, a failing. In this next case though, the things that are slow to react are cancer cells. And slow to react in that kind of situation is sort of how you'd want it. Jonathan Menjivar tells the story. Jonathan Menjivar is a producer for our show. Katherine Russell Rich's latest book is called Dreaming in Hindi. And we know what that means. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. They can laugh about it now, the Ohm family. It was Thanksgiving dinner, suburban Minneapolis, big spread, pumpkins on the table, 14 people. And it was 2002, the year after 9/11. This is Alexis, the baby of the family. She and her parents came into our studio and talked with one of our show's producers, Alex Blumberg. That had never happened before. Alexis looked at her two little cousins, Henry and Hugo, who didn't know how to react. Her mom, Diane, didn't know how to react. Yeah. Needless to say, comparing Osama bin Laden to Jesus didn't exactly smooth things over. Alexis pretty much knew what she was getting into talking about Osama bin Laden this way with her dad. He's conservative and served in the army. She knew what kind of room she was working. But she hadn't really factored in the fact that it was Thanksgiving dinner. Her dad says that a lot of what made it blow up. Today on our show, we have stories of people facing various kinds of tough rooms. Trying to calculate what they're going to say, what they can get away with, and usually not getting the reactions they figured they were going to get. WBEZ Chicago, it's This American Life distributed by Public Radio International. I'm Ira Glass. Our program today. Tough Room in tough acts. It's Monday morning in the offices of The Onion. And to start the new issue, each of the the writers has brought in a list of 15 headlines for their fake news newspaper. There are eight people at the table, seven men and one woman-- which is par for the course in the comedy business-- almost all of them are in their 20s. The jokes survives. Seth marks it with a highlighter. Though it's incredibly popular-- with three quarters of a million copies in print each week, plus five million individual visitors at the website every month-- it's possible that, especially if you're older, you've never actually read The Onion. So here's what you need to know. It's written in newspaper form, though lots of the funniest stories aren't really new parody, but just everyday life described in a deadpan newspaper style. Like, "Stoners Announce Plans to Get Stoned for That," or "Rejection Letter Silently Flipped Off," or "Control of Anecdote Rested from Boyfriend." These were all considered for this one issue, by the way. The highlighter is passed to Todd Hanson, who's not just the oldest person at the table. He's been at The Onion longer than anybody else. He started in 1990, when The Onion wasn't really a business, but more of a hobby for a few friends who all worked crappy jobs elsewhere to support themselves. It takes them two long mornings, on Monday and on Tuesday, to come up with the 16 headlines they're going to use in the paper this week. And to get to those 16 they go through-- and I know this number is going to sound kind of crazy-- 600 possible headlines. Truthfully, the staff was a lot nicer to each other than I figured they'd be. Comedians can be incredibly competitive. And The Onion has gone through phases when the chemistry wasn't so chill. But mainly, they're just tough on the material. It's a tough room because of how minutely they dissect all the jokes. Over the years, they've developed a way of discussing the material that helps them decide whether something is so outstanding funny, it beats a lot of other jokes that are also pretty funny, and what makes each joke funny, and how to make it funnier. Or why does this joke immediate, unquestioning approval? While the headline "Roommate's unopened bag of Doritos taunting area man" deserved a long discussion of whether the point of the joke was, in fact, the taunting. Or did the Doritos themselves make the joke too obvious? Watching them parse jokes like this with a kind of academic precision they're sort of proud of, hour after hour, it's not just tedious. It's the opposite of comedy. And the other thing that was very odd watching them work was that most of the jokes that got the biggest laughs from the writers themselves did not make it into the paper. For example, this headline. Or this one. Or here's another And, what the hell? Let's just do one more. After the meeting, I get explanations for the many mysterious decisions I've witnessed. I'm told that usually the jokes that get laughs on Monday do not survive. Again, Megan Ganz. And then there was this mystery. Why did this story "Local girlfriend always wants to do stuff" make the paper, while "Nation's girlfriends call for more quality time" got heckled? Todd Hanson and Dan Guterman explained that the story that went with "Local girlfriend always wants to do stuff" was actually written in a way that made fun of the guy in the relationship. In fact, all through their editorial meetings, they're talking constantly about what jokes are tired. A joke about the Green Party and marijuana brownies was killed partly because mentioning the Green Party at all seem passe. A headline about Nicole Richie's new baby, "Nicole Richie thinks baby looks fat" was ditched on the theory that any Nicole Richie fat or anorexia reference was very 2005. Almost, but not quite. When Todd Hanson and I sat down for an interview, he spontaneously brought up the exact same headline Megan had mentioned, though to made a very different point. In fact, to sort this out, a whole language has emerged over the years at The Onion to talk about whether something is too silly or silly in the wrong way. Writers speak about a joke taking them to Sillytown, or Crazyville, or Sillytown Heights, which is either good or bad depending on the person. At the heart of this dispute is a problem that comes up in any creative project that lasts even a few years. You don't want to become a parody of yourself. You don't want to keep repeating the same things over and over. Yet there are some things you do a lot of, that are just built into the DNA of what you make. In the end, "Area man makes it through day" makes it onto a list of stories that will appear in upcoming issues of The Onion, partly because the founder and editor-in-chief of the paper, Scott Dikkers, liked it. Editor Joe Randazzo says it was an existential fight about what kind of paper they were, that would or would not publish such a thing. Finally, the editor-in-chief had to tell everybody to cut it out. And they published the joke. And this one headline did not ruin the paper. But a room full of people who would even entertain the possibility that it might, who feel that strongly about it? That's a very tough room. Act Two, Bar Car Prophesy. When you're a kid, adulthood itself can seem kind of a tough room, in which you're going to have to adapt to the strange custom that is the world of adults. But for Rosie Schaap, when she was a kid, the prospect of hanging with the adults seemed exciting, an adventure. Rosie Schaap. This story comes from a book of essays that she's writing about drinking called Drinking With Men. It comes out next year. Jane Feltes is one of the producers of our show. Brett Martin is a correspondent for GQ Magazine in New York. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. Hey there, everybody. So I'm not going to beat around the bush. For this week's radio program, we think we may have found the original recipe for Coca-Cola. And I am not kidding. I am not kidding. One of the most famously guarded trade secrets on the planet, I have it right here, and I'm going to read it to you. I'm going to read it to the world. And I'm going to make my case for why I think it's real, despite whatever Coca-Cola might say. And that is just one of the two stories on today's program. Probably the best story about how protective Coca-Cola is of its secret formula comes from this book that was written by Charles Howard Candler. His Dad, Asa, did not invent Coca-Cola, but founded the Coca-Cola company back in 1892. Of course this makes no sense at all. Why can't the two guys fly on a plane if the formula is sitting inside a bank vault? Coke's official line on this these days is that they simply do not talk about how many people know the recipe. Though the reason that most of us think that of it as one of the biggest trade secrets in the world is probably because that's the story Coca-Cola likes to tell. In this particular Coke commercial, I guess the premise is that each of the two guys only knows half the formula. It's just one of several commercials that have come out recently that poke fun at the myth of the super secret formula, while at the same time bolstering and selling that myth. Everett Beal passed away July 2010. I called his widow Judy at her home in Georgia so many times asking for an interview that at one point she said to me, "This is how you people won the war, isn't it?" "You people" meaning northerners. OK, let's just pause the tape right there to explain who these guys are. The Pemberton that she's talking about is John Pemberton, the guy who invented Coca-Cola in Atlanta back in 1886. Like I said, he was a pharmacist. But he was also a maker of patent medicines. He made something called Globe Flower Cough Syrup. He made a blood purifier called Extract of [? Stalengia. ?] This book of recipes, Judy says, originally belonged to Evans. She says his name is all over the book. Apparently after his friend Pemberton invented Coke, Evans copied down the formula in this book, calling it Cocoa-Cola And after Evans died, the book started its travels. Everett was so intrigued by the Coke recipe that he spent the last year of his life while he struggled with cancer researching and writing his own book, a history of the inventor of Coca-Cola, that's still unpublished. We sent a copy of that photo where you can see the recipe for Coca-Cola to that historian of Coca-Cola, the guy who wrote that book, Mark Pendergrast. This was an amazing discovery. In Mark's book he tells the story of looking through Coca-Cola's archives and being shown the yellowing pages of an old notebook that belonged to the inventor of Coca-Cola, John Pemberton. The Coke people told him that it was from way before Pemberton moved to Atlanta, way before he invented Coke. New York Times May 2, 1993, the year Mark's book was published, Coca-Cola calls the recipe in his book, quote, "The latest in a long line of previous unsuccessful attempts to reveal a 107 year old mystery." --not only do they match up ingredient for ingredient, identical-- --the recipe in the newspaper fills in things that the one in the Coke archive leaves blank. The recipe from Coke's archive just lists numbers next to each ingredient. But the newspaper says what the numbers stand for: ounces and drops and drams. The recipe that was found in Coke's archive is just labeled X. The newspaper one says clearly, this recipe is Cocoa-Cola. Great. Here we go. The 7x formula is just one element in these two recipes. It's made from 20 drops of orange oil, 30 of lemon oil, 10 of nutmeg oil, 5 of coriander oil, 10 of neroli oil-- neroli's a kind of orangey flavor-- 10 of cinnamon oil, and 8 ounces of alcohol. You mix that together, and then you take a little bit of that flavoring. One recipe says two ounces, the other says two and a half. You put that into another container where you're going to mix the syrup for the soda. 1903 being the year that Coca-Cola rids itself of cocaine. So there's all this circumstantial evidence pointing to this recipe being the original recipe for Coca-Cola. Or at any rate, one of the original recipes. But the only way to tell for sure would be to make a batch. Taste it. The historian had never done that, the columnist back in 1979 never did it. That would be the final test. So we set out to do it. First obstacle in our path, kind of a huge one-- coca leaves are a Schedule II controlled substance. Totally illegal in the United States. When we asked the company that brings them in under special federal supervision and decocainizes them for Coca-Cola, this company Stepan, and asked them to sell us some, they stopped returning our calls. No coca leaves, no way to make the secret recipe. So the hardest part was done, except for making the soda. For that we turned to professionals. Meet Eric Chastain and Mike Spear, respectively the VP of operations and the marketing director at Jones Soda in Seattle. Jones makes it living on flavors like cream soda and green apple soda. But they're also known for being willing to try anything. They have made turkey and gravy soda, they've made Brussels sprout soda. We sent them our recipe, and by the time that Ben and I got to their office, Mike and Eric had already made up a couple bottles of our recipe and were ready for a taste test. Our stuff versus real Coca-Cola. First, samples from our soda, the one from the 1979 newspaper, are poured into little cups. We're instructed to sniff first, then take a small sip, roll it around in our mouths. We really do not know what to expect. Ben says the flavor is like Froot Loops. To me, it's more like orange-flavored baby aspirin. Which means, we failed, right? We made the recipe. You would never mistake it for Coca-Cola. But then it occurred to us, maybe the original version of Coca-Cola did not taste like Coke today. So Eric and Mike called the flavor company that they're working on with all this-- it's a company that specializes in beverage flavors called Sovereign down in Orange County, California-- and asked if they could do a version that tones down the citrus and other flavors. A few hours later we have flown south to Los Angeles. We are in Sovereign's lab, a room that smells like you're inside a bag of jelly beans. And we do a second taste test. In the lab with us and Mike from Jones Soda were David Ames, who runs the flavor company, and his staff. Going with the idea that our essential oils were much stronger than Pemberton's, they ended up cutting the amount of flavor in half. And then they tried it and they thought, oh, let's cut it in half again. We look at each other like, what had we done? Later I talked to Steve Warth, the guy who did the heavy lifting in converting that old formula into modern lab measurements. He's the one in charge of developing Sovereign's flavors. He says the ingredients in this old recipe were no surprise to him. Most of them are the same ingredients you use to make any cola. Steve said that if we ever decided to match Coca-Cola the way it tastes today, lots of things about the formula are widely known. We'd have to replace the citric acid in the old formula with phosphoric acid. That's what modern sodas use. We would replace the lime juice with lime oil. We'd swap this sugar for high fructose corn syrup. That's because even if you know that there's say, cinnamon, in a drink, you don't know where it came from-- Sri Lanka, Indonesia. And that can make all the difference in the flavor. I asked the flavor guys at Sovereign if they could pick out the real Coca-Cola from our formula in a blind taste test. So we marked the little plastic cups which had real Coca-Cola with a Sharpie, just a little dot on the bottom of the cup. The cups with our formula had no dot. Everyone tasted. David, the guy who runs the company, was sure that he was drinking our formula. And then he flipped over the cup and saw-- Meaning he thought our formula was Coca-Cola. Ben and I put on lab coats and we set up a table in aisle 2B of a supermarket one afternoon with bottles of our soda-- that is, the formula from the 1979 newspaper article-- and Coca-Cola. Taste test time. So Ben and I smiled. With each person we would give them our formula first. And then we gave a real Coke second. And before we told people what they were, we asked which they liked better. 60% of the people preferred our formula over Coca-Cola. Though, to be fair to Coca-Cola, people who said they drank a lot of soft drinks, they always preferred the Coke. And when we asked people to guess which of the two drinks was Coca-Cola, to our surprise actually, of the 30 people that we polled, 28 could tell which was Coca-Cola. Our formula was that different. People saw a family resemblance though. There was just one more person that I wanted to taste the soda that we made and look at the recipe. And that was the Coca-Cola's corporation resident expert on the history of the product and its early formulas. I told Phil everything that we knew about the recipe-- the newspaper article it came from, how it matched a recipe deep in his own archives. He was not impressed. Very, very not impressed. We went around and around on this. To me, the fact that the recipe showed up over and over gave it credibility. Coke's inventor John Pemberton was known to have sold the recipe to several different people back in the early days. And the fact that it had appeared in his own notebook in Coke's archive seemed like the clincher. I asked him if anybody at Coca-Cola who had access to the original recipe, which he says they still have, actually checked to see if it matched the one in that notebook. And he politely side-stepped that question and we moved on. So we put it to him. Was the secret formula really a secret? He said that even if somebody cracked the entire manufacturing process, which he said they'd have to do, and produce something very, very close, Coke has this whole of this thing nobody can touch. It's This American Life. I'm Ira Glass. Today's show, "Original Recipe." Stories of people going to great lengths to find the authentic original item. We have arrived at act two of our show. Act two, "Ask not what your handwriting analyst can do for you; ask what you can do for your handwriting analyst." Jake Halpern is the author most recently of the book World's End. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. Hi, it's Ira Glass. Leave a message. Hello, Nancy Updike. You called just like you said. So how may I serve you? Here we are. No. Let me say, first of all, I just want to acknowledge you're in kind of a tough position. I think in any show on radio or television since the media began, when the host goes away, we all want what we're used to. Nobody wants change. Nobody wants the guest host. I acknowledge it is kind of the anti-pep talk. But you are going to be great. You'll be great. Don't think about that part. You know, truthfully I don't own know, Nancy. But I honestly don't want to find out. I'm giving you the keys to the car, and I want you to just obey a few simple rules, and everybody's going to get home safely. OK. So do you have the contractual language in front of you that I left for you to read now and kick off the show? Do you have it there? All right, so let's kick it off. That's great. OK, have fun. Lindsey Dills is 24. She's from a place in southern Georgia called Glynn County, right on the coast. The nearest big town is a partly gentrified, mostly impoverished city called Brunswick. Population 16,000. Though I interviewed her in a prison way upstate. But in her sophomore year of high school, Lindsey started smoking pot. She began working at this bar and restaurant, Spanky's, as a waitress, ran with an older crowd that she met at the restaurant. By senior year she was doing coke in a pretty serious way. She had a 21-year-old boyfriend, which at the time she thought was the coolest thing ever, though now she sees that one differently. Finally, senior year, she quit soccer, which of course, her dad and every other adult in her life tried to talk her out of. And she says, in retrospect, she knows she wasn't coping well. Her home life had been pretty rough when she was little, before and after her parents split up. And now she was self-mutilating, cutting herself with a razor, smoking a lot of pot. And her parents tried to do the right thing and get her treatment for all that. She went into a program for a week or so, more than once. But here's where things took an unusual turn for Lindsey. October 2004, she was 17, her dad was out of town. And she forged two checks, one for $40, one for $60, on her dad's checking account. She cashed them at her job, spent some of the money on drugs. She says he started randomly taking her to be drug tested. And told her that if she failed a drug test, then he'd go to the police about the two forged checks. Lindsey figured out ways to pass the test-- get somebody else's pee, or dilute her own. But finally she fails a test. And her dad followed through on his threat. Her dad declined to be interviewed for the radio. But Lindsey's mom, Vikki Woodard, confirmed that he was hoping that this would be the intervention that would change everything. She had moved from Georgia to South Carolina a month before Lindsey forged the two checks and kept in touch by phone with what was happening. She says her thinking was, Lindsey had just turned 18. It was their last chance. After this-- He rolled the dice hoping that she would agree to a drug treatment program that he found, out of town, away from her friends and everybody who was influencing her to do drugs, and that she'd go there in exchange for dropping the charges. But Lindsey didn't want to go out of town to some drug treatment program that her daddy picked. And then the prosecutor put another option on the table. Drug court. Again, Lindsey's mom, Vikki. That's because Lindsey happened to be at a very unusual drug court. Most drug courts, you're in and out in a year or two. The average program is a year and three months. Occasionally, very, very rarely, somebody is stuck in a drug court for three years. But the drug court run by Judge Amanda Williams operates so differently from others that Lindsey will spend five and a half years in drug court, including 14 months behind bars. And then she's going to spend another five years after that. Six months behind bars-- she's in the middle of that right now-- and four and a half years probation. By the time she's done, it'll be 10 and a half years of her life. This would be Bruce Harvey, a defense attorney who's handled felony drug cases for 33 years all over Georgia. Here's Parag Shah, who was a public defender in Atlanta, author of a guide book to Georgia criminal law called The Code. Both attorneys said that typically two forged checks for $100 bucks, first offense, at most would get your probation. And you'd probably get some sort of alternative program, like a 16-week drug class or a life skills class, without ever going to trial. Of course these were defense attorneys. Maybe prosecutors would see this differently. So I ran the facts of Lindsey's case by the District Attorney for Forsyth County, Penny Penn, who handles the drug court cases there. WBEZ Chicago. It's This American Life, distributed by Public Radio International. I'm Ira Glass. Today on our show we have a story about the kinds of court cases that almost never make the news because the offenses are so small. Two checks forged by a teenager, tiny instances of drug possession or attempts to purchase. But these cases have life-changing consequences because they're being adjudicated in what is possibly the toughest drug court in the country. Before we go any further, there's something that's going to affect what you hear this hour. It was unusually hard for me to get people to talk to me for this story. Over and over I would hear about something that Judge Williams had supposedly said or done, and I was go to the lawyers or litigants involved, and they'd refuse to speak with me, saying they were scared of retaliation. Which to be fair, would probably happen around lots of judges all over the country. In Glynn County, though, it was widespread. Ex-employees of the court, people who'd come up before the judge on divorce proceedings or other business years ago, parents and family members of people who went before Judge Williams. Nobody wanted to cross her. To nobody's surprise, Judge Williams won reelection this fall. It's notoriously difficult to unseat a sitting judge. She had massive name recognition after 20 years on the bench, and she outspent the other candidate 3 to 1. Seven days in jail, that is. Judge Williams has a reputation for yelling from the bench. When the new District Attorney, Jackie Johnson was sworn into office by the judge this August she joked, "Judge Williams heard my first trial. And of course, she yelled at me." I talked to one former drug court counselor who told me he actually quit over this. They'd see the judge lash out at clients, embarrass them and scold them. He came to feel that it was counterproductive, that what the addicts heard was the old punitive message that they were failures and worthless. It set them back. He eventually felt that he couldn't, in good conscience, be part of it. This is West Huddleston, who runs the National Association of Drug Court Professionals, the main organization for 25,000 judges, lawyers and counselors in the nation's 2,400-plus drug courts. He's been working with drug courts since the mid-'90s. He used to be a counselor and a coordinator for one. He says the problem with jail time is that decades of experience shows it doesn't work with addicts. Addicts keep using no matter what terrible things happen to them as a result of using. It's practically the definition of an addict. And so when drug courts use jail time-- and the majority do-- he says it's very sparingly. And only after other sanctions have failed. The official National Association for Drug Court Professionals' guidelines lists seven other possible things courts can do before they resort to jail, including warnings, increased treatment or monitoring, fines, community service, having to watch a whole day of drug court proceedings. The whole point of drug court was to be an alternative to what they called the punitive approach taken by the rest of the criminal justice system, and to replace that with treating and curing the addicts. Terminate her, kick her out of the program. Which would mean serving the full sentence on the original forgery charges, 20 to 24 months. Her isolation cell was just a regular cell in the middle of the normal cell block. Four walls and a door. And sometimes other participants in the drug court would relapse and wind up in that cell block. Brandi Byrd was another drug court participant in the Glynn County jail at the same time. She had also worked at Spanky's, though not at the same time as Lindsey. Weeks went by. Lindsey had no idea what was going to happen or when it was going to happen. Her public defender, Jason Clarke, was no longer with the drug court. And no other public defender came to check on her, she says. She also says that no doctor and no counselor from the drug court ever checked on her. The family, without Lindsey knowing, was trying to get answers from the drug court counselors about when she'd be coming out, about what the plan was, what was happening. Nobody tells them anything, they say. Lindsey's mom, Vikki, up in South Carolina, says as soon as Lindsey went into detention they were told that the judge put her in isolation, that she couldn't have contact with anybody, including the family. There's some things in this story that I cannot confirm. Dr. Jeff Gunderson declined my request to check out the facts of what Lindsey said about him and what he said. I can't confirm that her medication ran out and it was impossible for her to get a refill. I can confirm that Lindsey's drug court counselors did not visit her in jail, though. I was told that it's standard operating procedure in Judge Williams's drug court not to provide any treatment or counseling or even AA or NA meetings in jail, even though the National Association of Drug Court Professionals guidelines say they should. If they didn't know, they were missing out on some crucial information about her. The counselors and Judge Williams also had to know about any antidepressants Lindsey was on because the drug court contract specifies that they had to approve any medications that she used. And, according to court records, Lindsey had been on suicide watch before, two years before, on August 15, 2006. In spite of this, somebody ordered her into a cell for months, in isolation. You may remember Brandi Byrd, the young woman who stood on the toilet and had shouted conversations with Lindsey Dills in the Glynn County jail. How she ended up in drug court is a story that begins one night when she was out with friends. Here's how they got there. Brandi and her family all say that a few months before, Brandi had an operation to remove some precancerous cells that could develop into cervical cancer. That's actually a pretty good summary of the way it works in most courts in Georgia. Brandi's somebody who wishes that she could be a lawyer. She's got a head for it, too. In Glynn County, you wait in jail on any drug charge to the next day that drug court cases come around. And it's just once a week. So Brandi sits in jail for six days before she's put in front of Judge Williams. She was charged with two felony counts, one for each pill. Darvocet is a Schedule IV drug under Georgia law. It's her first offense. She's 22. Worst case, he says, she'd be found guilty and then get probation, and then at the end of it have her record wiped clean. Bruce Harvey, who does drug cases around the state, agreed. Some counties, he said, might do a pre-trial diversion, send you to drug class for 16 weeks. Penny Penn, the District Attorney for Forsyth County, says in her county they would consider somebody like Brandi for pre-trial diversion or for the drug court. OK. That's most places in Georgia. Here's what happened in Judge Williams's courtroom. After six days in jail, no bond permitted, Brandi goes before the judge. Brandi's grandmother, Ann Harris, who raised her, came to court too. She told me she knew Judge Williams before all this. But once they got to court, the message from everyone was the same. The public defender told Brandi, a drug court official told Mrs. Harris-- From the bench, according to the court transcript, Judge Williams tells Brandi that her options are to go to trial, and if she's found guilty she'll get a year in detention plus four years probation. Judge Williams tells her that that's the minimum sentence her court gives on any drug charge. In a detention center, Brandi asks. Yeah, Judge Williams says. In a lock down detention. It's called a boot camp or, then the assistant district attorney jumps in, quote, "Where you pick strawberries all day. I mean, if you eat one, you'll get in trouble." This is attorney Mary Helen Moses, one of the team of lawyers in Glynn County trying to unseat Judge Williams. She was the candidate who ran against the judge in the fall election. So in Judge Williams's court, there's no probation for anybody, even first offenders. No bond before you come in front of her. Then a $15,000 bond after you see her. A minimum sentence of 20 to 24 months in detention for most offenses, 12 months for minor ones. We couldn't find any drug court in Georgia that does anything like it to prod people into their programs. Again, Brandi Byrd. As you'd expect, that didn't go down so well. Take Brandi's very first counseling session, a group session with about 20 other women. Which brings up another question. Should a first time offender like Brandi-- or Lindsey for that matter-- be in a drug court program at all? Again, West Huddleston, former drug counselor and coordinator. Now the head of the National Association of Drug Court Professionals. When he describes the target population for drug court, note how different it sounds from Brandi, who  only signed up because Judge Williams, her drug court employees, and the public defender made her feel she had no choice. And he says that when people who don't have long histories of addiction and criminality are thrown into a program that is designed for people who do-- these intensive treatment programs with all their monitoring and curfews and consequences-- I have no way to judge whether or not Brandi Byrd was truly an addict. But she was a low-level offender and she absolutely became defiant. She didn't obey the terms of her drug court contract. Never bought in. Continued to drink. Got picked up on a DUI. Was sent to inpatient treatment, fled it, vanished from the program for 11 months, and eventually was kicked out. And then, served time for the two felony counts on the two Darvocet. Which was 20 months in detention. She just got out this December. She still has three years of probation, including regular drug tests. She's not allowed to drink, either. It's important to note here that many people get through Judge Williams's drug court just fine. When I visited the court one day this fall, she didn't yell at anybody. If anything, she was encouraging, like an unusually maternal high school coach. Wandering up to people during the break, I met a guy named Perry Burton, who's been in and out of the drug court program for four years. He told me that when he first started, quote, "I hated that lady. I hated that lady from the bottom of my heart. But she got me off drugs. She's helped me more than anyone. She's got a heart. She's brought me close to my kids." My best guess is that this was completely sincere. At the time she probably believed that. When I later learned otherwise, and sent her details about how her court was different, and asked for an interview about those differences, by then she'd stopped answering my calls. As for her success rate, this fall the drug court's clinical director, Steven Mansfield provided me with numbers showing that the graduation rate for the Glynn Camden drug courts was 48%. Below the national average and way lower than successful programs. Low enough, one expert said, it showed something was going wrong. In May of 2001, Charlie McCullough went with some friends to a motel room to buy drugs, in Charlie's case LSD, and they were caught in a police sting. He got the same treatment that you've heard about. He was told that he needed a $15,000 bond to get out of jail, or he could do drug court and be released right away. Drug court seemed like a good deal. So Charlie enters the drug program, quits drugs. He'd been smoking pot every day, he says. And he liked Judge Williams. This Charlie's lawyer, Jim Jenkins. He's one of the few lawyers who's ever come before Judge Williams who would talk to me on tape. And the reason that he did it is that he's a private attorney who does not live in Glynn County. Most of his practice is elsewhere. He says Charlie did great in the program. She, the drug counselor, not Judge Williams. They took a third test. Same result. The next week it was a day when all the Phase Four participants were supposed to attend drug court. Judge Williams asked Charlie to take a polygraph and Charlie says, "Sure." And then she does not give him a polygraph. Alicia is not called as a witness to settle this question about the lid. And then, Judge Williams sentences Charlie to 17 days. In Charlie's treatment file it explains that the 17 days is comprised of two things. In any drug court, that would be an unusually long penalty. 17 days for a first bad drug screen. But Charlie was also sent back to Phase Two of the program, which meant that he would be spending an extra year and a half in Judge Williams's drug court. His time in drug court just suddenly jumped from two years to three and a half. In fact, I've seen orders that Judge Williams has issued where she instructs a 22-year-old woman to move in with her grandmother and grandfather, the people who apparently turned her in to the authorities in the first place, and, quote, "Follow any rules of their household." She ordered the same woman, Alyssa Branch, to go to a doctor and, quote, "Upon attending her medical appointment, defendant shall comply with all recommendations of Dr. Gowen. Should further medical procedures become necessary, defendant shall undergo said medical procedures." And on June 9, 2010, the same woman, Alyssa Branch, is ordered to inpatient treatment for a year at a place called Bridges of Hope with, quote, "No outside visitation passes, no visitation to the facility from any outside persons, and no contact with any outside persons." If this woman wished to contest any of these judge's orders, Jim Jenkins believes, she has no recourse. A month later he missed his first group meeting and a warrant was issued for his arrest. It took him four years to get out of the program. He's clean now and doing great. He has a wife and two kids, lives in Virginia, builds bridges for a living. According to the National Association of Drug Court Professionals, about 150 of the nation's drug courts do not apply the principles of the drug court model correctly and are not having good outcomes as a result. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. One thing about living under a dictator, there's stuff you have to ignore or suffer the consequences. A decade ago in Egypt, you could get thrown in prison for suggesting publicly that the president was laying the groundwork for his own son to replace him someday, which, by the way, he was. When a member of the Egyptian parliament implied on television that the military might have been extensively involved in the assassination of former president Anwar Sadat-- Michelle Dunne was a Mideast specialist at the State Department and the White House. She lived in Egypt. She speaks Arabic. She's now at the Carnegie Endowment for International Peace. She edits the Arab Reform Bulletin. She says that back when Hosni Mubarak was running Egypt, the way he used the intelligence services and security forces, everyone was forced to report on everyone else to the authorities. She knew whenever she would be with anybody in Egypt, the would get a phone call afterwards asking what the conversation was about. That's changing now, she says. She was there last week and says Egyptians are starting to feel like they don't have to rat people out anymore. As the Arab Spring has reminded everybody and made abundantly clear, we Americans have been and still are allies with some terrible leaders, not just in Egypt but across the Mideast. So, she says, usually there was no strategy to tie human rights changes that we wanted to see to things that the Egyptians wanted from us. Instead, she'd gather examples of people being jailed and treated unfairly. And she and the head of the Political Section at the US Embassy would then go in to discuss-- it was kind of a routine thing-- go in to discuss these with Egyptian officials. President Bush, she says, did have a period of really pushing the Egyptian government on human rights. In 2002, President Bush withheld $133 million in aid because Mubarak's government had jailed a democracy advocate, Saad Ibrahim. But it worked. Ibraham finally was freed. President Bush pushed for freer elections and those happened in 2005. But after the election results put members of the Muslim Brotherhood into 20% of parliament seats, Mubarak cracked down and the Bush administration stopped pushing them so hard. Then when President Obama came in, he actually cut back-- he cut the funding by half for the remaining pro-democracy initiatives that the US still had going. And we've paid the price for that, she says. Because it just contributed to the feeling that the Egyptian people now have that we were not on their side. Lisa Pollak is one of the producers of our show. It's This American Life. I'm Ira Glass. Each week on our show we choose a theme, of course, bringing you different kinds of stories on that theme. Today's show, See No Evil, stories of people choosing to bury their heads in the sand, choosing to look at the other way. We've arrived at Act Two of our show. Act Two, Denying The Invisible. Some of the interviews in this book deal a lot on the see no evil aspect of what happened at Chernobyl-- how the government and even the people on the ground dealing with the emergency would turn a blind eye to the truth of what they were dealing with, because the Soviet system just wasn't set up to handle the truth. And so for most people in the middle of the crisis, at many points it was just much easier to look the other way. Kelly Coffield Park, reading an interview with an environmental inspector from the area near Chernobyl at the time the nuclear accident there. It's an excerpt from this book of unusually vivid interviews called Voices From Chernobyl, by reporter Svetlana Alexievich and translated by Keith Gessin. David Kestenbaum is part of the Planet Money team. You can hear him on their free podcast at npr.org/money. Well, our program was produced today by Jonathan Menjivar with Alex Blumberg, Ben Calhoun, Jane Feltes, Sarah Koenig, Lisa Pollak, Robyn Semian, and Alissa Shipp. Seth Lind is our production manager. Emily Condon's our office manager. Jen Berman's filling in as our West Coast producer. And indeed, that's what it's like. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. I was surprised this week during this interview I was doing, I sat down to talk to the guy-- Jim McManus is his name-- whose book, Positively Fifth Street, is the book that actually started me playing poker years ago. And we were going to do this interview about great poker hands. And you know that saying, know when to hold them, know when to fold them? This interview was going to be about moments when players showed an almost supernatural ability, an uncanny power to know whether they should get out of a hand before they're crushed. One of his books is actually a history of poker called Cowboys Full-- he knows all kinds of poker lore. And so Jim shows up with four examples, and three of them were poker hands. Of course, this is a perfect week to talk about politics as poker. All this week, Barack Obama's been in a high stakes game of chicken with Congressional Republicans over shutting down the government, each side firing what I guess Jim would call testing bets, insisting on their version of the federal budget, demanding the other side would fold. Each side calling the other's bluff day, after day, after day. Neither side willing to toss in their cards. Jim calls it the major hand in his life because it's the hand that made the most serious players in the world take notice of him. This was back in 2000. Jim was covering the World Series of Poker for Harper's Magazine, and he entered the tournament, his first one ever. And he was terrified. He actually ended up at the final table, walking away with a quarter million dollars, which would have been impossible without this hand against one of his poker heroes, TJ Cloutier. So, in this crucial life changing moment, Jim's across the table from TJ, and that is the hand that Jim gets-- ace, king. Jim bets, just like it says to do in the book. Everybody folds but TJ, who raises. Jim says that he knew the relevant passage from TJ's book so well that he could nearly recite it. And he knew that he should either raise or he should fold. And then he does neither. He matches TJ's bet-- he calls-- thinking that TJ is probably bluffing, but too scared to raise him. Next time TJ bets, Jim calls again. And the next time after that, which puts Jim all in. All his chips are now in the pot. And in the end, when all the cards come down, neither he nor TJ even has a pair. A mistake, because given the aggressiveness of TJ's bets, TJ very well could have had at least a little pair. even a pair of twos would have beaten Jim. But Jim was such an amateur at that point, he didn't fold the way an experienced player would. That's a rub. It's hard to know when to fold them and when to hold them, much less when to walk away and when to run. And even when you figure it out, even when you suss out exactly the right thing to do, the cards can come down in some crazy way that favors your opponent and you lose anyway. We have four stories of people navigating all of that away from the poker table. Stay with us. Act One, Is This War or Is This Hearts? Dave Dickerson has this story of laying down his cards, which includes one of the most exemplary pieces of parenting I think I have ever heard of. Dave Dickerson. He's the author of a book of short stories like this one called House of Cards. Act Two, Kings Do Not Fold. What's a dictator? Yes, an absolute ruler, yes, a tyrant, yes to all that. But a dictator is also, in the vast majority of cases, someone who is absolutely, fundamentally not leaving. 30 years in office, 40 years in office, these are not people who know when it is time to step aside. Witness the last few months of news from the Mideast, which Nancy Updike has some thoughts about. Nancy Updike's one of the producers of our show. Coming up, they tried to make me go to rehab, and I said, no, no, no, I will go to Minnesota. That is in a minute, from Chicago Public Radio and Public Radio International when our program continues. It's This American Life. I'm Ira Glass. Each week on our show, of course, we choose a theme, bringing you different kinds of stories on that theme. Today's show, Know When To Fold 'Em, stories of people who wait way too long before folding their cards, dropping out, stepping aside, stepping down. Sometimes, to be fair, out of sheer confusion as to what's best. We've arrived at act three of our show. Marc Sanchez is a producer from Minnesota Public Radio, he normally works on a feature called Minnesota Sounds. Act Four, Solitaire and Everything's Wild. Now this story of tenacity and not giving up, and then, suddenly, I would say kind of heroically, giving up completely, and laying down the cards in an unprecedented, kind of amazing way. So this team led by Marcelo dos Santos would head out on these missions to find this guy. And they were scared that if ranchers or developers get to him first, they'll do to him what they usually do-- kill him. The team wants to reach the guy and then figure out a safe place where other tribes live that maybe they could relocate him to. Then, in late 1996, they got their first break. Satellite photos showed a clearing in the rain forest where there was no reason for a clearing to exist. When they go there, they find the remains of a village, over a dozen huts. The team assumed that everybody in the village had been slaughtered, which can make the guy even more wary of outsiders, less interested in being found. So you figure, a guy on foot who's technologically still somewhere in the Bronze Age, maybe, versus modern people with satellite tracking, and vehicles, and expertise-- how long could he evade them? Two years. It takes two full years before they spot him again. And they are tenacious. They do not give up, because they feel like time is running out. They've got to establish a relationship with this guy so he trusts them, before anybody else finds him and kills him. So they not only fold their hand, they change the game. At the team's urging, the Brazilian government did this thing it had never done before. It set aside 31 square miles of forest for this one guy. In Rondonia, which was going through rapid development, this was incredibly controversial, and there was a political fight over it. FUNAI personnel assigned to the project became such lightning rods that one after another had to be replaced. Paulo looked down and realized that he was standing right near the lip of a hole that the Indian had dug and lined with sharp spikes to capture animals. The Indian was trying to warn him. The Indian didn't want him hurt. All this led Monte to look into the research on what extreme isolation does to people. He says there've been a few studies. And they show that it's not how isolated you are, it's how isolated you feel. It's a matter of perception. Different people in the same situation perceive it differently. He says isolation also tends to make people more spiritual, which then makes them feel less alone. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. The way I always heard the story was that Van Halen had something in the contract that they used when they toured that said that everywhere that they went, in every city, in every dressing room on their tour, there had to be a bowl of M&Ms;, and that the brown M&Ms; had to be removed. It's kind of a well-known story, I think. And the way that I understood it is that it showed what divas rock stars could be, that any whim that they had would have to be met, no matter how petty. You hate brown M&Ms;? Poof! They will cease to exist in your world. This is John. I asked him to come and talk about this with me again today, here on the radio. He told me that the music industry name for what we were discussing was the contract rider. And this, Flansburgh says, was what was so ingenious about the brown M&Ms.; Van Halen had this huge setup with lots of gear, and if the local promoter didn't carefully read the contract rider, stuff could collapse. It could be dangerous. So the brown M&Ms; were like the canary in the coal mine. The contract rider said the brown M&Ms; were not supposed to be there. If they were there, look out. Well, today on our radio show we have stories of the fine print. We dive into the fine print in places where the fine print really, really matters. Act one of our show, Chana Joffe-Walt explains how the fine print may be the biggest obstacle to getting rid of our acne. Act two, David Rakoff brings us the fine print that could fix what therapy fails to. Act three, Nancy Updike has the story of fine print happening at a place you may never have expected it. Act four, Susan Burton rereads the fine print that changed her childhood. Stay with us. Act One. One Pill Two Pill, Red Pill Blue Pill. Let's start today in a place that is swimming in fine print, the insurance business. President Obama said during the health care debates that if we all understood our health care, it would save money. And the problem with the fine print is that it makes it hard to tell which pill is the red one and which one is the blue one, as Chana Joffe-Walt explains. Chana Joffe-Walt is a member of the Planet Money team. That story first aired in 2009. Since then, the Solodyn Patient Access Card has been discontinued. It's now part of a different program, the Medicis MediSAVE Program, which is more of a package deal that allows you to get a few other drugs cheaper as well. We've arrived at act two of our show. Act Two, Occupancy May Be Revoked Without Notice. This next bit of fine print was brought to us by David Rakoff. David Rakoff is the author of several books, including his most recent, Half Empty. It's This American Life. I'm Ira Glass. Each week on our show, we choose a theme, bring you different kinds of stories on that theme. Today's show, Fine Print. You know, usually most of us try to just skip the fine print. We don't read the rental car agreements, or the software license end-user agreements. We just click, I agree. Today on our show, we have stories where the fine print has real consequences. We have arrived at act three of our show. Nancy Updike is one of the producers of our show. Since that story first aired in 2009, Maziar Bahari, the writer for Newsweek whose confession that Nancy read, has been released. Act Four, May Be Hazardous to Children. Susan Burton lives in New York. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. This past Monday, a guy named Dan Curry got into his car to drive across the country from the East Coast to California alone. And to pass the time, he brought along 16 hours of Spanish language lessons on CD. I reached him in his car on Wednesday. Sunday, in suburban New Jersey, eight-year-old Ruby Melman went out with her mom and dad to try, this was her second attempt, to learn to ride a bike. Her dad ran along beside her, holding the handle bars. It took about a half an hour for her to get it. Saturday, on the north side of Chicago, my friend Beau O'Reilly, age 56, is getting on a bike again for the first time since he had both his knees replaced. I have to say we are kind of a sight. Beau, with his huge shock of grey hair. Me, trotting along beside him with the microphone. And then behind us, Beau's girlfriend, Judith, chasing after us down the sidewalk with his cane. At Ground Zero this week, on Thursday, President Obama laid a wreath. A woman named Theodosha Alexander was out on the sidewalk. She'd worked as a temp in the Twin Towers all through the '80s and '90s, knew tons of people who'd worked there. Since 9/11, she's generally avoided Lower Manhattan because of that. But she came down on Thursday, hoping it would feel different now that Osama bin Laden was dead. That same day, Thursday, at the hospital that US forces set up at Bagram Air Base to deal with US casualties in Afghanistan, there was no question that we are, of course, a nation that is still at war. Doctor Wade Gordon, one of three orthopedic surgeons there, says that it's been pretty steady the last six months, including this week, with Osama bin Laden gone. So much has happened this week. What else? In the Grand Canyon on Wednesday, high school freshman were on a class trip. Sunday, in a bar in New York City, patrons raised their glasses in remembrance of the bartender who ran the joint and lived upstairs til he was 90, Jack Loftus. This is a neighborhood where guys drank a lot and got into fights. Jack was this six-foot-three fatherly figure who kept things calm. This guy, Tommy Pryor, said his own dad was a big drinker who Jack knew how to keep in line. I'm Ira Glass. Every week in our show, of course, we choose a theme and bring you different kinds of stories on that theme. Today, we are trying something we have never tried before. The theme this week is, "This Week." Everything you're going to hear this hour has happened in the last seven days. We wanted big things and small things, the most important things happening in the country, and the most important things happening to people far from Washington, D.C., far from the network news cameras. A portrait of seven days in the life of our country. On WBEZ Chicago, it's a special edition of This American Life, distributed by Public Radio International. Seven days in 60 minutes. Stay with us. We were all worried planning this week's show, coming into the week with no tape gathered at all. We worried like, OK what if there is no news? What if nothing interesting happens? And then, Sunday Night, it was a small bit of news. That's President Obama, of course, Sunday night. One of our producers, Sarah Koenig was in a college town, State College, Pennsylvania, where she heard the noise of students shouting and blowing horns and what sounded like fire crackers on Sunday night. And since she wasn't watching TV, she had no idea what this was about. She thought maybe they had won a big game or something. She actually called the cops, who also at that point had no idea what it was about. And all week, she kept thinking about the hugeness of the students' reaction. Sarah Koenig in State College, Pennsylvania. In Egypt, on Monday, the day after President Obama announced Osama bin Laden was killed, out on the street, it was kind of a non-event. No demonstrations. Yes, the Muslim Brotherhood issued a statement. Yes, obviously people talked about the news. But that was it. It was a normal work day. Crazy traffic. Lot of smoking. Everybody glued to their cellphones. And for all of us wondering what does the death of Osama bin Laden mean for the Mideast, this was the reaction in the most influential, most populous, Arab country in the world. A fourth of all Arabs live in Egypt. Our producer Nancy Updike went by Tahrir Square in the afternoon. Nancy Updike in Cairo. Here in United States this week, despite the President calling for a moment of unity, democracy still seems to meet people at each other's throats. Take this incident in Arizona. This was not big news at all. The Tucson Unified School District is considering something that you wouldn't think, from the outside, would be something that people could get quite this mad about. The issue was whether the Mexican-American studies program in high school will be turned from a core credit to an elective. That's it. People who oppose that change say that if it's going to be an elective, then the many at-risk kids who do well in that course, whose GPAs are helped by that course, who basically are the target population for that course, they will never take the course. So the course will miss its target population. The police move in to arrest her. And then, things go kind of crazy. The crowd starts chanting. People start standing on their chairs. At this point, the teacher who was recording this thing you're hearing right now, Sarah Bromer, says, "There are all these students in the room. Suddenly, they show up-- 10 of them with white T-shirts, and duct tape over their mouths. The police then move like a wave across the room, flushing out Lupe and lots of the protesters, and most of the media actually. Sarah, who is recording this, ducks between the chairs and then she sees down there between the chairs the woman who had moved into that seat next to her, that reserved seat, who turns out to be a petite woman in conservative, professional clothes. Sarah works her way back over to her seat next to the woman. At one point, the Iranian woman asked Sarah, "OK, if this is a democracy, and if you can actually vote out these people if you don't like them, why is everybody being so rude? Why are they yelling so much?" It's a good question.  This American Life, I'm Ira Glass. Each weekend on our show, of course, we choose a theme. This week the theme is, "This Week." We are spending the hours hearing about large things and very small things that happened these past seven days. Sunday, in Oakland, California, Shirley Everett-Dicko was closing up Charcoal Park, which was a very hard to describe combination store, African-American history museum, community center where kids hung out and came for movies and pizza Friday nights. Shirley has had to place for two years. She's been waiting for a miracle that has not come yet to help pay the rent. And she said on Sunday that lots of people driving by saw the moving trucks and people carrying stuff out and chose that moment to stop in. On the other side of the country on Saturday, it was moving day for Gabe and Kevin, boyfriends moving in together. Neither of them had ever done this-- had a boyfriend and moved in with him, ever. Eric and Roz are 21 and 23 in Stevens Point, Wisconsin. So they have been prepping. Eric made a list of talking points-- what he figured his parents would say, how he would respond. And Thursday, the day after the concert, I checked in with them again to see how it went. Roz said that it was hard to enjoy Elton John she was so stressed out about this conversation they were going to have, which unfortunately, they did not start until midnight-- that wasn't the original plan-- until midnight in his parents house, before hitting the road to return to Stevens Point. So, they finally broke the news-- they want to move in together. They each gave a little talk about why, and waited. But during our interview, Eric's mom left him a long voicemail that he discovered when he got out of the studio. It is not over. His mom thinks they're rushing into it. It could ruin their relationship. June 1, moving day, is coming up very, very soon. On Monday of this week, in South Portland, Maine, the two grave diggers at the Mount Pleasant Cemetery, Eugene Rand and Bill True-- they're also best friends by the way-- held a work stoppage, and then ended the work stoppage-- that's what you're hearing right now. The work stoppage was to protest the fact that the 137-year-old cemetery was finally going to modernize. They were going to finally buy a machine to dig graves, a back hoe, to replace one of the two guys. It could take all day to dig a grave by hand. They hit rocks. It's hard to keep the sides straight and square. It's hard work. And here's something that the reporter who talked to these guys, Clay [? Boten ?], learned that I had no idea about. The first foot is real easy, Eugene says. The second foot gets tough. Your third foot is killing. The fourth foot, you're ready to quit. And squaring off the bottom, that can be half a day by itself, he says. You really didn't see it in the headlines, but all this week, people across the south were still dealing with the aftermath of last week's tornadoes. That's not over, not even close. Official estimates are that there were at least 300 tornadoes. At least 329 people have died across seven states, according to the Associated Press. And a week in, you would think that there would be this agreed on set of facts. Not so. David Kestenbaum learned this down in Tuscaloosa, Alabama. David Kestenbaum as part of our Plante Money team. All the songs that we're featuring in today's show by the way, were released this week. This one is by an Alabama rap group, G-side featuring Chris Lee, about the tornado. Thursday night of this week, the first Republican presidential primary debate was held in Greenville, South Carolina. Most of the political world treated it as a joke. The candidates with the best poll numbers skipped it. No Mitt Romney. No Mike Huckabee. Not even Donald Trump. One Republican called the debate "a beauty contest where everybody is ugly." Robert Smith is another member of our Planet Money team, Planet Money is a co-production of our show and NPR News. You can get their free podcasts at NPR.org/money. Here's somebody else who had a big week this week. After graduating from the University of Florida in Gainesville on Saturday, Laura got into her car to make a trip that she really hadn't hoped she would be making four years ago. She didn't have a job. So she was moving back in with her parents. 1.6 million people will graduate from college over the next month into what is still a very tough economy. This week, also happens to be the one year anniversary of when our own intern, Eric Mennel, graduated from college and made the exact same trip to move back in with his parents, jobless. So we sent him along for the ride with Laura. Eric Mennel is our show's intern. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. Here's what it's like to hold political office in the current economy. In the last year, Jay Nixon, the governor of Missouri, has done a steady stream of events announcing new jobs in this state, a new IBM office with 800 jobs, a [UNINTELLIGIBLE] expansion that'll create 400 new jobs. And in November, he went to a plant in Macon, Missouri, that makes fishing reels to announce not hundreds of jobs, or dozens of jobs, but eight jobs, eight. He did a press event for eight jobs. This is what it's come to, America. You can hire your very first employee and the governor shows up with TV cameras. You can't be politics in politics in America right now without promising people jobs. Right? You know what I'm talking about? You've heard this from like every politician in America?  That would be, of course, Newark Mayor Cory Booker, Alaska Senator Lisa Murkowski, Democrats Nancy Pelosi and Harry Reid, Florida Governor Rick Scott, and Donald Trump. In fact, if anyone these days brings up any subject besides jobs, people complain why aren't we talking about jobs? This is Rush Limbaugh, last week, when they Obama administration was still deciding whether or not to release photos of the dead Osama bin Laden. Or on the opposite side of the political divide, on the Rachel Maddow Show, Dean Baker, for the Center for Economic and Policy Research asks here why are we focusing so much on the deficit? Or just to show the all-purpose usefulness of this trope, here's Republican Congressman David Rivera being questioned about an investigation into his campaign finances. The interviewer tells him, See how easy? Act One, the Government Move my Cheese? All right, One of the big ways that politicians used to create jobs, the way that FDR did it back in the '30s, put more people on the government payroll, build dams, build roads, spend, and spend, and spend. Nobody, nobody with any power anyway, seems to be talking about doing that. But there are all sorts of things that politicians are doing to create jobs, only they're jobs in the private sector. Chana Joffe-Walt explains how. Chana Joffe-Walt, she's one of our Plant Money team. Planet Money is a co-production of our program and NPR News. Tuesday, Holland, Michigan. Deborah Ozga leads five people through a sea of cubicles to be interviewed for call center jobs at Novo 1. People on headsets look up and watch them pass. Not long ago, that was them. The facility has gone from ten employees last summer to 315 as of Tuesday. Novo 1 got a $1 million grant from the federal government and $115,000 tax abatement from the city to locate here in Holland to create those jobs. She's explains that it's a job where you log in and out every time you take a break or go to the bathroom. The computers and phones are monitored, that you pay an $80 deposit for your headset taken from your paycheck in two installments, that it is a very structured job for people who  thrive in a structured environment. This woman was the oldest in the group, and the only one in a pantsuit, had one of those executive, leather, notebook, folder, portfolio things with her, and seemed like a shoe-in. Once that gauntlet of an answer had been hurled, in her downtime she simply does more work, what's everyone else supposed to say? Touche. Where does anybody go from there? When Deborah asked the group how they feel about working in a place that's so regimented with strict attendance policies the way Nova 1 has, again they're being interviewed, what are they going to say?  Debbie did two group interviews on Tuesday, 13 people in all. And a few hours after they left, Deborah sat down at her office for the moment of truth. This, of course, is John. He's 21, worked at a Pizza Hut, sold some vacuum cleaners on commission, worked at the mall during holidays. He has never made over $8 an hour. So he was pretty excited. This is Heather who's 30, worked at the photo studio in a Walmart for five years, but was laid off a year and half ago, collected unemployment which ran out in March. She and John start work May 23. Adam Davidson and Julie Snyder. Act Four, Be Cool, Stay in School. Oh well. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life.  A few months ago, all of us here at This American Life heard that there's this test that they give to determine if somebody is a psychopath. And we thought, we want to take that. So we asked a forensic psychologist, Dr. David Bernstein, who gives this test all the time, to administer the test to us. He took us each into a room, gave us about an hour of questions.  Now, to be clear, Dr. Bernstein gave us the shorter version of the psychopath test, and he was not as rigorous as he would have been with real potential psychopaths. For instance, he didn't check police records to independently verify everything that each one of us said. Because, of course, we did not expect to find a psychopath on our staff. Though, to be honest, it wasn't until Dr. Bernstein actually arrived at our office and started administering these things that we really, I think, all fully understood just how far gone a true psychopath is. He explained to us a psychopath has no empathy at all, no sense of mercy, no conscience. They don't experience love.  But you work with people all the time. Think of any group of people that you know well. Friends, relatives, your state's congressional delegation. And sometimes you see them and the thought crosses your mind, OK, this person isn't a psychopath, but there's tendencies. There's a little note of something. And, of the people on the staff who took the test-- that's Julie, Jonathan, me, Sarah, Jane, Ben, Robyn, and Nancy-- we all did have our suspicions.  The test, if you want to know, asks about your family, whether you've been in love, your favorite and least favorite things about love, what kind of employee you are, plus these general questions that really make you think about what a psychopath is. Like, have you done crazy or dangerous things for fun? Do you think people are easy to con or manipulate? Do people tell you-- this one's sort of scary-- do people tell you that you have a bad temper?  So, when we were all sitting around talking after we took the test, still waiting to get our scores, talking about whether we had been nervous taking it, there was one more person besides Jane and Robyn that everybody thought might score at least a couple points on the psychopath scale. Well, today on our radio show, what it is in me that the people I work with see as possibly psychopathic. And two of our favorite contributors, Alix Spiegel and the very funny Jon Ronson, each has been spending lots of time investigating the psychopath test, figuring out what it can tell us and what it cannot tell us. It's a test that's used in criminal justice systems all over the world. They explain why that may be worrisome. That, and of course, our scores. Who on our staff scored the highest on the psychopath test, me, Jane, Robyn, or some yet-to-be-named dark horse? Stay with us.  Act One, Underachievement Test.  Alix Spiegel. She's a science correspondent for NPR News. Coming up, the positive side of being a psychopath. Jon Ronson on how being a psychopath can help you in your business. That's in a minute, from Chicago Public Radio and Public Radio International, when our program continues.  This American Life. I'm Ira Glass. Today's show is all about the psychopath test, created by Bob Hare, used around the world by courtrooms, and prisons, and this week by us as well. We took the test. We've arrived at Act Two of our show. Act Two, King of the Forest.  Jon Ronson, reading an excerpt from his new book, which is one of the inspirations for today's program, called The Psychopath Test.  Act three, The Results are In.  This is Robyn.  This, by the way, is our show's senior producer, Julie Snyder.  That's Jane, who didn't want to be number one.  In the end, the final tally was Robyn with four votes, Jane with three, I had one. And Nancy, in a surprise move, I have to say, voted for herself.  Then, our forensic psychologist, David Bernstein, joined us. He had actually heard us talking about how worried we were about our scores from the other room.  Dr. Bernstein explained to us that the way that the test is scored, for each of the possible psychopathic traits that you could have, you could get a zero, a one, or a two.  This is the thing I think we wouldn't have understood as well if we hadn't actually gone through the trouble of taking the test ourselves, is just how categorically different psychopaths are from the rest of us. Dr. Bernstein joked that it's a lifelong commitment. Even the person who we thought would be the most likely to score a few points in the psychopath test, Robyn, at her most antisocial moment, stealing the teacher's manual in junior high school, apparently failed to do what any self-respecting, lacking-in-empathy psychopath would do. This next recording is from when Robyn took the test.  That is the mm-hm of I am bored. That's the mm-hm that you say when you're thinking, you people are not psychopaths.  Well, our program was produced today by Jane Feltes, with the zero-scoring staff of Alex Blumberg, Ben Calhoun, Sarah Koenig, Jonathan Menjivar, Lisa Pollak, Robyn Semien, Alissa Shipp, and Nancy Updike. Our senior producer is Julie Snyder. Production help from Eric Mennel. Seth Lind is our production manager. Emily Condon's our office manager. Jen Berman is filling in as our west coast producer.  I'm Ira Glass. Back next week, with more stories of This American Life. When I sat down to interview this guy, Bill Tobin, he made this request that I don't think anybody's ever made with me in all the years that I've been recording interviews for the radio. That's what's so insidious about this kind of old boys' network, is that it pulls in bad people and good ones also. You kind of have to take part if you want to stick around. You're with them or against them. The cop who told him this story really believed that. Well, today on our radio show, we have two stories. One is about people who do not want to go along with the old boy network. The other is about people who very obediently do go along with it. And I'm just going to, before we get these started. I'm just going to give you a moment here to guess which of these two groups of people, the ones who go along and the ones who don't go along, are now sitting judges in Chicago. Act One, Messing With the Bull. A little over a year ago, in a small west Texas town called Kermit, two nurses were accused of something very strange. They were accused of harassing a doctor. The harassment, basically, was that they complained to the Texas Medical Board, saying that this doctor was performing odd procedures and putting patients in danger. The nurses were fired for this, and they were arrested, and they were facing 10 years in prison. Coming up, how a confidential letter ends up in the hands of exactly the people that it is supposed to be kept confidential from, and what kinds of things can happen as a result of that. Saul Elbein's story continues, from Chicago Public Radio and Public Radio International, when our program continues. Saul Elbein is a reporter in Austin, Texas. He reported a version of this story for The Texas Observer. Act Two, Donkey See, Donkey Do. Well, now we turn from people defying the old boys' network in their town to people bowing before it. The people in this case, lawyers who want to be judges in the city of Chicago. Chicago is going through some changes lately. They have a new mayor who's not named Richard Daley, which hasn't happened very often during the last 50 years. That's Abdon Pallasch. The political reporter is probably the leading chronicler of this living remnant of the old Chicago machine. He's covered it since 1996, in recent years for the Chicago Sun-Times. He says it's not entirely a show. Often, there are decisions to make. They have to choose among several politically connected candidates for a few slots. And the main quality that they're looking for? And so, when Abdon wrote about the 2003 meeting to choose which judges were going to go onto the Democratic ticket, he noted that nearly all of the 25 judge wannabes began their presentations with the same first sentence. Over his years covering this, Abdon has seen a change. Various constituency groups-- minorities, women-- have demanded judgeships. And they have gotten slated by the Democratic Party. Abdon says that the committeemen point to the diversity on the Chicago bench as one of the advantages of slating judges this way. And since Abdon started writing about the meeting, and committeemen started seeing how it came off in the newspaper, they have made some adjustments. Not that that stops them, he says, from still doing things like Abdon saw them do in 2009, putting in the well-connected Pamela Hill Veal onto the ticket for appellate judge despite a bad bar association rating. And despite being scolded by the very appeals court she was trying to get onto. The one way that the Chicago Party Judicial candidates lack diversity, he says, is that there's still nobody on it without clout. Abdon Pallasch, political reporter for the Chicago Sun-Times. We called 12 judges and former judicial candidates for comment. 11 did not return our calls. One told us he was very grateful to his committeemen. If not for the committeemen, he said, he never would have been able to become a judge. Our program was produced today by Sarah Koenig, with Alex Blumberg, Ben Calhoun, Jane Feltes, Jonathan Menjivar, Lisa Pollak, Robyn Semien, Alissa Shipp, and Nancy Updike. Our senior producer is Julie Snyder. Production help from Eric Mennel. Music help from Jessica Hopper. Seth Lind is our production manager. Emily Condon's our office manager. Jen Berman's filling in as our west coast producer. I'm Ira Glass, back next week with more stories of This American Life. Elena's dad moved to China, but here's the kind of thing that he does. On Christmas Eve every year, Elena and her mom drive from Madison, Wisconsin, to her grandmother's down in Chicago.  A recent email began comparing the temperatures in Wisconsin with temperatures in Illinois, and warning her that quote "the greater danger will lie in the colder Wisconsin portion, hazardously slipping from water to ice and back." Elena read me the letter. You can't that? "Let the fools and cowboys roar on to their wreckage." In case you're wondering, when Elena got this letter, she had been driving in snow and ice for over a decade. Dads, man. We guys can have a hard time reaching out and telling our kids we love them. Take Jessica, whose father, a farmer who didn't really show his feelings much through physical affection. One day, when she was around 14, out of the blue walked up to her, and started patting her on the shoulder. And she says, soon he was doing this all the time. He did this every day to her. She asked him to stop, he wasn't able to stop. She couldn't understand this behavior. And then she found out from her mom that her dad had been listening to a show on Christian radio, she thinks it was probably James Dobson, and he heard somebody on the show give the advice that people in your family need to be touched a certain number of times per day in order to feel loved. And this was how he was going to do it. Still, guys want to reach out to their kids, right? In 2005, when Rachel was about to head off to college in New York, one night her family's sitting around watching TV-- An emergency terrorist attack kit. So it comes time to go to school, Rache's dad packs all the gear into a nondescript three by three cardboard box, seals it up tightly with tape. Writes "Winter Coats" on the side so as not attract any attention, you know, from the wrong element. And then he sends Rachel off to college in the city that is, to be fair, probably the nation's most likely target for any terrorist attack. And he gives Rachel just one instruction, don't open this unless there's an attack. And she follows that instruction for a year. And for a second year. Well, today on our radio show, for Father's Day, we have stories of dads reaching out to kids in very dad-like ways, which-- I mean, these stories anyway-- means that dads are not always so direct in saying their feelings. They use the tools that they know. Which means instructions. Which means disaster preparedness. Or, like my dad, one of the big ways that he can show his love is by helping me every year with my taxes, which I love. I love my dad. Act one, "Astro boy meet robot dad." We start with this story of a dad and kid and the space between them. From Michael Ian Black. Michael Ian Black reading an excerpt from this book that he's writing called You're Not Doing It Right, which comes out early next year. He has a stand-up comedy special airing on Comedy Central this August. Act two, "I just called to say-- something that is very hard to say, that I really should say more often..." Well, now we'll hear another case study of a dad who has trouble saying a certain phrase to his child. And the dad in this case gets put to the test. Jonathan Menjivar has this story about this tough dad, and his now tough-skinned kid. Jonathan Menjivar, he's a producer on our show. He is celebrating Father's Day with his daughter, Sasha, who is 16 months old. It's This American Life, I'm Ira Glass. Today we have a special show for Father's Day this weekend about fathers trying to connect with their kids using whatever flawed means are at their disposal. So. Once she gets to college, Angie happens to catch a old movie that she had never seen, Steve Martin's 1979 The Jerk.  Angie says it is impossible to imagine any part of the story happening with her mom. Lifting bits from an old Steve Martin film and planting them into a kid's life without ever thinking to mention where they came from. That is just a very dad-like behavior. When a dad sets the rules, it is his world and the kids have to live in it. Which brings us to the next act of our show, Act three, "Mr. Baby Monitor." Jonathan Goldstein is the host of the radio show Wiretap, which is heard on the CBC, and on many public radio stations in this country as well. Josh Karpati only allowed to let Jonathan come over and interview him for the radio if we mentioned his Twitter feed, so if you want to hear more words that Josh once banned, @jkarpati. That is the letter J, K- A- R- P- A- T- I. And yeah, follow if you want. Act four, "Bring your child to work detail." For fathers who are locked up for decades behind bars, family relationships suffer, as you'd imagine. Or even disappear. That is, unless, they decide to do something about it. Get a  little creative. Michael May has the story, from prison in east Texas.  Michael May, he's the managing editor at the Texas Observer.  Our program is produced today by Robyn Semien, and myself with  Alex Blumberg, Ben Calhoun, Jane Feltes, Sarah Koenig, Jonathan Menjivar, Lisa Pollak, Alissa Shipp, and Nancy Updike. Our senior producer is Julie Snyder. Production help from Eric Mennel, music help from Jessica Hopper and Damien Grave. Seth Lind is our production manager, Emily Condon is our office manager. Jen Berman is filling in as our West coast producer. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. A few years' back, John and his wife were driving back from a vacation in Concan, Texas. They had five kids in this van that they had rented for the trip, three of their own kids and then a couple of the neighbor's kids. They stopped at a taqueria in San Antonio for lunch, and then got back on the road. And John was feeling pretty good about things. All the kids seemed happy, nobody had gotten hurt on the vacation, lunch was really cheap, though he noticed he was getting some weird looks from other cars on the road. And then, outside Sealy, coming into the home stretch of the drive, he sees this Texas Highway Patrol car. So he pulls over. And John says that, from watching the TV show Cops all these years, he knew that those two patrolmen are on, like, DEFCON 5. They are shouting at him over the patrol car's PA system. And he's thinking, maybe the car rental place got the paperwork messed up and reported the van is stolen, or maybe the cops thought they were smuggling people in from Mexico. They'd been so close to the border on their vacation. So, one of the cops comes out of the car and points a rifle at John's head, while the other one goes over to the van and starts asking a lot of questions of his wife, Jacqueline. And inside the van, of course the kids are terrified. His nine-year-old son is crying. And then, the cop who talked to Jacqueline now walks over to John, over on the shoulder of the road. The exact wording, written in dust on the van's back window, was, help, please God, call 911, I've been kidnapped. And it wasn't John's daughter who wrote it. The cop said that it was Ingrid. The cop didn't know that that was one of the neighbor's kids. And John was so humiliated and frustrated, that when the cop asked him if he knew that what Ingrid did was against the law, John's response was, yeah, haul her in, prosecute her. Which they didn't do. Before long, John was back in the car and on the road. So, a bunch of kids dimed you out. Your own family dimed you out. Well, from WBEZ Chicago, it's This American Life, distributed by Public Radio International. I'm Ira Glass. When you start throwing around the phrase, a house divided against itself cannot stand, you are trafficking in one of the most ominous and overwrought sayings in Western history. Act One, War of Northern Aggression. It's a tough call these days, but if you're looking for the one state that more than any other is a house divided against itself, I would offer, for your consideration, Wisconsin. Of course, maybe you already know that. Maybe you saw the beginning of this, epic protests resisting Governor Scott Walker's budget cuts. Ben Calhoun. He's one of the producers of our show. It's This American Life. I'm Ira Glass. Each week on our show, of course, we choose a theme and bring you different kinds of stories on that theme. Today's show, A House Divided. We have stories of internal strife with possible dire consequences. We've arrived at Act Two of our show. Act Two, Split a Gut. Julian McCullough. HE performs pretty much every night of the week somewhere. To find out when he's showing up near you, julianmccullough.com. He was recorded at TOLD, which is a monthly storytelling show in New York City, hosted by our program's production manager, Seth Lind. They are at toldshow.com. Act Three, Don't Make Me Separate You. Well we end our show today with this story about a family whose house was divided. Jeanne Darst was 16 when her parents split up, her three sisters just a little bit older. But her parents, Steve and Doris, did not do divorce like other people did. Jeanne Darst, reading an excerpt adapted from her book, Fiction Ruined My Family, which comes out this coming October. Our program was produced today by Robyn Semien and myself, with Alex Blumberg, Ben Calhoun, Jane Feltes, Sarah Koenig, Jonathan Menjivar, Lisa Pollak, Alissa Shipp and Nancy Updike. Our senior producer is Julie Snyder. Production help from Eric Mennel. Music help from Jessica Hopper and Damian Grathe. Seth Lind is our production manager. Emily Condon's our office manager. Jen Berman's filling in as our west coast producer. I'm Ira Glass, back next week with more stories of This American Life. Back in December of 2007, Terry Engelder, who's a geologist at Penn State University, put a piece of scrap paper from the recycling bin under his desk and made a calculation. Ah, porosity. Engelder was trying to figure out the answer to a very, very basic question, something somebody had asked him just in passing. Exactly how much natural gas was trapped in the Marcellus, which is a giant rock formation, a kind of rock called shale that runs underneath Pennsylvania where Engelder was actually sitting, and New York, and into Ohio, and New Jersey, and West Virginia, and Maryland. Which now we know, thanks to Engelder, is the second largest natural gas field in the world. Largest outside the Mideast. His result? 50 trillion cubic feet of natural gas. It sounded impossible. Engelder went online to see what the US Geological Survey was estimating for the Marcellus. Their number was less than 2 trillion cubic feet. Engelder's was 50, 50 trillion cubic feet, conservatively. So he crumbled up his scrap paper. Engelder wanted a second opinion, so he sent the problem to a colleague at another university. Didn't tell him what he'd come up with, just let him have at it over the evening. What 50 trillion cubic feet of natural gas means, he says, is that America was about to have a revolution in how it powers itself. Right now, natural gas makes up about 25% of our nation's energy supply. It's used for heating over half the nation's homes, for making electricity, for all kinds of stuff, and we import lots of it. But the country was suddenly getting access to all sorts of domestic shale deposits full of gas, the Marcellus chief among them, that could make it so that we do not have to import natural gas for decades. It was late December, right before Christmas, and the thought came to him. It's a line Engelder has used elsewhere. It's been published in National Geographic and in Time magazine. By the time our show had talked to him, Engelder had talked to 208 reporters. Yes, he counted. He gets multiple messages every week asking for interviews. He's been offered jobs by oil and gas companies. He's constantly flying around giving speeches. He was up to 198. And yes, he counted that, too. He started a consulting company and a research group. He's testified before Congress. In May, the president of Penn State University called Engelder a rock star-- get it, rock star-- at a trustees meeting. Dan Volz is director of the Center for Healthy Environments and Communities of the University of Pittsburgh's Graduate School of Public Health. Or he was, until about a month ago. Today on our radio program, what happened when the big institutions of a state, the universities, industry, government, all joined forces to push for natural gas. That's what happened in Pennsylvania. Other states have been far more cautious. Sarah Koenig. Coming up, there will be crud. That's in a minute, from Chicago Public Radio and Public Radio International, when our program continues. It's This American Life, I'm Ira Glass. Today on our program we're devoting the entire hour to Sarah Koenig's stories of what happens in a state when a huge game-changing economic boom arrives, in this case, trillions of cubic feet of natural gas being discovered underneath Pennsylvania. We've arrived at Act Two of our show. Act Two, Ground War. Sarah Koenig, who's one of the producers of our show. Well, our program was produced today by Alex Blumberg, Ben Calhoun, Jane Feltes, Sarah Koenig, Jonathan Menjivar, Lisa Pollak, Robyn Semien, Alissa Shipp, Nancy Updike and me. Our senior producer is Julie Snyder. Production help from Eric Mennel. Music help from Damien [UNINTELLIGIBLE]. Seth Lind is our production manager. Emily Condon's our office manager. I'm Ira Glass, back next week with more stories of This American Life. Back during the rise of the dot coms and the internet, Jeff Kelling and a few of his friends were working as programmers together at this company in Dallas. And they decided they wanted to get together the way the tech geeks were doing all over the world at the time and come up with an idea for their own internet company to start. And this is 1999. This is before Flickr, this is before Shutterfly. But Jeff and his friends, they were not the first people to try to make a business out of photo sharing. There were other companies out there trying to make a go of that. All the big names were there-- Yahoo, which owns Flickr, as well as Shutterfly and Photobucket, and lots of small companies like Jeff's as well. But to go to court to answer that question was going to cost money, a lot of money. Amazingly, it wasn't just Jeff and the other companies getting sued over these three patents who were upset. Out there in the world was an inventor who came up with the original ideas that got patented for two of these three patents, and he wasn't that happy about the lawsuit either. The guy's name was David Rose and he was issued these patents back when he started his own photo-sharing company back in the mid '90s, just a couple years before Jeff Kelling started his. Companies that make no products, but go around suing other companies that do make products over supposed patent infringement are so common in Silicon Valley these days that there's a derogatory term for it-- trolls, or patent trolls. David Rose explains, trolls-- So the guy who came up with two of these patents doesn't want the lawsuit and the guy getting sued for the patents doesn't want the lawsuit. And yet, the lawsuit happens. Patents are so foundational to the American way of life that they're in the Constitution. Their purpose is quote "to promote the useful arts and sciences." In other words, to get people to share their ideas and inventions. To say to somebody like Eli Whitney, OK, you have this amazing invention, the cotton gin. If you tell everybody how it works and how to make their own, in exchange, any time somebody uses the idea, you get paid. Alex Blumberg and Laura Sydell. Coming up, we go back to Intellectual Ventures for answers, and we find out what a patent has in common with a weapon of mass destruction. That's in a minute, from Chicago Public Radio and Public Radio International, when our program continues. It's This American Life. I'm Ira Glass. Today on our show, "When Patents Attack," stories about how our patent system sometimes seems to be discouraging rather than encouraging innovation in high-tech businesses. Alex Blumberg with NPR correspondent Laura Sydell. Alex is part of our Planet Money team. On the Planet Money website you can find links to all kinds of documents and patent-related goodies, plus, of course, their podcast. That is at npr.org/money. Our program was produced today with Ben Calhoun, Jane Feltes, Sarah Koenig, Eric Mennel, Jonathan Menjivar, Lisa Pollak, Robyn Semien, Alissa Shipp, and Nancy Updike. Our senior producer is Julie Snyder. Production help from Miki Meek. Music help from Damien Graef. Seth Lind is our production manager. Emily Condon's our office manager. I'm Ira Glass, back next with with more stories of this American life.  The town of Florencia de Benito Juarez was a typical little mountain town in Mexico, just 4,000 people. Quiet, until last Fall. Then a drug gang called the Zetas, affiliated with one of the big drug cartels, rolled into town. And people were pretty scared. The Zetas would stop people in the road and take their trucks. They walked the streets freely. The police were defenseless, or maybe they were just on the take, in the pockets of the gang.  In fact, the leader this new group, the Chapos, told store owners that if any gang member did something as petty as taking food from a store without paying, please come let him know. It would not be tolerated.  "They were here to take out the garbage, meaning the Zetas," a woman from Florencia told this reporter. "They said they were good people. They weren't going to cause anybody in town any harm."  For the people of Florencia, they were protectors. The police fled town, as did the Mayor. And things were peaceful, with the Chapos in charge, for just a few days. And then, the Zetas returned. This was May 20 of this year, a Friday morning. Everybody expected and feared a big battle between the two.  The fight started in town, and then continued in the mountains for a full day. And when it was over, authorities said that about a dozen were dead. The people in Florencia said it was a lot more, many dozens. The Chapos, the supposed protectors of Florencia, won the day. And as with anything heroic or sensational that happens in Mexico these days, of course, there are now corridos, folk ballads, about the battle. [SINGING] "Only 10 fallen men, reported the government, but I'm not stupid. I know what I'm saying. More than 60 idiots were left on the ground."  "The truth is, people feel protected," this woman's saying. "When the gang isn't around, that's when people are fearful." This reporter has seen a lot of what drug gangs do in small towns in Mexico, and he says he has never heard of this, a gang coming to town and people feeling safer.  The strategy seems to be winning people over. On Father's Day, just a few weeks after the shoot-out, the Chapos hung a banner in town that read, "Happy Father's Day. We know that the family is the most important thing. CDG." CDG stands for Cartel de Gulfo, the Gulf Cartel.  "I wasn't there, but my family told me about it," she's saying. "They told me that somebody went from street to street, handing out bottles of tequila to all the fathers, and wishing Happy Father's Day from the cartel, the Gulf Cartel."  The reporter says to her, "So they're the promoters of the family?" And she says, "Yes." And then he jokes, "At this rate, they'll be dating the local girls soon." "That's already happening," she says.  "These aren't older guys," she says. "They're boys, at the most 20, 22 years old. Young guys at the age where a woman wants to fall in love. The girls, they see a cute guy in a truck, and their eyes meet." It's not all kittens and flowers, though. The Chapos have checkpoints at two entrances to the town, and keep a close eye on who can enter and exit. They issue orders. Like at the end of the school year, when people usually throw big parties, they told them not to, and everybody obeyed.  So for peace, and peace of mind, Florencia has the cartel. Thugs keeping order. And they keep out the Zetas better than the authorities ever did. It's a very romantic idea, that thugs aren't just killers, that they can be protectors, good guys. Lots of great movie characters are based on this very idea.  Act One. Thug me? No, Thug you.  Nancy Updike is one of the producers of our show. Ali's Facebook posting was translated into English by Moataz Atallah and Wiam el-Tamimi. The actor reading the translation was Michael Chernus. It's This American Life, I'm Ira Glass. Each week on our show, of course, we choose some theme, bring you different kinds of stories on that theme. Today's show, thugs, the many forms of them, and the many forms of thuggery. We've arrived at Act Two of our show. Act Two, Lifers.  Laura Beil lives in Cedar Hill, Texas. Our program was produced today by Jonathan Menjivar, with Ben Calhoun, Jane Feltes, Sarah Koenig, Eric Mennel, Lisa Pollak, Robyn Semien, Alissa Shipp, and Nancy Updike. Our senior producer is Julie Snyder. Production help from [? Mickey Meek ?]. Music help from [? Damien Grafe, ?] Seth Linde is our production manager. Emily Condon's our office manager. Special thanks to Jesse Hardman. The Spanish interpreter for the opening story in today's show was Juan Carlos Correo from the Cross-Cultural Interpreting Services of the Heartland Alliance.  I'm Ira Glass. Back next week, with more stories of This American Life. From WBEZ Chicago, it's This American Life, distributed by Public Radio International. I'm Ira Glass. We're at an amusement park in Kansas City, Missouri, called the Worlds of Fun. We're going to be spending the entire hour today at amusement parks. When he was little, his family had season passes here, and they would come a lot. He traveled to any new roller coaster to try it out, daydreamed about a job where he would design parks and build roller coasters. And when his dad drove him here at the age of 14 for a job interview-- he wore a suit to that interview-- just sitting inside the park's offices, which are utilitarian-- picture the principal's office at a public high school-- even that was exciting. You might think that enthusiasm would diminish over time. But what's incredible about Cole is that even after a decade here, even after becoming an adult and working a 60 to 70-hour week, every week, all summer, even with the pressure in his current job of running a whole department, and hitting financial targets, and buying all the supplies, and hiring and supervising over a hundred young people, he is still pretty psyched about working in an amusement park. This is exactly how Colt trains the kids to talk on the mike. Don't stop. Get a flow. Have fun. If you have fun, that's what's going to sell the game. It's the first shift meeting of the day. About 30 teenagers and college kids mill around a big tree before their shift starts. One of the guys, Sam, holds up a poster board with tournament brackets on it, like for any sports tournament. The Sweet 16 Tournament pits the kids in all 32 games in the park against each other in pairs in a four-week competition to make the most money. Last week, half the games were eliminated. Cole is here letting the remaining games know who they're competing with today. OK. Scale Africa is a scale, a game where they guess your weight or age. And it's in the Africa part of the park. Hence, Scale Africa. And it's not surprising it's number one. It always makes tons of money. Finally one day, the game that he picked from that hat that day tried their hardest an actually became the number one game in the park for the day. And-- Well, today on our radio show, we go to amusement parks all over the country. We see stuff backstage that we had no idea was going on. Like that song. We hear Jonathan Goldstein's story about moving to the Jersey Shore for a summer when he was 16, and we hear your stories. We asked you to call in with your amusement park stories, and you told some great ones.  Act One. Gameboy Grows Up.  Who would have thought? It's a fluorescent-colored monkey the size of a teddy bear, with huge eyes and a super long tail. When they put it into the dart game, the dart game became one of the most popular games in the park. Doubled its business. We round a corner and I see why he asked. This turns out to be kind of an awkward question. Cole points out that this slingshot game is not actually called Angry Birds. Before I flew out to Kansas City to meet Cole, I watched his YouTube videos online. Yes, he has YouTube videos, and I heartily recommend them. They are shot, directed, and starring Cole. They are low tech. They're low budget. In this one, he wears a Viking helmet and fake mustache and wire-rim glasses, and he's walking through a video arcade. Those are his echoing footsteps that we're hearing. OK. I'm going to stop the video right there. When he says "a bear, a dog, and a giant mon-kay," then we have three quick shots of stuffed animal prizes. A bear, a dog, and a giant mon-kay. As the video continues, the teenagers on his staff join him, and they're all dancing around, and they're beating whack-a-mole moles on the beat. And everything they do in this video is so deeply uncool that you know that they must really like and trust each other. And their total commitment to what they're doing actually flips the dorkiness and makes it kind of cool. There are over a dozen videos, all set in the amusement park, with the stuffed animal prizes always playing surprisingly central roles. Like the sci fi special effects movie they made, where a mysterious ray from outer space hits and the stuffed animal prizes all come to life, seeking vengeance. Key line? The only semi-normal video of the bunch is a training video. This one opens on Cole. He's in a suit and tie, in front of a bookcase, reading a book. He looks up, startled, as if the camera surprised him. When he says "wonderful journey," he mugs at the camera with this gesture that communicates the idea, I know this is completely ridiculous. In fact, the entire video seems to be making fun of the idea of training videos, while at the same time, it is a training video, explaining how to sign in, how to use the till card, how to stock prizes. So does that work in practice? After all, if you think about it, amusement park jobs are not, on their face, very fun. You know? Taking tickets, strapping people into rides, convincing passersby to throw three balls into a can. Meanwhile, the guys in Games IV were doing great in Sweet 16. All their games had survived the first round. And people wonder if Charlie Sheen has had an effect on America's youth.  Max and his team leader Dominic are setting up at a game called a Roll-A-Ball, which is one of the older games in the park. Basically it's just skee ball, but as you get points, it moves a little wooden pig, which is in a race with all the other riders. This doesn't make any sense. It actually doesn't matter. Here's what you need to know. Half an hour the park opened, Haley and Claire had gotten to work early and were down in Games III by Scale Africa. Each pyramid has over 100 stuffed animals in it, which is bigger than I think you're probably imagining it. It's like nearly waist-high. And so there are four big, pastel-colored piles of plush toys right in the middle of a walkway, looking so, so easy to win. Basically-- Cole gets just as excited as the kids do when you get him talking about all the fun things that he did back when he was Haley and Claire's age, working here, running Games III. His team would dress as pirates for the guessing game. It is still so alive for him. They dominated in 2004 by tricking out one of the games with music and all kinds of commotion and turning it into a party, doubling its take for the day. Late morning, when I checked back at Games III, the pyramids of plush toys looked pretty much exactly as big as they had earlier that morning. Things were slow. And to goose the business, one of the supervisors, Sarah, was standing on the roof of this little hut. This is a technique that I recognize from a thousand Public Radio pledge drives, and it was working about as slowly for her as it works for us. Strangers just don't care if some girl on the roof gets to take a bathroom break. After a while, Sarah switched technique and finally managed to wrestle up a crowd through the simple tactic of making a series of insanely terrible guesses. First there is a dad who looks like he's 42, and in fact is 42. Sarah guesses 25. Then a grandmother, who was standing there with kids and grandkids. Sarah writes her guess for this woman's age on a whiteboard. Later, Sarah privately confirmed for me that she did intentionally take a dive. Which is fine with Cole, because it turns out, it doesn't matter if the kids guess right. The game costs $5 to play. The prizes cost less than $5. Sarah can be wrong with every single guess, and they'd still make a nice profit. In fact, it's good to lose, because people carrying prizes around the park are a walking advertisement for all the games. So after years of that, in his senior year at the University of Kansas at Lawrence, he got a phone call offering him the job of Games manager and he dropped out of school to take it. As you'd imagine, it hasn't been such a popular decision with the family. This girlfriend and Cole are pretty serious. They just moved in together. They met in Games back in 2006, though she moved on from Games. How often will it come up? Lots of very accomplished people don't have college degrees. Steve Jobs. By midday, down in Games III, that is Dustin, who is wearing the full body banana suit that Haley handmade for him, which looks amazing, but it is 94 degrees, which is zapping everybody's energy, and business is slow. Though as the day wears on, people slowly migrate from the rides to the games. And by nightfall, when it cools off, the guys in Games II finally get Techno Ball working. Max and [? Oksan ?] are covered from head-to-toe in glow lights. Cole and I round a corner together and we see them in the distance, and there's a crowd of three dozen people surrounding the game. It's fantastic. That's Dominic, the team leader here at Games II. Cole suggests, maybe they should dance inside the game instead of on the walkway in front of the game, so people would be pulled in to play. Dom does not want to do this. And listen to what a good boss Cole is. He's firm, but he's very nice about it. I walk down to check on Games III. It is 10:30 at night. Claire has been here for 13 hours since I saw her setting up pyramids of plush before the gates opened to the park. This is Claire's third year here. She's 18, going to Missouri State in the fall to study nursing. And she tells me what a lot of kids here tell me. She wouldn't keep coming back to work at Worlds of Fun if not for Cole. Sam, one of the leaders for Games IV, has been here for three summers, and he also says that Cole was the reason that he keeps coming back. That doesn't mean, by the way, that he is seen by his bosses as some kind of superstar. He gets respect, sure. Everybody likes him. His immediate boss, Matt, thinks that there's nobody better at Games in any of the 11 amusement parks owned by their parent company, Cedar Fair. But Cole is working at one of the smallest of the 11 parks, so other Games managers at bigger parks bring in way more money than Cole does. All right, I'm going to stop the tape right there. Yes, I know. Matthew McConaughey is confused. Cole's seen the film, too. That's a weird fate. To know that you're in the best job you may ever have at 25. Especially when it's a job that you think can't last. It's This American Life. I'm Ira Glass. Each week on our show, of course, we choose a theme, bring you different kinds of stories on that theme. Today's show, Amusement Parks. It's August. It's hot. We wanted to go someplace fun together here on the radio. And it seemed like, I have to say, it would be nice to do a show on Public Radio this weekend, and I bet we're going to be the only one where the words "roller coaster" would not be used to refer to the stock market, but to actual roller coasters. We have arrived at act two of our show. Act Three. What I Didn't Do On My Summer Vacation. Jonathan Goldstein is the host of PRI's Wiretap and the author of the book Ladies and Gentlemen, the Bible. Well, our program was produced today by Jane Feltes and me, with Ben Calhoun, Sarah Koenig, Jonathan Menjivar, Lisa Pollak, Robyn Semien, Alissa Shipp, and Nancy Updike. Our senior producer is Julie Snyder. Production help from [UNINTELLIGIBLE]. Seth Lind is our production manager. Emily Condon is our office manager. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. OK, just to put this out there, perhaps you are somebody who has not been looking forward to the inevitable deluge of 10th anniversary 9/11 coverage on basically every media outlet that exists. But think for a second about what it's like for the 9/11 families and survivors. Like Lynn Simpson. She was on the first show we did after 9/11, telling the story of working on the 89th floor of World Trade Center One when the planes hit, and how she made it down the stairs and out of the building with about a minute to spare. I caught up with her last week. Marian Fontana's husband Dave was a firefighter killed in the south tower. She was also on our show years ago, and she told me last week when we checked with her that she and her son are going to spend 9/11 not at any of the public events, but instead they're going to visit the spot at a park where Dave proposed to her years ago and where she later scattered his ashes. And then they're going to have a quiet family dinner together. Here we are, 9/11. And who exactly wants to watch the footage from that day again, think about it all over again? And we thought today on our program, rather than look back at that one day in 2001, it would be a lot nicer to spend most of this hour looking at where we have come since. After all, 9/11 happened to us, but the decade since, we created that ourselves. And this seems like a good time to measure just how far we've come. And to do that, we have reached out today to some of the interviewees who have appeared on our show in the last decade, whose lives seem to tell some piece of the story of what the world has gone through since September 11. Act One, Kabul, Kabul, Kabul, Kabul, Kabul Chameleon. When September 11, 2001 happened, Hyder Akbar was 16. His dad ran a hip-hop clothing store in the San Francisco area. Hyder thought that maybe he was going to become a mortgage broker like his older brother someday. But his dad and some of his uncles had fought the Soviets in Afghanistan, driving the Soviets out back in 1989. His family fled the country when the Taliban came to power, until September 11. On these two trips, carrying a tape recorder, Hyder sees a lot. He works as an interpreter for the US military, including translating for a man, Abdul Wali, who dies while in custody after being interrogated by the Americans. He gets caught in a firefight. He walks through the devastation after a car bomb. He befriends people, especially his driver and companion, Sartor. And he vows to come back. I reached Hyder last week by phone in Afghanistan. Some quick facts-- he's 26. After creating two amazing radio shows and writing a book with his producer, Susan Burton, he transferred from the community college that he was at to Yale University, where he graduated from. He now lives on the third floor of this house that I reached him at, and on the second floor is the NGO, the Non-Governmental Organization that he created, basically to go out and survey Afghans to understand what they're thinking and what they want, for international aid groups and others who are working in the country. It's sobering hearing Hyder talk like this. If there was going to be one optimist left in Kabul, it would be Hyder. But he says lots of people there now are wondering which side is going to win in Afghanistan, the Americans, the Taliban. Who? Kunar Province, where his dad was governor, is in terrible shape, and the Taliban are so strong there that Hyder says that nobody wants to be seen as working with the Americans anymore. And when he returned in 2003. Since then, his dad has been going back and forth between Afghanistan and California. Hyder, meanwhile, was briefly engaged to somebody who he met at Yale, whose family was from the Middle East. And she was willing to move to Afghanistan with him for a few years, but when it became clear to everybody that Hyder intended to stay, even after they had children, even if the country continued to fall apart, at some point he had to decide between her and Afghanistan. And he chose Afghanistan. Hyder says that he doesn't believe that he's doing much good for the country, just running his NGO. And this is another change from who he was back when he was in college and we used to joke with him about how some day he was going to be either the foreign minister of Afghanistan or he would be out fighting in the hills with his uncle. Now he's in it for real, and he's become a hard-eyed pragmatist. Hyder Akbar in Kabul. The book that he wrote with Susan Burton when he was still here in the States is called Come Back to Afghanistan. Act Two, In the Garden of the Unknown Unknowns. Lee told her that they needed to go because they had to talk with New York Governor Pataki and he was going to be at this dinner. And so she went. Soon, there was a screening of a 9/11 documentary, and so they went to this tiny screening room in the White House. She's one row behind the president. I talked to Marian again last week. She's no longer heading the September 11th Families' Association. She got tired of the politics within the organization, and the bigger politics, too, actually. And she told me that she started to feel like she couldn't make this one day in 2001 the rest of her life. Her son, Aidan, who was in kindergarten on 9/11, is now 15 years old. And she and I talked about what these anniversaries are like for him. Marian Fontana. She wrote a book about her experience after 9/11 that is a lot like the story she's telling here on the radio. It's called A Widow's Walk. She's now working on a book about her dating experiences since 9/11 called The Middle of the Bed. And it's looking for a publisher. It's This American Life. I'm Ira Glass. Today, for the 10th anniversary of 9/11, we are returning to people who we've had on the show during the past decade, people whose lives were changed by 9/11, because we wanted to see what's happened to them as the decade's proceeded. We've arrived at Act Three of our show. Act Three, Put on a Happy Face. This is reporter Chris Neary talking to John, who was in the Navy back then. John ended up serving in Iraq as a mortarman. Chris met him once he was out of the service, four years ago in the fall of 2007, while reporting a story on PTSD. And they hit it off right away. John was especially open about what he was going through. He was direct. He was funny. He answered the sort of questions that reporters ask, which doesn't always happen. Chris Neary, who lives in New York. Act Four, What's Arabic for Fjord? In 2007, we told the story of an Iraqi who worked as an interpreter for US forces. His name is Basim. And like many Iraqis who helped the US, his life was threatened by other Iraqis. He was sent a DVD that showed a fellow interpreter, a colleague, a guy who he knew, being beheaded, and warning him that he would be next. So Basim fled the country with his wife and baby, and ended up in Europe. Act Five, Bad Teacher. In December 2006, roughly halfway between September 11, 2001 and today, we ran a story that generated more email than almost any story we have ever broadcast. The story was about a family, a happy family, whose names we changed on the radio. Five kids, including a daughter who we called Chloe, who was pretty, a good student, very popular. Apparently, as part of the lesson for the 9/11 anniversary, the teacher in Chloe's class had passed out a slim paperback intended to educate students about the 9/11 tragedy. Alix Spiegel, who reported this story for our show, picks up now with what happened next. Alix Spiegel is a correspondent for NPR News. Act Six, Clutter. Let's end today's show with somebody who was at the World Trade Center on that day in 2001. When I first talked to Lynn Simpson less than two weeks after the towers collapsed, she was still having trouble sleeping. She'd escaped from the 89th floor, and she kept waking up, thinking about it. Lynn doesn't work now. She doesn't live in New York anymore. She's in Pennsylvania. She finds she can't even visit New York City. She's one of an estimated 10,000 first responders and civilians who suffer PTSD related to the 9/11 attack. The symptoms? They're jittery, they overreact to loud noises, they have trouble concentrating. Lynn says that she has no idea why she is one of the people who reacted this way, and not one of the many people who went on with their lives. We spent this hour talking about what has changed in the last decade, and what has happened because of 9/11. 9/11's become a symbol. It's become a rallying cry. But it was also a day, a terrifying day. So let's close our broadcast with Lynn's account from back then of what that day was like for her, in the towers when the planes hit, escaping just a minute before the building collapsed. Well, our program was produced today by Nancy Updike and myself, with Ben Calhoun, Sarah Koenig, Jonathan Menjivar, Lisa Pollak, Robyn Semien, and Alissa Shipp. Our senior producer's Julie Snyder. Production help from Mickey Meek. Seth Lind is our production manager. Emily Condon's our office manager. I'm Ira Glass, back next week with more stories of This American Life. Recently I was talking to this guy who told me how years ago, because of a medical condition, he had to give up beer. He had only been a casual beer drinker before this. He'd never really given beer much thought. But now that he couldn't have a beer, he was thinking of beer all the time. Nubar and Abby Alexanian. They put together that story with Jay Allison for the website Transom.org. If you want to learn how to put together a radio story, they explain how to do it at Transom.org. This story got funding from the Corporation for Public Broadcasting. Act Two, Yerrrrr Out! At first you don't really think about it, Bobby says. He got drafted to play professional baseball for the Cubs, was sent to the minor leagues, like most players are. And for the first two years, he says, you don't wonder if you're going to make it. You know you're going to make it. For one thing, the evidence is everywhere. By his third year, out of the 52 guys Bobby was drafted with, only 15 were still playing ball. In his fourth year he was traded. By his seventh year, he was sitting on the bench a lot. And then he broke his wrist, had a hard time finding a team who would pick him up. But then his season improved. He actually went on a kind of streak. And that's what keeps somebody going in this situation. There had always been so much proof, you know? He had been a high school star, an all-state, and a college star, and all Big Ten. And his brother, Hal Morris, was playing for the Reds. And it's like what happens in a casino. You win enough of the time to keep you going, to keep you in the game. It feels like the big win is right around the corner. For years, he had been wrestling with his decision. And then it was done. He went to the batting cage, he hit for a while, and then he told his coaches. Bobby Morris. He and I recorded that interview back in 2005. He spent another few years after that as a full-time commodities trader in Chicago. Then in 2007, he left the city and moved back to his home state of Indiana. He still works as a trader part-time. But a few years ago, Bobby went back to baseball, this time in a new way, working with kids. He's a teacher at the White Sox Youth Academy and a coach for competitive travel teams. Focusing on the young players, he says, on helping them improve, watching them improve, helped him remember what he loved about baseball in the first place. He says he's enjoying the game for the first time in years. Act Three, The Call of the Great Indoors. There are some kinds of living without that is really hard for most of us to fathom. In Boston, Chelsea Merz has been talking with somebody about one of those. This is an excerpt from a radio project that Chelsea Merz and Matthew have worked on for years. When we first broadcast that story in 2004, Matthew had been on the street for seven years. He has now gotten off the streets, and gives talks around the country about his experience. You can find more at his website, openchurches.org. It's This American Life. I'm Ira Glass. Each week on our program, of course, we choose some theme, bring you a variety of different kinds of stories on that theme. Today's program, two weeks into the new year, stories of giving things up, living without, voluntarily or not. Judy Budnitz's short story "Guilt," from her collection of short stories called Flying Leap. Her latest book is Nice Big American Baby. Her story was read by actor Matt Malloy, who is in way too many movies to name here, but is available for your casting needs. Chelsea Merz's story with Matthew came to us with help from Jay Allison and the Cape and Island NPR stations with support from the Corporation for Public Broadcasting. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. OK, here was the idea-- they were private investigators, detectives for hire. But they were not grizzled ex-cops in trench coats or old Humphrey Bogart characters in fedoras dragging on their unfiltered cigarettes. They were moms, soccer moms-- telegenic, sexy soccer moms, like some kind of MILF Charlie's Angels. You can see why that would be a hit, why people loved that, and why it was really only a matter of time before they would show up as guests on some daytime TV talk show. The brains behind this whole PI Mom thing was a guy named Chris Butler. The way Chris Butler tells it, he'd been running a regular PI firm, when at some point, he hired a mom. According to Chris, this was the eureka moment. He realized that moms have what it takes to crack cases-- patience, organization, hunches. Plus, they blend in. Anyway, that was the shtick. Chris called it his secret formula, and he built a business around it. Chris Butler didn't want to talk to us. This is a tape of him running a sting operation on the hour-long episode of Dr. Phil that featured the PI Moms. And that was just one of several big media appearances for Chris and the moms last year. There was also the Today Show and Fox and a People magazine article complete with a two-page photo spread of three PI Moms in dresses and heels, posed like Charlie's Angels. This is Pete Crooks, a writer and an editor for Diablo magazine. Diablo is one of those glossy monthly magazines that lots of places have, like Chicago magazine or Columbus Monthly or Memphis magazine. This particular one serves the East Bay Area outside of San Francisco, including the Diablo Valley. The magazine has restaurant reviews and local events listings and enthusiastic profiles of celebrities from the area. Pete covers entertainment, so he is the one who got the pitch from the PI moms public relations person, who told him that Chris Butler and the moms had just landed a deal for a reality TV show on Lifetime. Which is perfect. He'd be ahead of the curve on this story that was going to be on national TV and had this strong local angle, and it was a fun story, an easy story-- one day of reporting, where you ride around with the moms; some photos on a stakeout or whatever, which could be great; a quick write-up. And that is the way it started. But Pete ended up spending months on this simple feature story. It unfolded and unfolded, and by the end, he found himself caught up in a very strange world where he was getting mysterious messages from an anonymous informant. For a while, it was unclear who he should believe about anything. And things that were not what they seemed were even less what they seemed than he thought they were when he first discovered they were not what they seemed. Today, we take you on that same trip that he went on. Coming up, we unpeel one more layer of the onion to reveal underneath all the fakery and pretense and self-promotion real-life crimes. Josh Bearman returns with more in a minute from Chicago Public Radio when our program continues. Josh Bearman in Los Angeles. Well, since we first broadcast the story in 2012, Pete Crooks, the reporter for Diablo magazine, has continued to follow this story. He's written a book about the PI moms called The Setup. Carl Marino eventually got a real acting gig and now plays Detective Lieutenant Joe Kenda on the TV show Homicide Hunter. Norm Wielsch went to prison in 2013, and five other police officers were convicted due to their involvement in the scandal. Chris Butler is also in prison. Apparently, one of his jail buddies is former Illinois governor Rod Blagojevich. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. Well, people of Earth, if I may call you that, you are probably unaware of the gathering last weekend in Orlando, Florida, that was attempting to address a problem that you also may be unaware of. I'm talking about the problem of interstellar space travel. We sent a reporter. You know, it's possible that Dan Grech says this to everybody who ever asks him to do a story, I have no idea. His usual job is running the news at WLRN, the public radio station in Miami. He attended the Hundred Year Starship Conference for us. The nearest star to the sun is four light years away, and using the kind of rockets that we use now, it would take 10,000 years to get there. 10,000 years. And what was so thrilling about this conference, Dan says, was that the people at this conference were thinking through the steps of exactly how you would develop and build a different kind of starship. They believe it was the first conference of its kind. It was sponsored by NASA and by DARPA, which is the advanced research arm of the defense department, who are going to pay a half million dollars to whoever invents the most feasible time line and plan to get us to the stars. Cost of the light sail? $10 trillion, which is 1/6 of all the money spent on our planet in one year. And that's probably the cheapest interstellar spacecraft we could make. And how much energy would it take to travel at a reasonable speed? What was most amazing about this conference, and you can read the agenda online, is how much of it was scientists thinking through all these utterly practical questions of traveling such immense distances on journeys that would probably take hundreds of years. Dan says that this event did not feel like any normal scientific conference. It felt bigger. It was exciting, like we are heading for the stars. He says there was a lot of talk about Columbus and maiden voyages. Well, today on our radio program, ordinary folks like you and me-- glasses wearing, slightly pudgy, not getting enough exercise, and I might just be talking for myself here-- who get the call of the wild, the call of adventure, and find themselves suddenly meeting criminals and smugglers on the other side of the world, traveling through time, traveling through space, fighting pirates in the fires of hell. I am not kidding. Act One, Chinese Checkmate. There are people who head out into the world looking for adventure, and then there are the adventures that come and find you. We start today's program with a story of somebody who thought he was having the first kind of adventure until the second one came knocking. Alex Blumberg tells what happened. Alex Blumberg. He's one of the producers of our show and one of the creators of Planet Money, which you could find at NPR.org/money. Act Two, Oh the Places We'll Go. We thought that any adventure show would be incomplete without the kind of old-fashioned adventure stories where people are swept out of the most ordinary lives when a visiting, you know, wizard shows up one day, or they head through the back of a wardrobe and they end up in some totally extraordinary place, encountering things that they have never ever even imagined. Neil Gaiman. Before him we heard, in order, Dave Eggers, Jeanne Darst, Cristin Milioti reading a story by Wendy McClure, and John Conlee reading a story by Fiona Maazel. Thanks to all of them. Well, our program was produced today by Robyn Semien, with Ben Calhoun, Sarah Koenig, Jonathan Menjivar, Lisa Pollak, Alissa Shipp, and Nancy Updike. Our senior producer's Julie Snyder. Production help from [? Micky Meek. ?] Seth Lind is our production manager. Emily Condon's our office manager. Music help from Damien Grey, from Rob [? Geddes. ?] Our website, thisamericanlife.org. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. Hey everybody. Ira Glass here. So we got this email at our radio show near the end of the last school year from a 14-year-old. I called her up at her house in California and asked her to read it. Mainly, she says that she wrote to us because she and her friends were talking right after they left eighth grade about how terrible middle school was. And she wondered was it just as bad for other people as it was for them? In Annie's case, she had friends who smoked, so she got criticized for smoking. But then she also was made fun of for not smoking, for being too much of a sissy to start smoking. She was made fun of for coming from a bilingual elementary school where everybody learned to speak Spanish and spoke it throughout the day. We talked about this for a little while. She said basically, everybody comes into middle school as a little kid, and you're going to have to grow up, and figure out who's in what group, and who you are, and who's above who. And you're going to have to figure that out somewhere at that age, right? It might as well be middle school. And it was terrible, she says, but now she's in high school. Well, today on our radio program, for Annie we look at whatever it is that happens in those mysterious years that we call middle school. We have stories today from all over the country, people lurching their way through these years when you're figuring out so, so much. We go to middle school dances and classrooms, and down to the Mexican border. From WBEZ Chicago, it's This American Life, distributed by Public Radio International. I'm Ira Glass. Stay with us. Act One, Life in the Middle Ages. So we wanted to understand what is going on exactly physically and emotionally with middle school kids, and we talked to all kinds of people about that these last few weeks. And one of the producers on our staff had a very strong opinion about all this, Alex Blumberg. Before he got into radio, he taught in a middle school in Chicago for four years. He was a science teacher. And he concluded from that experience-- If that seems just insane, Alex told me that Maria Montessori, who's the creator of the Montessori schools who looked at what kids could learn at each developmental stage, at one point in her career actually tossed out a similar suggestion. Perhaps, she said, young adolescents would be better off at a farm school, what she called an Erdkinder, where they would work with the land. I ran Alex's thoughts by Marian Strok, the principle of Evergreen Academy Middle School in Chicago, which was listed as one of the best middle schools in the country, a school to watch, by the National Forum to Accelerate Middle Grades Reform. And so what's actually happening developmentally in the bodies and brains of kids when they're in middle school? This is Linda Perlstein. When she wrote a book called Not Much, Just Chillin': The Hidden Lives of Middle Schoolers, following five middle school students very closely for a full year, she also incidentally researched everything she could find out about what is going on developmentally with kids that age that makes them so different from other ages. And it's fascinating. In other words, during those years, your brain turns you into you, the adult you. The stuff you don't exercise just kind of goes away. And what stays? Linda Perlstein agrees that all the stereotypes about middle schoolers, everything, in fact, that Annie complained about, all of that is true. But she says that there's a flip side that people don't usually talk about. Middle school is when kids open up to the world. It's when they think about bigger things. And they haven't formed their opinions on things yet. Everything is up for grabs, which is amazing to be around. Older kids, she says, high school kids, by then they can be jaded or cynical. They're settling into who they are. In middle school, everything's new. You're probably picking your friends for the very first time. Act Two, Stutter Steps. One good place to see the experiment that is life in middle school in action is a middle school dance. Last Friday, there were middle school dances all over the country, all at the same time, and we sent reporters to a half dozen of them to find out how kids were doing. They talked to them before the kids went inside to the field of battle. And, no surprise, we found a lot of stress, a lot of uncertainty. These four girls are sixth graders, and they're in a car on the way to a neon-themed dance at Edgewood Middle School in Highland Park, Illinois, with their mom and reporter Rob Wildeboer. Roughly 800 miles east in New Jersey, sixth grader Ethan [? Derose ?] was hoping there would be at least one slow dance, though did he feel ready for a slow dance? He's standing in front of the school with one of our producers, Brian Reed, as kids stream into the school. Ethan is wearing a button-up shirt with green and black stripes that he is not happy with. Of course, Ethan and the girls in that car in Illinois are sixth graders. In New York City, seventh graders Evelyn Benson and Alice Westerman are excited and feeling very grown up on their way to their school's Halloween dance. Some of the middle school boys got up the nerve to ask girls to be their dates to the dances. But because this is a new experience for the girls too, being asked out on a date, they don't exactly know how to handle it. Here's a girl named Autumn talking with our producer, Lisa Pollak, in Delaware, the afternoon of the dance. Of course, some of the boys are no better. During the dance in Windham, Maine, our reporter Claire Holman pulled six grader, Christopher Potter, out of the action for a chat. In Richmond, outside Moody Middle School's dance, reporter Eric Mennel spoke with Elliot German and his step-brother Jonathan Lawton. They're both eighth graders who ran through the official rules for the dance. There are rules like this at all the dances, and some more comprehensible than others. As for whether or not the kids obey the rules and what actually happens inside the dance on the actual dance floor, one of our producers, Lisa Pollak, went inside to the dance floor at the Fall Costume dance in Lewes, Delaware. And I'm going to hand it off to her.  Lisa Pollak. Coming up, surviving middle school by pretending that you are from a completely different family. That is in a minute, from Chicago Public Radio and Public Radio International, when our program continues. It's This American Life. I'm Ira Glass. Each week on our show of course we choose a theme, bring you different kinds of stories on that theme. We thought, you know, that's a pretty good idea. That is a place with a lot of stories. We've arrived at Act Three of our show. Act Three, Mimis in the Middle. The place that Domingo Martinez went to middle school, they still called it junior high. And he says that his sisters did something to cope with any feelings of inferiority they might have otherwise felt in their new school with all those new kids. Domingo Martinez, reading an excerpt from his memoir, The Boy Kings of Texas, which is going to be published by Lyons Press next July. Act Four, Anchor Babies. So this week as we were putting together the radio show and sending reporters out into middle schools, we discovered that in schools all over the country, there already were reporters on the ground, deep inside, covering the issues that middle school kids really care about. These are student newscasters from Hart Middle School in Pleasanton, California. I myself got my start on the mic on the morning announcements. And this is what middle school morning announcements in some schools are like today. Students make these full blown video productions. Some of them have music themes. [MUSIC PLAYING] The kids stand in front of banners with their school logo, or sometimes it's a green screen backdrop so they make it look like they're on a local TV news set. Jonathan Menjivar is one of the producers of our show. Act Five, Blue Kid On the Block. In September, a kid who we're going to call Leo-- not his real name-- started seventh grade at a new school. And he's having a more extreme experience. He's having a harder time finding his place in middle school than other middle school kids, because he's new to town. His family just arrived from Rochester, New York. He's got that on top of everything else. Sarah Koenig is one of the producers of our show. Act Six, Grande With Sugar. So I've been talking to educators, and one who had taught for years in high school and then moved to middle school told me that the key difference between teaching in the two environments was that in middle school, you have to be sympathetic to, and patient with, all of the emotional drama. You have to deal with that directly if you want the classroom to work. Which brings me to this next story of a student who was doing badly in a middle school in Newark, New Jersey. This is Shannon Grande, who teaches at Rise Academy Middle School, which is a public school, 91% black and Latino, and eligible for free lunches, one of the KIPP charter schools. Hence the uniforms. So this kid was in an unfortunate spiral. He felt isolated from the other kids just inherently, because his home situation was so bad. And then would get angry with the other kids, which then made them mad and made him more isolated. Then he got worse and worse, threw some stuff across a room, and it hit a teacher.  And he couldn't explain why. Well a big problem for him, one reason that he was ostracized, he didn't wash. Kids would whisper about it, and when he would get mad and then arguments would escalate, that is where it would go. "You're dirty." "You smell." The kids would say it right to his face. Over time, the staff found all kinds of ways to address this. They found him clean clothes and a place to clean up before school. So Ms. Grande took this girl and the three other girls who had been doing group work with this boy, and she took those girls into the teacher's room. And all four of these girls were academically strong, and all of them had shown good leadership qualities in the school in the past. And she talked to them. And it really was just a couple minutes before the kids told Ms. Grande, "We can take it from here." And she left them to talk. Afterwards, the boy told Ms. Grande that it felt good. It felt good that these girls knew that he was trying to deal with his anger. And since this conversation, over time, the entire class has entered this discussion with this kid. And when this kid has an outburst, they will all talk openly about his anger. This is what the research shows, that in middle school, you listen to peers more than you listen to anybody else. And that is working with this kid. The other day, this kid got a detention for missing part of his uniform. And he started on a rant in class about how they're all against him, and all the time they're on his back, and everybody's against him. And it was the end of the world. And Ms. Grande finally asked him, "Who's they? Who's everybody?" And he started smiling. And she asked him what is he really upset about? And unlike in the past, he could untangle it. He could tell her. Well, our program was produced today by Lisa Pollak, with Ben Calhoun, Sarah Koenig, Jonathan Menjivar, Brian Reed, Robyn Semien, Alissa Shipp, and Nancy Updike. Our senior producer is Julie Snyder. Production help from Mickey Meek. Seth Lind is our production manager. Emily Condon is our officer manager. Music help from Damien Grave. Our website, thisamericanlife.org. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories of This American Life. Hey, dad? And your plan was, we're going to buy a suit. Let's try to get a suit for like a hundred bucks with the thought that if I don't wear it, you'll just return it the next day. What do you mean by that? Wait, what do you mean? What kinds of things? Are you saying that this thing that happens every time I come is that there's some kind of unnecessary chaos? No? Now, you know, usually, a story on the show, for it to work, it needs to kind of have some bigger idea, or some bigger universal thing that it drives towards. Do you think there is something like that with this story? Jane Feltes-- Alissa Shipp-- Seth Lind-- That's our production manager, Seth Lind. Sarah Koenig-- Alex Blumberg-- That would be Lisa Pollak, jumping the gun. And finally, our senior producer, Julie Snyder. Nervous. One of our producers, Nancy Updike, was called away and isn't here. And that's how I refer to all of you, as child producers. All right. And so let the games begin. Our first story is from Lisa Pollak. The last line was, she didn't bust a gut, but she only does that at funerals. That was a joke! OK. So this is a good place to say that two of our producers put together stories that didn't work out so well. Alissa Shipp, one of our producers, called her mom, and got into this pretty heavy conversation. And the most air-able part of it was this one moment that they got talking about this moment with her grandmother in the hospital. And it's 16 seconds long. And then our next story is from Sarah Koenig. Also a shortie. I would have ended the song a little earlier. I had enough of the cuteness. I was ready for it to end, like, 20 seconds earlier. Yeah. How hard was the pitch from the parent? Yeah, I know. And for me, that would narrow it down for me to Lisa and Robyn. Yeah. Lisa's story about the funny funeral, Nancy's story about the Erie Canal, for me it would be Lisa's story about the funny funerals and Robyn's story about the car. Robyn's story about the dad's car and Jane's story about Haiti, why? Why those two? Not like that usual crap we put out here. Yeah, but you remember the first like minute and a half of Nancy's piece, which is just like these incredibly boring pieces of factual information? OK. So I'm just going to take a little score here. So I'm voting Lisa. Julie? OK. Lisa? Alissa? Sarah? OK. Seth? Jane? OK. Robyn? OK. The final tally. Lisa, you have four votes. Nancy has one, Robin has two, and Jane, you have one. Wait, wait, wait. You can see what? What does that show that you went ice skating with your mom? Maybe that was a selling point for her. Maybe she likes nuns and priests. And she knows some of the old ones from back in the day. And these weren't just the regular nuns and priests that she see's everyday on the ball field. These are some of the older players. You have the cards, you know, but you never see out of the stadium anymore. And Father Dennis, was he just like another teacher at the school or was he somebody who you especially liked? Did you ask your mom afterwards about the whole thing? And did she explain what she was hoping was going to happen once she got you and Father Dennis together? But you think that's what it might be? Like in the back of her mind she's just like, maybe you're single, you're in your late 20s. Maybe you should be a priest? Like what? Hi, is this Janice? And what did she do? Oh right, you're going to seem like you're this brave kid dealing with the snakes and getting to do something that's so cool. Had you ever seen that before? Right, right. And this is because milk is some sort of thing you do if you get bitten by a deadly snake? And an amazing moment for a kid to have at 11. Like when you're 11 you don't get in many situations where you are the one, and adults need to look to you to take control of a situation. And so what does it look like? And how often in your life do you have a moment where it suddenly becomes so utterly clear what you have to do, and only you can do it. Just to give people a sense of the range of things that different parasites do, could you tell the story of the parasite that gets into ants, the lancet fluke? And what's the advantage to the parasite for the ant to be up there? What's so amazing that is it's not just the control that the parasite is having over the ant. That life cycle that you're describing is so complicated. It's having to go through three different animals over the course of its normal life cycle. It's really hard to talk about without kind of ascribing a kind of intentionality to them. They don't have consciousness. They don't have brains in any way. And its hard for us to even understand what they're doing without kind of like putting that on them. And it seems like all the parasites break down into two different groups. There the kinds that actually get inside a host and then kill it off in their drive to survive. And then there are others which actually just kind of live inside and are happily living inside forever. They want the host to survive. Could you just tell the example of the creature that eats the fish's tongue? So many of these stories just are such gross-out stories on a visceral level. Yeah. Thinking about this as much as you have, do you start to see everything as being parasites? Huh. Is one side winning? The parasites have the upper hand? I know. But we know about them. They don't know about us. Like we're the ones with the brains and the thinking and the consciousness. Mr. Zimmer, whose side are you on? Because Mr. Zimmer, at some point we're all going to have to choose sides in this war. Speaking for the other humans, I want to say you're either with us or against us. What is this? Are you saying this because they could sense that you are in league with them? Carl Zimmer. His book, the perfect reading material if you ever whenever long talk with an eight-year-old boy, is Parasite Rex. Was the rat trying to get out of the toilet? Now he's mad. Sure Really? That was step one? OK. Yeah, time for some pride. Literally? Now we went to the neighborhood and were told it hasn't changed that much since 2003 when you were there and-- Are you overplaying the desperate poverty of this neighborhood? You write really honestly in the book about how you aren't from a neighborhood like this and how naive you are going in. I mean, you write really, really honestly about it. Do you think it's possible that you went into this neighborhood, and you just misperceived how dangerous and tough it is? And that's what people are pointing out? Well, no, but I'm not talking about-- I'm talking about the people in the neighborhood, who know the neighborhood. But do you think it's possible that-- Do you think it's possible-- I mean, you talk so honestly about this in the book-- do you think it's possible that you just misperceived it because you weren't used to that kind of neighborhood? So I'm taking it-- so are you saying you do think it's possible? So you think it might be possible? When I visited the school, I went to Mr. Richards' class. And I asked the students if they had questions for you or anything that they would like me to say to you. And they had one request. One senior girl said, she'd like you to admit you got things wrong. She'd like you to apologize. What do you want to say to her? Now in your article, you lay out a lot of data, a lot of studies. What's the most alarming evidence you have? Go ahead, scare us. A brain tumor on that side of the head? All right. That last part you're just making up. So four times more chances? OK, give me another. At the level that comes out of a cell phone. Now so these are the studies that show that we do have reason to worry. Aren't there a lot of other studies on the other side saying, like, no, no, no, we don't have to worry. And it's hundreds of studies, right? From the cell phone business, yeah. Wait, wait. Let me just-- So in other words, if there's no funding from telephone companies or people associated with them, 75% of the studies show, yes, the electromagnetic signals out of cell phones actually do affect our cells. They have a biological effect. OK. Now the EPA used to look into this to see the environmental effect of this kind of radiation. But you're right that it stopped. Talk about why it stopped. National Institute of Occupational Safety and Health? This is all the 1980s, yeah. This is what your sources inside the EPA told you? And right now, which federal agency is responsible for making sure that our cell phones aren't killing us? And Slesin is? OK. So I remember when cell phones first came out, and there were scare stories about whether or not they were harmful and whether they might cause brain tumors. And at that point in the '90s, it was all very speculative. And then it seemed like those stories went away. And I, as somebody just like reading the news, I just thought like, well, I guess that means that there's nothing to worry about. Are you saying, yes, we now know cell phones do give us brain tumors? Or are you saying, yes, we now know we need to worry that there's not enough research to know they're safe? So if the safety isn't clear, but then they have like hundreds of millions of them out being used, so it's just like a big science experiment. And is this one of these things where we don't know the answer, but lots of people are looking into it, and a lot of money is going into it to figure this out? Or is this one of these things where we don't know the answer? And really nobody-- like, not much money is really going into this to figure this out? Now how did you get into the subject? Did you know somebody who-- How did you get into this? And given all that you've learned, have-- your daughter is a teenager? So have you tried to talk her into not using her cell phone? And how does that go? Well, do you think that she believes you that the cell phone is dangerous? And so, given your success with your own child, how do you feel about your chances of success writing articles and convincing other people to put down their cell phones? Dismiss it like won't even listen to the evidence? What did you say? Wait, what did you say?  What are they doing?  And they're not going to buy from them. OK, so let's say that I'm thinking about moving my radio show to a country where there are lots of kidnappings. You consult with people who are moving to those areas about what to do if you are kidnapped. If I'm kidnapped, give me advice. What should I do? And it's to my advantage if they see me as a person, why? Are there places that it is better to be kidnapped than other places? If you had to choose a place to be kidnapped, where would you choose? Are there counterintuitive things that you tell people to do? Had your meal been served yet? And was there a part of you-- I was trying to figure out a politically sensitive way to ask this question. It was chaos out there. Did you feel like, I'm going into a madhouse? But you think it's just as serious a crisis. Just in the last month? And when you first looked at the budget, did you suspect that this was the state that it was in? Were you surprised when you first got into the numbers? So forever into the future, they'll have to pay rent on their own Capitol building? To solve a short term problem? And so, at some point, the governor makes clear he's not embracing the plan. When do you find out about that? Does he talk to you about it privately? Do you see it? Were you surprised? And what do people say to that when you talk to them about that? How do you think that the state should balance the budget? Can I ask you-- the numbers that the budget office in the governor's office have presented, and that the lieutenant governor presented, show that this year, there would be a $9 billion deficit, next year, $13 billion, and increasing every year until it's $60 billion. Do you think those numbers are wrong? And when the lieutenant governor says that there's a structural problem in the budget, that every year there are more expenses than we're bringing in revenue, and that's increasing over the course of every year going forward, do you think he's right? So is that Marc. So Scott, you were born without hearing, right? This is a very strange interview because you can't hear and because I have a terrible cold, I can't speak. Yeah. And so the first sounds that you hear are those pulses? And what do they sound like? Oh, I see. The first vibrations, you couldn't even tell that they were coming in through your ears. Am I understanding you right, if someone was looking right at you and you were seeing their mouth moving, talking directly to you, you actually couldn't tell which of the sounds was the sound of their voice coming out of their mouth? In your book you write, "A message concocted by a committee would be a recipe for the lowest common denominator, and is likely to consist of banalities. Statements solely by a politician or religious leaders to horrible to contemplate." What do you think should be in the first message? OK, so here's your menu. Just read the list of sandwiches from top to bottom. Now let's go to this other one and read. Does anyone work here who used to work at Hanco's? I brought a Cantonese translator with me because I've been told the Hui's English wasn't so great. Hui is Chinese, not Vietnamese. And what's your name? But Ling worked here with Hui . Do you think he's Hui? Let's take his picture. Wait, wait, wait, and you've actually seen this happen? Let me just pause this for a second. So I heard that, and I wondered how poor Harrison Ford get dragged into this pitch. Matter, you mean, like there's a lot of customers out there? Really so you're almost saying that people who invest in stuff want to make the world a better place as part of their investing, and that you have to take that into account. Really? Didn't people get into investing to make money? Well then let's play the winner. And let me ask you what is this person doing right. Let's hear the pitch Actually, let me stop so far. So what have you heard so far that's working? Now you hear a lot of pitches. What are some of the weirdest pitches you've ever heard? Ew. I don't know. There's just something so disgusting about that, about this device. Then you have to like clean out the poo-encrusted device afterward. Ah. So I don't know why, but it just seems really disgusting to me. Why didn't you invest in it? Wait, wait, I want to stay on the poo for a second. I feel like what you're saying is very uplifting. But I want to bring us back to poo. You know the problem with this, what you're saying, that's exactly the problem with this. If you got into business with these people, you'd be talking about poo all the time. Like your life would be filled with these poo discussions. And you'd be constantly having to evoke the image in your head of poo dissolving underneath this cup over and over. Like that image would be in your head like every day. You'd have to think about that. Like who wants to be in that business? Yeah, I've been reading your columns and it seems like a there's a lot of haunted houses in Georgia. I sort of forgot he was trained as a Marine. And Dave, you went to Meriwether County, right near the western border of the state. And Jane, you went to two different counties, counties that sit right next to each other. And they're named after the foods? Augustus Octavius Bacon is quite a name. OK, well I'm learning a lot. Obviously so. So where do we start? What town?  How big was the recorder?  The rent's due?  Pay the rent means did you get your numbers?  That's just against the rules.  Oh, it's against the law?  I'm just going to repeat this because it's hard to hear. "The XO was in the other day," that's a commanding officer, right?  Or, the Executive Officer. --"was in the other day. He laid down a number."  I'm not going to quote him on that, because I don't want to be quoted stating members.  "He wants three seat belts, one cell phone, and 11 others." What does that mean?  I don't know what the number is, but that's what he wants. That's a really-- what does that mean?  He's saying "any roving bands of more than two or three people"-- he's talking about just people going around on Halloween night--  I want them stopped--  --cuffed--  --throw them in here, run some warrants.  You're on a foot post? F it. Take the first guy you've got, lock them all up. Boom.  --go back out and then we'll come back in and process them later on."  So in this police station, where everybody's obsessed with how many tickets they're writing-- where cops are told to pull people off corners and throw them in jail and figure out later what to charge them with-- comes Adrian Schoolcraft, who had no interest in making his numbers.  When you would talk to other officers in the precinct, did you have friends who felt the same way?  And would they not get the numbers, or would they get the numbers?  Do you not have a wife and kids?  And so you wouldn't go up to people just to give them a ticket?  Because?  And so did you get a lot of heat for doing this?  What would they do?  So they would assign you to these lousy posts?  Yeah, what are the stories that he tells?  Like, no crimes have shown up. People haven't shown up saying they've been raped or assaulted.  The guy who was in charge of that precinct where all this stuff happened?  And so the NYPD has denied that crimes were downgraded like this.  During this whole time that you were recording, who did you tell?  Friends?  Fellow officers?  Were you tempted to tell anybody ever?  What'd your dad say?  And when you were getting these orders to get your numbers up and you wouldn't do it, what did your dad say about that?  So he was on your side.  Finally in April, Schoolcraft takes off a week for stomach and chest pains and is sent to a police department doctor. The doctor finds nothing wrong with him physically.  And all the things, basically, you're trying to report that you think are going wrong in the precinct.  Because you though, what was going to happen?  But you thought he might provoke you into something, and then he would shoot you, or something?  The officers open Adrian's door with a key they get from his landlord.  Why does he keep saying that he's worried about your safety?  How many people are in your bedroom at this point?  EDP is?  So if he found that recorder, how are we hearing this tape?  In plain sight?  But the tapes showed that isn't true.  Why do you think they went so far with you?  Like, he's literally crazy. That's the message.  Because you assumed that the police commissioner-- the people at the very top of the police force-- that they would be on your side.  But now do you believe that, in fact, they would be on your side?  Is it weird not to be a policeman anymore?  Before the attacks. But that changed, the day the US invaded, right? And let's just review before we say anything else about Iraq. Shia versus Sunni. And Sunni doesn't have that? Well, Nancy Updike, who was in Iraq with Larry is also in the studio. Nancy, how is it going? Did you ever picture that you'd be somebody going out, talking to republican groups, arguing against tax cuts? What do you think of the people who are trying to get these three initiatives passed? Do you think that the politics this year are just very strange where republicans who, in the past, saw eye-to-eye and worked together now are opponents on issues just like this? Hello. It's just a pile of papers. And you guys bought them? And your goal in buying this toxic asset-- I thought of it as somebody who's a fan of these stories when I would hear them-- you're like archaeologists in this project. You're like forensic doctors trying to reconstruct how the housing market collapsed and the economy died, and truly understand what happened by carefully picking apart the corpse of one financial instrument. And I remember at the beginning, your hope was that this one toxic asset would be like an encyclopedia of the entire financial crisis. All right, well let's get to it. Our show in five acts. That is amazing.  Wow. Ew. Wait. It worked for a brief amount of time? How many people shot videos of their neighbors? Half a dozen? Really? Why did it seem crazy? Yeah, it actually does sound crazy. Well it just seems like, really? Things have come to this? That that's what we're going to do? You mean because the dogs lick each other? That's the problem? And as your poo technician, does he get excited when he actually gets samples to test? Now I would think that another problem in terms of just getting this product out is that there are lots of places where there might be dog waste in front of a building, but it's in a city or it's on a street where all kinds of dogs come by who don't live in that building. And so testing all the dogs in that building isn't going to help you. Wait a second. You're saying that people, members of the building, would actually try to evade the rules by bringing in a random dog for the dog test? That's what you're saying? I don't know. It's a Q-tip that you put into his mouth and then you pull it out. I don't know. It doesn't seem so hard. Are there closed-circuit cameras in the hallways? Now since you've started this, how many times have you had violations that you had to investigate? What's the fine? What did the person say the second time? And did they lay out exactly how that would go? That somebody would abduct their dog, squeeze poo out of it, and then plant it? Did they lay out a whole scenario?  Do you remember when you got your first hint that you were seeing the case differently than some of the other people on the jury?  Can I ask you, does some particular example come to mind of some time when you or somebody else raised one of these points and the reaction you got from the side that thought that he was guilty?  You're saying that the men were saying things that were demeaning. What kinds of things did they say?  Hey JoAnn, are there any other moments for you that stand out when you were deliberating?  What happened after the verdicts were announced? What happened to you then? Why is that so complicated? Oh right. So the question is, how do you count that money without double counting it? Are you counting me having it or are you counting him having it? What? Until this conversation it never occurred to me that money doesn't change hands when we pay our bills online or anything. Like I don't know why I never even stopped to think, right, at no point does the bank go and deliver like $100 to the phone company on my behalf. It really is just numbers going back and forth in the computer. How old are you guys? Did you want to be here or are you being dragged along? Why do you like Glenn Beck so much? What do you like about his show? Do they teach you that in school? About global warming, I mean? Do you argue with your teachers? One, two three. Hey, Erin? Hey, Erin, it's Ira. Hi. How are you? OK, so Dr. Johnson, meet Erin. So Dr. Johnson, we can't give you a full semester here on the radio to walk through all of the arguments one might do, but you're going to lay out some of this case for Erin. And I understand you're going to break this down into two parts. So can you walk through the first part of your presentation? OK, so that's the first part of your presentation, what's the second part? I understand it has to do with something called ice cores? OK, so I feel like some of this has gotten actually a little bit technical. So Erin, before I ask you if any of this is convincing, I want to ask you, do you have questions about any of this? OK, that's the way I feel too, I feel like I understand most of it. And so, Erin, do you find any of this convincing? How come? So, Erin, this explanation of what happened in the satellite pictures, do you find that credible, convincing, does this change your picture of it-- what the doctor is saying? You don't sound won over. Erin, do you feel like any of the arguments that Dr. Johnson makes-- about the 12th century, about these satellite pictures, on any of these subjects-- is the way that you hear, you feel like, well, sure, that's a perfectly good argument, but you're just getting one side of the picture, and that there's another side too? You feel you feel you're caught up in a kind of a he said, she said argument? But Dr. Johnson, from your point of view, you don't feel like this is something where, OK, there's two sides to this argument. You feel like the data is in and we have an answer now? Hey, Erin, is there anything that any science teacher could say that could convince you of this? Dr. Johnson, can I ask you-- I feel like the question this seems like it points to from your side of this-- and I hope you feel like you can answer this honestly-- is do you think it's hopeless to reach certain people once they're already skeptical? Once someone is skeptical of this and they see it as a he said, she said argument, is it possible to ever get through to them?  Meet Jennifer Lyne. Or maybe you've already met her on I Didn't Know I Was Pregnant. Or this week on The View. She was 28, working two jobs. One as a lab technician, one in a clothing store when she discovered that she was pregnant. Turned out to be nine months pregnant. She had a baby three days later. She said she didn't suspect for a bunch of reasons. For one, she was on the pill the entire pregnancy. So you thought like you had like cancer or something? Now when we talked about having you come in for an interview in our story meeting at our radio show, the women on the radio show staff said, we have questions for her and so four of them are with me here and I want to introduce you. There's Julie Snyder and Jane Feltes and Robyn Semien. And Alissa Shipp.  So they all have a bunch of questions for you. Is it OK that they throw those at you?  Jennifer, are you kind of big? I don't know how else to ask that. Wait, wait, wait. But that can't happen very often. Wait, the doctor's calling to say that the pap smear-- Because you might have cancer? But the people took the test to find out this result. And the problem with a joke about nagging girlfriends isn't the political correctness of it, but simply it's a really tired joke. But also you're saying to Todd, who's been here forever, yeah, you can't do that again. Don't do that joke again. I'm tired of that joke. Judy? I know I am. Yes. What's it look like? Oh, he was? Oh, really? And was he happy that there was an article? And my question for you is, could this be real? Oh, so do you think they just didn't know? And did the company confirm that that's what this was? Is it legal for us to even talk about this on the radio? Is Coke going to sue us both? Wait. So there's a plant in New Jersey, and basically they import tons and tons of coca leaves. They remove the cocaine from the coca leaf? Wow, look at this. I just typed coca tea into the search. 5, 6, 7-- there's like a dozen things. More than a dozen, 15, 20 things come up which are coca tea just in amazon.com. When we first sent you guys this recipe and you took a look at it, can I just ask you, what did you think when you saw the ingredients? We were worried that asking you guys to go out and make Coca-Cola was like asking you to like go into the Death Star and blow up some planets or something. I have this feeling like I'm going to drop acid right now. I find it to be really mediciney. And if you didn't tell me that this was the Coca-Cola recipe, I wouldn't have known. It tastes fruity. How close do you think you are to the taste of actual Coca-Cola now? So basically, this idea of Coke, it's the super secret thing that nobody could crack, from your perspective, that's just some very cheerful showmanship on their part. Do you think ordinary consumers would be able to pick out which one of these is real Coca-Cola? Do I have to make the [SNAP] sound? Does this seem like it could be an ancestor or a relative of Coca-Cola? And do most of them have these same ingredients? They have lime, and they have neroli and cinnamon and nutmeg? But we don't know? And there's all this fuss about the secret formula, but it seems like the basic ingredients of Coca-Cola are actually on the public record. Well in the supermarket, when we were in the supermarket, one of the young women who tasted the product, she tasted an unmarked little cup of Coca-Cola and she said, "That tastes like my childhood." That's what 125 years of omnipresent worldwide distribution and promotion buys you. I told Phil that we were going to put up the old recipe that we found on our website and asked him if it would be OK with Coke if listeners would try to make batches themselves-- all the ingredients and oils that you need are online. They're cheap too. And he laughed and said, "Yeah. Yeah, let them try. They'll come running back to Coke." Because you know the sheriff, because you've waited on him. Judge Barton says this? That seems like a lot. What's the fairness issue? You can tell the guards, right? How do you do that? And how'd she seem? Because why? How could it be worse than your kid locked up indefinitely with no contact from the outside world? You mean like a little Bic razor, that kind? Was your thought, I'm going to do this in a way where I get out of here? Or is your thought, I'm going to do this in a way where I'm dead? The right one looks OK. The left one you could still see two big-- I don't know. They're shaking. And did the counselors know that you had a history of cutting? And did Judge Williams know? No, no record. Yeah. Why? What's it compare to elsewhere? But you could see why the would laugh. Because everybody who comes in to a-- And we should say this was just like, 20 minutes after the first test. You know just like sometimes there's a false positive, just some little mistake. Actually do you want to read what he says there? It's page two of this transcript from March 11, 2003. Right, apparently one of the workers there named Alicia grabbed the cap for the little vial of pee from the trash-- And then Judge Williams says, "Now I don't believe that in a heartbeat." And Charlie says, "Ask Alicia. She'll tell you. She will not lie in court. She grabbed it out of the trash can." Wait, wait. He got 14 days simply for saying, like, no, no, I don't think this is right. Wait, but what law was he violating there? Isn't that what court is for? Isn't he supposed to-- isn't this the place where he's supposed to be able to say, let me tell you my side. Now you decide? Now if somebody were unhappy with their treatment in the drug court, can they just appeal it? I mean usually in a court-- No? Why not? And is the reason why there's no right to appeal because basically I've already pled guilty to my charge and so-- And then December that year, you get screened positive for marijuana. And how was that said? OK. So I'm picturing like you and the political officer. And I'm picturing some big office. And there's like-- are their snacks? Do they offer you water? Is there a little thing of dates? And are you sitting on couches in some office or are you-- Yeah. And then is it the sort of thing like in a movie, where you go over like a list of things. And the foreign minister is silent, silent, silent. And then he says, well these are internal affairs. He's gives you like a one sentence answer. Is it a friendly kind of thing? Is it a pro forma thing? So in the years where you were in Cairo and part of the government-- and now enough time has gone by and circumstances have changed enough, I hope that you can talk honestly about this-- did you feel like we were pushing the Egyptian government as much as could be pushed? In other words, as a human rights officer, did you feel like, OK, we're saying everything that can be said productively, and that's it? Or did you feel at the time, we could be doing a lot more for human rights? We could be pushing this regime more. We should be squeezing them more. Well, I think let's start with that one. So how does that lay out as a poker hand? Just walk me through it. So in this reading of it, Khrushchev's original bet was really a bluff? So at that time, you're saying, in the end it worked out to be the right move, but you're saying it was a mistake? It's interesting, because I've heard that professional players, they say in some situations the hardest person to play against is an amateur, because they can't predict what the amateur is going to do when they put pro moves on them. And in a way, what you're saying is that's what happened right here. Make you a hero. And the fact that so much of the time you really are just kind of in the dark, and you have to figure out, "Should I raise, should I fold these?" Is that the thing you hate about poker, is that the thing you love about poker? In this tiny, tiny space? What's their plan on how they're going to communicate with him? Do you know what I mean? Did you talk to them about that? So talk about what happens when they finally see him in person for the first time. What does he look like? What can they see? It's such a strange encounter because he's giving them such clear signals. He wants them to go away the entire time. There's a letter that one of the guys writes at this point. Can I ask you to just read that? It's on page 134 of your book. Is it fair to just leave him out there alone? Is it fair to him? It seems sort of sad. Where there's ample food, and he goes and picks fruit, and he hunts animals. Yeah. Actually, in his autobiography, he writes this. I found this on snopes.com. He explains the M&Ms; this way. David Lee Roth writes, "Van Halen was the first band to take huge productions into third level markets." Tertiary markets. "We'd pull up with nine 18-wheeler trucks full of gear in places where the standard was three trucks max. And there were many, many technical errors, whether it was the girders couldn't support the weight, or the flooring would sink in, or the doors weren't big enough to move the gear through. The contract rider read like a version of the Chinese Yellow Pages, because there was so much equipment, and so many human beings to make it function. So just as a little test, in article number 126, in the middle of nowhere was, quote, 'There will be no brown M&Ms; in the backstage area upon pain of forfeiture of the show with full compensation,' end quote." Now, when I emailed you to see if you wanted to come on the radio and talk about this, you said, "Oh, that's really a coincidence." Because you just spent your whole day yesterday working on your contract rider? Wait, your contract for some of them says specifically they have to be sober? Is there an M&Ms; clause in your contract? I mean more, is there an M&Ms; clause, is there a thing in your contract that you put in there to be sure that people read the contract? And so if you don't get the call, you know, all right-- So I have some questions for you. Donde esta, usted? What's it mean? It means, where are you. Wait, the word for sauce is salsa. Haven't you heard the word salsa? So this is the first time you're getting on a bike since when? All right, both legs are going. How's your knees? And so what kinds of injuries are those? I saw a quote from a soldier, I think it was in the New York Times, who was in Afghanistan and said, "OK. Can I go home " And I'm wondering if you're hearing any of that. Is this a good time to talk? This looked like such a nice store. I kept meaning to stop in. And what do you think the reaction is going to be? So Eric, it seems like this went very, very differently than you thought it would. It seems like your mom was lovely. And you showed up?  I would say beat up more than got into-- [LAUGHTER] Yeah, we'll edit out the pauses, yeah. Your wife will love you. When we are done with this, she'll be like-- All right. Do you have any sympathy for this guy's dilemma, with the choice he made? And if you faced that choice, you feel like that'd be clear? What to do? Do you buy that? One of the things in this 2003 account that I thought was really charming-- so they all stand up and say, I'm a lifelong Democrat. And then there's a candidate named Anna Helen Demacopoulos? Can I ask you to read your account of what happens when she stands up? So what's expected of them? And what mistakes have you seen people in that setting? And so, when they don't hear that, when a guy actually gives his credentials, what happens? You describe a wannabe candidate, Denise Staniec, who's the former head of the Women's Bar in Illinois, get up before the committeemen. And usually if you're going to be successful, somebody's going to stand up and speak for you. Can I just ask you to read from your account of what happens to her? Now, when you're there in one of these meetings, you see a lawyer named James C. Murray stand up. And you write, quote, "Burke all but says that a seat on the bench has been saved for Murray for 40 years." Can I ask you to just tell the story of why? And this ordinance, was it a pro-civil rights or an anti-civil rights ordinance? And he was basically in a ward where the white population wouldn't want that? You know, what's surprising isn't that this happens, that committeemen are choosing judges based on connections and politics, but that everyone is so open about it. You know what I mean? Like, there's no code of silence. There's no secret language. There's no pretending that something else is happening. I should say, Blagojevich, of course, is currently on trial for selling a Senate seat. Ryan is serving six and a half years on corruption charges. Yeah, but it isn't that these guys are showing such loyalty to the working man. These guys are showing loyalty to Democratic Party machinery, which is them. So she did not get slated again. You know, you think of an old boys' network as being sort of shadowy and sinister, but there's something-- like, reading your accounts-- there's something sort of goofy about this. You know what I mean? Like, seeing it up close. So what did you make of that? What if your dad had actually done this in a way where it was clear that what it was about is that he was trying to show you that he loved you? In other words, what if your dad-- you'd be in the kitchen, and your dad would be in the kitchen, and just out of the blue he would say, hey, I love you. Give me a hug. Would that have worked? Which is why it was weird when Naomi started getting these calls from her dad. Shaul had been at dinner with one of Naomi's sisters. Her sister's husband is a rabbi. And at dinner, the cantor from his synagogue is there with his wife. And Shaul is arguing with her-- it doesn't really matter what it was about-- but eventually, the cantor's wife turns to Naomi's dad and asks him if he loves his children. Right. Yeah. And so did you call your dad? You're freaking out a little bit. This is your wife? What did she write? And now, I was going to say, in the urban legend version, you're dead, they shoot you. John Lomax, he hasn't been alive for 10 years. You've heard the saying, a house divided against itself cannot stand.  Why is this one gang being so nice to this town?  It's interesting to think that they would decide it would help them hold territory if they were simply nicer. OK. So we're going through the gate here into the park? Also it's more fun for the kids. Really? So you got permission from the Angry Birds people? Is that-- you made the costume?  Do you guys have any special plans for today? Any special strategies? So just describe what we're looking at. There's a pyramid here of-- Six of your staff and-- And how many people are actually playing? Did you have fun today? Because it was going by so fast? When did you take your first break today?  Wow. It's funny, like, watching him do something like sing a goofy song for you guys in the morning. You can imagine high school students and college students sort of rolling their eyes at somebody doing that, but nobody does. Do you remember what it was like the first time you saw one of his videos? But the thing I'm wondering for you is-- do you feel like, somehow, accidentally in this job, you got stuck in high school? You got stuck at 15? Like there's a part of you where you're still back there? The goofball part. The part where you get to act their age instead of your age. Do you worry that you'll never be happier in any job than you are in this one? So, Jane? Trends, patterns? What can you tell me? Oh? Demonic carnies, OK, yeah. Oh, right. And it spins around, and the floor drops out. So I know, because you told me right before we sat down, that a lot of the stories that people called in to tell were love stories. Eww. Oh, really? Well, it's good to know that her fiance wasn't the only dummy. Euh. So she's upside down? Well, I'm glad we finally have some unequivocally pro-carnie material in this story. Oh, a lot of people called about puke? And is the story more than just, I was on a ride and I puked? Oh, I don't want to hear that. Wait, was there any that had like a twist? Surprise plot twist? It basically just goes up and down and up and down. Oh no! And did she see the puke in midair, like-- --coming towards her? And it hit her? Eww! You're saying in a way that, for you as somebody who escaped from the World Trade Center, you'd pretty much rather not be looking back so intensely each year. If that's so, then who are these commemorations for? See, I was wondering if when these anniversaries come up, if it's comforting or if it's more like, OK, let's relive the worst day of your life? Hey, Hyder? Hey, Hyder, can you hear me? It's Ira. Yeah, yeah I can hear you. Can you hear me? Where are you right now? Are you in an office? Are you in your house? So I'm just going to launch right in, OK? I have, like, a million questions here. You ready? So when you were last on the radio show in 2003, the final thing you were talking about at the end of that show was about your uncle, Rauf Mama, who is a war hero from fighting the Soviets and has one eye. And then at the end of that show, you talked about this. So you were a teenager when you recorded that. What's it like to hear that now? Hey, Hyder, what's it like now? Do you need to get that? One of the things that's interesting listening to these shows from 2002 and 2003 is how hopeful everybody is about the new Afghan president, Hamid Karzai. And you talk, back in those shows, about how you have fond memories of him visiting with your dad when you were little. We start one of those shows showing Karzai being very charming shortly after coming to power, speaking to Afghans living in the United States. Here's a clip of him at Georgetown University, reading a question from a card. And you, of course, are one of the young people who actually took him up on that call and went back. So since then, his government, the New York Times-- and this is a news stories, not in editorials-- the New York Times refers to his government as one of the most corrupt in the world. President Obama has called Hamid Karzai unreliable and ineffective. Secretary of State Clinton says he runs a narcostate. He faces an internal insurgency. How have your feelings about Karzai changed over the last decade? You don't see him as corrupt? But you're saying the fear is just basically just, like, who you'd be associating with, that you'd be involved with a lot of kind of-- And so have you already made this decision? This is in the run-up to Iraq by then. Which is really not a good feeling in the Rose Garden. Because there's some more direct thing that you can say than, you're taking the death of my husband and using it to start an inappropriate war. What is the mean version of that? Like, what were you holding back? And do you think it's just the combination of being in the most alien environment possible and then suddenly just missing your husband so intensely, like it's all coming together at once, like that's why? Yeah, I read you wrote about that in salon.com back when it happened in May. And you wrote that, when he went off to school the morning after-- bin Laden was killed on a Sunday, so on Monday he went to school-- and that morning, when you dropped him off, he said he felt like a big weight off of his shoulders. And then you wrote, a little after 1:00, Aidan called. You wrote he was uncharacteristically upset. He wanted to come home after school. Everyone's talking about bin Laden. In every class they're happy he's dead, but I don't feel happy. Oh, that just seemed wrong to him. In 2005, you said that you felt like you were still kind of a walking symbol for what had happened to the country. Has that worn off, or has that gotten worse as time has gone on? It's not sexy. No. Like what? I can beat that. Did you find yourself, just at some point you just stopped telling strangers? Do you hope that this 10th anniversary, after this the anniversaries will pass with less ceremony and commemoration? You mean that everybody was getting along for a second? The thing you're describing is the thing you wish people would dwell on. I feel like even that somehow has become part of the standard, blah, blah, blah of this day. You know what I mean? I feel like, if you were to tune on to the television coverage that day, I'm sure that there'll be a lot of things in the speeches about the moment after when we all came together. And I feel like there's like-- It's almost a cliche in a way that's hard to even get back to that feeling. How old is your son now? Is it sobering to see him speaking better Norwegian than you do? Is your son old enough to ask about Iraq? And if you're going to go back there? No, that seems like a nicer story to tell a six-year-old than we were running for our lives. Now, I'm calling you on the anniversary of 9/11. Does this anniversary mean anything to you personally? Do you usually view 9/11/2001 as a day that affected your life? You mean Saudi Arabia? What's it been like for you to watch crowds seize democracy in Egypt and Tunisia and Libya after knowing what happened in your country? Like, what's it been like for you? Let me ask you about something else. The attacks in Norway this past July which killed 92 people, and which were designed to stir hatred against immigrants and non-Christians in Europe, what was that like for you to witness that? Do you think your son will graduate high school in Norway? Do you think you're going to be spending his entire childhood there? You still have them? Why don't you want to throw them away or have them cleaned? So when you and I spoke 10 years ago, you still had the clothes that you had worn that day to work. And you said that it was hard to throw them out. So when did you finally throw out the clothes that you wore on September 11? Oh, you didn't? Are they still in the bag on the floor? That's good. OK, that's a good system. And do you ever pull them out and look at them? Was part of selling the apartment you had to admit to yourself, OK, I'm never going to get over this? On the floor where you were, how many floors were you from where the airplane hit? What did you say? The stairwell that you hadn't been able to get into before? How strange. That must've been so strange for you all. So he's your buddy. And you're watching him clean out his locker to go. How would people say it? Were they sheepish about it, or they just didn't even know to be sheepish about it? What was it like for you after you decided? Were you able to watch baseball? See, I think one of the things that would be hard in your situation is if you have this dream and this identity that's driving you for so long, and from such a young age, it's sort of like you can't replace something with nothing. You've got to replace something with something else. And also you know when you've won. You know when you've lost.  There is a tally at the end of the day. You have your stats. They don't go faster than the speed of light because nothing can go faster than the speed of light. So then how real is that stuff? Like what's the most promising scheme that these scientists say that we would use if we wanted to travel at, or maybe just a lot closer to, the speed of light? Hey, is this Annie? Yeah, you signed it anonymous, but then your email was signed with your name. Yeah. And if you had to explain to somebody what are the worst things about middle school-- can I ask you to just walk me through it. What is so bad about middle school? Did it make you feel bad? That sweater example, is that a real example? And how long did you have the moccasins before you actually wore them? What could be done to make middle school better? And who they're going to be. Wait, are you saying we shouldn't even bother to have them in school? We should just basically put them to work in the factory for two or three years? Can I ask you how much of the stereotype around students this age is true? Are you saying that the stereotype is true? You just have to deal with what it is? Yeah, I can still do magic tricks that I learned at that age. Another kid would? That being? What was their reaction? Well, it's like you took the entire machinery of middle school dynamics, and you're harnessing it to help this kid. Harness the fact that they'll listen to peers. Yeah, why were you in there for two hours? Really? Robyn. Who do you guys think is going to have the highest score? Really? I was very nervous. Yeah, I was. A little. Yeah, the feeling stuff. Who do you guys think is going to have the highest score. Really? Problems with the law? Let's have a rundown. Cheating, you mean, on a test? OK, so let's go around and make our votes. Julie? I think I'm going with Jane. So you have there a stack of, actually, very official looking papers, and your notes, with all of our scores. Before we get to the actual scores, are there any patterns that you feel like you noticed in the group? Yeah, maybe we should start with the lowest scores first, and then go to the highest. 